District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fiscal Year 2027 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2026”.
TITLE I. GOVERNMENT DIRECTION AND SUPPORT
SUBTITLE A. TELEWORK POLICIES
Sec. 1001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Telework Policy Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1002. Title XII of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-612.01
et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 1202b to read as follows:
“Sec. 1202b. Telework.
“(a) The Mayor may establish a telework policy that applies to all agencies.
“(b) No personnel authority or agency shall establish or implement a telework policy
other than the policy established by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, unless
authorized by the Mayor.
“(c) At the request of the Mayor, each agency shall submit a report to the Mayor that
includes information on the use of telework by the agency’s employees.
“(d) The Mayor may audit an agency’s implementation of the telework policy established
pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section and employees’ utilization of telework to ensure
compliance with the telework policy and this section.
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(e) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, a personnel authority or agency may
enter into a collective bargaining agreement that includes terms establishing a telework policy
for covered employees.
“(f) This section shall apply to agencies and personnel authorities otherwise exempt from
this act; except, that it shall not apply to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, the
District of Columbia Court of Appeals, the Office of the Attorney General for the District of
Columbia, the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia, the Office of the People’s
Counsel for the District of Columbia, or the Council and other agencies of the legislative branch
of the District government.
“(g) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue
rules to implement the provisions of this section.
“(h) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Routine telework” means a telework arrangement in which an employee is
authorized to telework on an ongoing basis.
“(2) “Situational telework” means a temporary telework arrangement in which the
employee is authorized to telework due to specific, temporary personal circumstances that
prevent the employee from working from a District government office or worksite or due to
another specific, temporary circumstance approved by the personnel authority.
“(3)(A) “Telework” means an arrangement in which an employee performs
employment duties at the employee’s home or at another location that is not a District
government office or worksite during hours that constitute the employee’s official tour of duty.
“(B) The term “telework” includes both routine telework and situational
telework.”.
SUBTITLE B. ADVISORY NEIGHBORHOOD COMMISSIONS FUNDING
FLEXIBILITY SUPPORT
Sec. 1011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Funding
Flexibility Support Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1012. The Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective October 10,
1975 (D.C. Law 1-21; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 13(n-1) (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.10(n-1)) is amended by striking the
period and inserting the phrase “. A copy of the report or newsletter shall be filed with the
Council, the Mayor, and the OANC.” in its place.
(b) Section 16 (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.13) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (d)(3) is repealed.
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) Subsection (f)(2A)(A)(ii) is amended to read as follows:
“(ii) Fully documented as being approved by the Commission in
the meeting minutes, which shall be signed by either the Secretary or Chairperson; and”.
(3) Subsection (j) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(i) Strike the phrase “the minutes of all meetings” and insert the
phrase “the signed minutes of all meetings” in its place.
(ii) Strike the phrase “this section. A financial report shall” and
insert the phrase “this section. In instances when an incomplete report is filed, a Commission
may file an amended report within 45 days after the due date of that report as established in this
paragraph. A financial report shall” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the word “approved” and
inserting the phrase “received and accepted” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (3)(A) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended to read as follows:
“(3)(A)(i) If a Commission has failed to timely file 2 or more quarterly reports
received and accepted by the OANC, the OANC shall recommend withholding the allotments
associated with the quarterly reports until the Commission files the required reports and
associated documentation.”.
(ii) Paragraph (ii) is amended as follows:
(I) Strike the word “had” and insert the word “has” in its
place.
(II) Strike the phrase “allotment approved” and insert the
phrase “report received and accepted” in its place.
(4) Subsection (m)(3) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “consistent
with the grant application, complete with receipts” and inserting the phrase “consistent with the
grant application, which may be in the form of a close-out report or on a form supplied by the
OANC, complete with receipts” in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) May prohibit all Commissions from providing a grant to any past
grant recipient that:
“(i) Used grant funds contrary to the associated grant application
and budget;
“(ii) Failed to submit the receipt for expenditures made under the
grant; or
“(iii) Failed to refund to the Commission unspent grant monies or
monies spent contrary to the grant application;”.
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “this paragraph.”
and inserting the phrase “this paragraph; and” in its place.
(D) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:
“(C) May withhold from future allotments an amount equal to the amount
awarded to any applicant on the list of prohibited grantees.”.
(5) Subsection (r) is amended as follows:
(A) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
(B) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) When Commission funds are used to pay for the cost or use of a telephone,
the contact number of that telephone shall be publicly available.”.
(c) Section 18(c) (D.C. Official Code § 1-309.15(c)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “templates for staff payroll
forms, grant applications, and” and inserting the phrase “templates for grant applications and” in
its place.
(2) Paragraph (16) is amended by striking the phrase “financial reports, and
approving or disapproving” and inserting the phrase “financial reports, and recommending the
approval or disapproval of” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (19) is amended by striking the phrase “; and,” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(4) Paragraph (20) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(5) A new subparagraph (21) is added to read as follows:
“(21) Providing Commissions with official websites and the technical assistance
related to maintaining and updating them by October 1, 2027.”.
SUBTITLE C. DISTRICT EMPLOYEE PAID PARENTAL, FAMILY, AND
MEDICAL LEAVE
Sec. 1021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “District Employee Paid Parental, Family, and Medical
Leave Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1022. The District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of
1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-601.01 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 1204 (D.C. Official Code § 1-612.04) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
“(4)(A) “Eligible employee” means a District government employee, including an
employee of an independent agency; provided, that, for the purposes of using qualifying family
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
leave or qualifying medical leave, the term “eligible employee” means a District government
employee, including an employee of an independent agency, who has worked for the District
government for at least 180 days, without a break in service, as of the date on which the
qualifying family leave or qualifying medical leave will be taken.
“(B) The term “eligible employee” shall not include:
“(i) A temporary employee appointed for fewer than 90 days; or
“(ii) An employee with intermittent employment.”.
(2) Paragraph (5)(C) is amended to read as follows:
“(C) A spouse or domestic partner;”.
(b) Section 1204a (D.C. Official Code § 1-612.04a) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(1)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “8 workweeks” and
inserting the phrase “2 workweeks” in its place.
(2) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
“(c-1)(1) To the extent practicable, an eligible employee shall, before using paid leave
under this section, provide written notice to the employee’s personnel authority or agency of the
need for the use of paid leave and of the expected date or dates on which the employee intends to
use paid leave.
“(2) If the employee plans to use paid leave on an intermittent basis, the written
notice shall, to the extent practicable, include a schedule of the expected hours during which the
employee intends to use paid leave.
“(3) The written notice shall include a reason for the use of paid leave.
“(4) If the use of paid leave is foreseeable, the employee shall provide the written
notice at least 10 days, or as early as possible, in advance of the use of the paid leave.
“(5) If the use of paid leave is unforeseeable, the employee shall provide a
notification, either oral or written, before the start of the work shift for which the paid leave is
being used.
“(6) In the case of an emergency resulting in the use of paid leave without the
opportunity to provide prior notification, the eligible employee, or another individual on behalf
of the eligible employee, shall notify the Mayor, either orally or in writing, within 48 hours after
the emergency occurs.
“(7) If the agency determines that the use of paid leave under this section for
planned medical treatment, for intermittent leave, or for leave on a reduced leave schedule is
likely to interfere with the operations of the agency, the agency and the eligible employee shall
engage in good-faith negotiations regarding alternate dates or hours for the use of the paid
leave.”.
(3) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “1-year” and inserting
the phrase “one-year” in its place.
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) If a probationary employee voluntarily separates in violation of the one-year
continuation of service agreement, the individual shall be indebted to the District government for
the salary paid during the leave period. Indebtedness incurred pursuant to this paragraph may be
treated in whole or in part as an erroneous payment pursuant to Title XXIX.”.
(4) A new subsection (d-1) is added to read as follows:
“(d-1)(1) An employee, other than an employee serving in a probationary capacity, using
paid parental, family, or medical leave shall enter into a continuation of service agreement. The
continuation of service agreement shall require the employee to continue to serve as a District
employee for 8 weeks after the employee’s return from an approved period of leave.
“(2) If the employee voluntarily separates in violation of the continuation of
service agreement, the individual shall be indebted to the District government for the salary paid
during the leave period. Indebtedness incurred pursuant to this paragraph may be treated in
whole or in part as an erroneous payment pursuant to Title XXIX.”.
SUBTITLE D. LOBBYING FEES AND PENALTIES REFORM
Sec. 1031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Lobbying Fees and Penalties Reform Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1032. The Government Ethics Act of 2011, effective April 27, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-
124; D.C. Official Code § 1-1162.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 227 (D.C. Official Code § 1-1162.27) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the figure “$350” and inserting
the figure “$500” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(i) Strike the figure “$100” and insert the figure “$250” in its
place.
(ii) Strike the phrase “501(c)(3)” both times it appears and insert
the phrase “501(c)(3) or (4)” in its place.
(2) Subsection (c)(3) is amended to read as follows:
“(3) The funds in the Lobbyist Fund shall be used by the Board as follows:
“(A) The registration fee for lobbyists collected pursuant to subsection
(b)(1) of this section shall be used as follows:
“(1) $350 of each registration fee shall be used solely for the
purpose of administering and enforcing this title; and
“(2) $150 of each registration fee shall be transferred to local
funds.
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) The registration fee for lobbyists for nonprofit organizations
collected pursuant to subsection (b)(2) of this section shall be used as follows:
“(1) $100 of each registration fee shall be used solely for the
purpose of administering and enforcing this title; and
“(2) $150 of each registration fee shall be transferred to local
funds.”.
(b) Section 228(a) (D.C. Official Code § 1-1162.28(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “public;” and inserting the
phrase “public; or” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a period
in its place.
(3) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
(c) Section 232(c) (D.C. Official Code § 1-1162.32(c)) is amended by striking the phrase
“$100 per day up to 60 days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays)” and inserting the
phrase “$200 per day up to 60 days” in its place.
SUBTITLE E. MAYORAL TRANSITION
Sec. 1041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Mayoral Transition Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1042. Definitions.
For the purposes of this subtitle, the term “Mayor-elect” means the person who is
certified as the successful candidate for the office of Mayor by the Board of Elections following
the 2026 general election held to determine the Mayor or, prior to such certification, the person
announced and published by the Board of Elections as the unofficial winner of the 2026 general
election for Mayor; provided, that such person was announced as the unofficial winner with a
margin of victory of at least 2% of the votes cast.
Sec. 1043. Transition activities.
The Mayor, in the discharge of the Mayor’s duties pursuant to section 422 of the District
of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 790; D.C. Official Code §
1-204.22), may:
(1) Make available to the Mayor-elect office space, furniture, furnishings, office
machines, and supplies, at whatever place or places within the District the Mayor shall designate,
at no cost to the Mayor-elect and their transition staff; and
(2) Make payments to the Mayor-elect to reimburse the Mayor-elect for payments
made, or to pay for costs incurred by the Mayor-elect, for the following:
12

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(A) Compensation for the transition staff of the Mayor-elect at a rate that
does not exceed the maximum salary set forth in the most recent non-union Excepted Service
salary schedule approved by the Council pursuant to section 1106 of the District of Columbia
Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-
139; D.C. Official Code § 1-611.06); except, that a person who holds a position in, or is
considered to be an employee of, the District government shall not receive compensation as a
member of the Mayor-elect’s transition staff under this subtitle;
(B) Reasonable expenses for the procurement by the Mayor-elect of
services of any expert or consultant, or organization thereof;
(C) Reasonable expenses incurred by the Mayor-elect for printing,
binding, and duplicating;
(D) Reasonable postage or mailing expenses incurred by the Mayor-elect
consistent with the Official Correspondence Regulations, effective April 7, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-
118; D.C. Official Code § 2-701 et seq.); and
(E) Reasonable expenses for communications equipment and services.
Sec. 1044. Limitation on amount.
The aggregate amount of payments made under section 1043 shall not exceed $300,000.
Sec. 1045. Reporting.
(a) The Mayor-elect shall file a report, to be prepared with appropriate supporting
documentation, accounting for the expenditure of funds pursuant to this subtitle.
(b) The report prepared pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be submitted to the
Council and the Chief Financial Officer by March 31, 2027.
SUBTITLE F. FAIR ELECTIONS PROGRAM
Sec. 1051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Fair Elections Program Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 1052. Section 332h(b)(2) of the Campaign Finance Act of 2011, effective May 5,
2018 (D.C. Law 22-94; D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.32h(b)(2)), is amended to read as follows:
“(2)(A) If a participating candidate’s certification is revoked pursuant to section
332c(c)(2), (3), or (4) or, due to fraudulent activities, section 332c(c)(5), the participating
candidate shall be personally liable for any expended base amount or matching payments.
“(B) Upon the application of a participating candidate, the Campaign
Finance Board may reduce in whole or in part the participating candidate’s personal liability
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; provided, that the participating candidate
13

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
terminated his or her candidacy for good cause not within the candidate’s control, such as health
reasons, and not due to the candidate’s low standing in polls, limited success in raising funds for
his or her candidacy, or low expectations of electoral success or similar electoral reasons, or for
political reasons, which shall not be considered good cause.
“(C) A candidate applying for relief under subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph shall provide sufficient documentation in support of the candidate’s claim
including medical records, financial statements, and any other documentation required by the
Office of Campaign Finance.”.
SUBTITLE G. PUBLIC LITTER CONTAINER REPLACEMENT
Sec. 1061. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Department of General Services Public Litter Container
Replacement Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1062. The Department of General Services Establishment Act of 2011, effective
September 14, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-21; D.C. Official Code § 10-551.01 et seq.), is amended by
adding a new section 1028j to read as follows:
“Sec. 1028j. Public litter container replacement.
“As part of the completion in Fiscal Year 2027 of a newly renovated or modernized
District of Columbia Public Schools facility or Department of Parks and Recreation-managed
property (“project property”), the Department shall procure publicly accessible and secure
rodent-resistant trash and recycling containers and install the containers on the site of, and in the
public space immediately abutting, the lot or square of the project property.”.
SUBTITLE H. OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FUND
Sec.1071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Office of the Attorney General Fund Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1072. Title I of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia Clarification and
Elected Term Amendment Act of 2010, effective May 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-160; D.C. Official
Code § 1-301.81 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 106b (D.C. Official Code § 1-301.86b) is amended as follows:
(1) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) For the purposes of this section, the terms “recovery” and “recoveries” shall
include funds obtained through court determinations or through the settlement of claims in which
the Office of the Attorney General represents the District but shall not include funds obtained
through an administrative proceeding or funds obligated to another source by federal law.”.
14

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b-1) of this section and the
limitations of subsection (d)(3) of this section, and notwithstanding any other provision of
District law, any recoveries from claims or litigation brought by the Office of the Attorney
General on behalf of the District shall be deposited into the Fund, regardless of whether the
amounts payable otherwise would have been required to be deposited into a different District
fund, except, that:
“(A) Recoveries under section 2(b)(2) of the Subrogation Fund
Establishment Act of 2018, effective July 3, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-122; D.C. Official Code § 1-
325.391(b)(2)), shall be deposited into the Subrogation Fund established by section 2(a) of the
Subrogation Fund Establishment Act of 2018, effective July 3, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-122; D.C.
Official Code § 1-325.391(a));
“(B) Recoveries under section 2332 of the District of Columbia
Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-
139; D.C. Official Code § 1-623.32), shall be deposited into the Employees’ Compensation Fund
established by section 2342 of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-
623.42(c));
“(C) Recoveries the Attorney General obtains as settlements or awards
that include restitution, disgorgement, damages, or other monetary relief for individuals or
entities for which the District is responsible for distribution, as well as any recoveries of related
costs of distribution and any other recoveries in such amounts as may be necessary to distribute
any monetary relief for individuals or entities for which the District is responsible for
distribution, shall be deposited into the Attorney General Restitution Fund established by section
106c;
“(D) Recoveries the Attorney General obtains from owners under section
506(j)(2) of the Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Properties Omnibus Amendment Act
of 2000, effective April 27, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-281; D.C. Official Code § 42-3651.06(j)(2)),
shall be deposited into the Tenant Receivership Abatement Fund established by section 106e;
except, that when the deposit of such funds into the Tenant Receivership Abatement Fund would
cause that fund’s balance to exceed $2 million, the excess of such funds shall be deposited in the
Fund; and
“(E) Recoveries under section 12a of the Drug-Related Nuisance
Abatement Act of 1998, effective April 4, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-81; D.C. Official Code § 42-
3111.01), shall be deposited into the Drug-, Firearm-, or Prostitution-Related Nuisance
Abatement Fund established by that section.”.
(B) Paragraph (5) is redesignated as paragraph (6).
15

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) The second paragraph (4) is redesignated as paragraph (5).
(3) A new subsection (b-1) is added to read as follows:
“(b-1)(1)(A) In any matter that a District of Columbia agency refers to the Attorney
General for enforcement after the agency has conducted a significant investigation or brought an
administrative enforcement action, or in any litigation or settlement in which a District of
Columbia agency has provided significant support to the Attorney General in proving a violation
of law, 50% of any recovery not specified in subsection (b)(1)(A) through (E) of this section
shall be deposited into the Fund and the other 50% shall be deposited into any special fund, that,
absent this section, would be required by law to receive recoveries for the claimed violation, or,
if such a fund does not exist, into the General Fund.
“(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the Attorney
General and either the Mayor when the agency is a subordinate agency, or the agency and the
Mayor when the agency is an independent agency, may agree on a different allocation of a
recovery not specified in subsection (b)(1)(A) through (E) of this section, and such recovery
shall be deposited into the Fund, any special fund established to receive recoveries for the
claimed violation, and the General Fund in accordance with the agreed allocation.
“(2)(A) In any matter litigated or settled by the Attorney General under section
815 of the District of Columbia Procurement Practices Act of 1985, effective May 8, 1998 (D.C.
Law 12-104; D.C. Official Code § 2-381.03), involving the funds of a District of Columbia
agency, 50% of any recovery shall be deposited into the Fund and the other 50% shall be
deposited into the General Fund.
“(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the Attorney
General and either the Mayor when the agency is a subordinate agency, or the agency and the
Mayor when the agency is an independent agency, may agree on a different allocation of the
recovery between the Fund and the General Fund.”.
(4) Subsection (c)(3) is repealed.
(5) Subsection (d)(3) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (C) is amended to read as follows:
“(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, amounts owed
to an outside counsel contractor that are part of recoveries obtained on behalf of the District by
the outside counsel contractor pursuant to a contingency fee contract shall be deposited into the
Fund and may remain in the Fund until paid to the outside counsel contractor to satisfy costs and
fees or transferred to another fund by the Office of the Attorney General to pay the outside
counsel contractor. Money deposited into the Fund that is owed to an outside counsel contractor
shall not count toward the $23.5 million limitation in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph or, to
the extent separately appropriated, toward any limit on the Office of the Attorney General’s
annual spending authority.”.
(B) Subparagraph (D) is redesignated as subsection (d-1).
16

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(6) Subsections (e), (f), and (g) are repealed.
(b) Section 106c (D.C. Official Code § 1-301.86c) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Recoveries the Attorney General obtains as settlements or awards that
include restitution, disgorgement, damages, or other monetary relief for individuals or entities for
which the District is responsible for distribution, as well as recoveries of any related costs of
distribution, and any other recoveries in such amounts as may be necessary to distribute any
monetary relief for individuals or entities for which the District is responsible for distribution;
and”.
(B) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
(2) Subsection (c)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) The payment of awards to individuals and entities as required by court
orders, judgments, or settlements in actions or investigations OAG conducts;”.
(3) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Before OAG authorizes any payments from the Fund in excess of $100 to an
individual or entity under this section, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall determine
whether the individual or entity owes any amount to the District and deduct the amount owed
from the award to the individual or entity, if any.”.
(4) Subsection (e) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(i) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the word “person” and
inserting the phrase “individual or entity” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the word
“individuals” and inserting the phrase “individuals and entities” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) If not otherwise directed by the court order, judgment, or settlement, OAG
may apply any part of the award to the costs and expenses related to maintaining the Fund and
conducting the claims process under subsection (c)(2) of this section, including payments to
claims administrators.”.
(C) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(i) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the word
“individuals” and inserting the phrase “individuals or entities in the court or administrative order,
judgment, or settlement” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the figure “$500,000”
and inserting the figure “$1 million” in its place.
(5) A new subsection (i) is added to read as follows:
17

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i) All assets and liabilities of the Vulnerable Adult and Elderly Person Exploitation
Restitution Fund are transferred to the Fund.”.
(c) Section 106d (D.C. Official Code § 1-301.86d) is repealed.
Sec. 1073. Section 1043(a-4) of the Delinquent Debt Recovery Act of 2012, effective
September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168; D.C. Official Code § 1-350.02(a-4)), is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Funds collected by the Central Collection Unit arising out of delinquent debts
associated with settlements and judgments that are transferred or referred to the Central
Collection Unit by the Office of the Attorney General for collection and that are eligible for
deposit into the Litigation Support Fund pursuant to section 106b of the Attorney General for the
District of Columbia Clarification and Elected Term Amendment Act of 2010, effective October
22, 2015 (D.C. Law 21-36; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.86b), shall be deposited into the
Litigation Support Fund, net of costs and fees, within 60 days; and”.
(b) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the word “restitution” and insert the phrase “restitution, disgorgement,
damages, or other monetary relief for individuals or entities for which the District is responsible
for distribution” in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “; and” and insert a period in its place.
(c) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
SUBTITLE I. OIG OVERSIGHT CLARIFICATION
Sec. 1081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Office of Inspector General Oversight Clarification
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1082. Section 2214(f) of the District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995,
approved April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321-132; D.C. Official Code § 38-1802.14(f)), is amended
as follows:
(a) Strike the phrase “Audit. —” and insert the phrase “Audits, inspections, and
investigations. —” in its place.
(b) Strike the phrase “Columbia.” and insert the phrase “Columbia. The Inspector
General of the District of Columbia may conduct oversight of the Board and related activities,
including audits, inspections, and investigations, in accordance with the authority granted by, and
subject to the limitations set forth in, section 208 of the District of Columbia Procurement
Practices Act of 1985, effective February 21, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-85; D.C. Official Code § 1-
301.115a).” in its place.
18

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE J. GRANT CONFIDENTIALITY REQUIREMENTS
Sec. 1091. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Grant Confidentiality Requirements Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1092. The Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C.
Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 1092 (D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11) is amended by adding a new paragraph
(1A) to read as follows:
“(1A) “Confidential information” means:
“(A) Individually identifying information of a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or human trafficking, such as first and last name, home or other physical address,
contact information, social security number, driver’s license number, passport number, student
identification number, and date of birth; and
“(B) Information exchanged between a victim and a domestic violence
counselor during the course of the counselor providing counseling, support, and assistance to a
victim, including all records kept by the counselor and the domestic violence service provider
concerning services provided to the victim.”.
(b) Section 1095 (D.C. Official Code § 1-328.14) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(2) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b)(1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a grantee who
receives local funds to support domestic violence programs, sexual assault programs, or human
trafficking programs shall not be required to release confidential information.
“(2) If release of confidential information is compelled by statutory or court
mandate, the grantee shall:
“(A) Make reasonable attempts to provide notice to victims of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or human trafficking affected by the disclosure of the confidential
information; and
“(B) Take steps necessary to protect the privacy and safety of the persons
affected by the release of the confidential information.
“(3) Grantees who receive local funds to support domestic violence programs,
sexual assault programs, or human trafficking programs shall provide:
“(A) Nonpersonally identifying data in the aggregate regarding services to
their clients and nonpersonally identifying demographic information in order to comply with
reporting, evaluation, or data collection requirements contained in the grant agreement; and
19

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Nonpersonally identifying and non-confidential records for the
purposes of an audit to the grantor, the Inspector General of the District of Columbia, the District
of Columbia Auditor, and the Comptroller General of the United States, or any of their duty
authorized representatives, only to the extent necessary to validate reports that were submitted by
the grantee or subgrantee.”.
SUBTITLE K. LGBTQ COMMUNITY GRANT
Sec. 1101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “LGBTQ Community Grant Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1102. The Office of Gay, Lesbian, Bisexual and Transgender Affairs Act of 2006,
effective April 4, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-89; D.C. Official Code § 2-1381 et seq.), is amended by
adding a new section 4c to read as follows:
“Sec. 4c. OLGBTQ grant program.
“(a) The Office shall issue a $980,000 grant in Fiscal Year 2027 to a grantee for the
purpose of supporting programs that promote the welfare of the lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, and questioning community; provided, that:
“(1) The grantee is a nonprofit organization and its primary mission is to provide
philanthropic funding to the community;
“(2) The grantee has a proven track record of success in grant making and
fundraising;
“(3) The grantee agrees to use 90% of the grant to award subgrants to other
nonprofit organizations that provide programs for the community in accordance with the terms of
this section and rules established by the Office, with the advice of the Advisory Committee,
pursuant to section 3(e);
“(4) The grantee agrees to undergo an annual audit and submit quarterly reports to
the Office on its financial health and its use of the grant;
“(5) The grantee provides grantmaking, technical assistance, and capacity-building
support to community-based organizations; and
“(6) The grantee may use the remaining balance of the grant to cover
administrative or other fees incurred by the grantee.
“(b) The Office shall submit to the Council and make publicly available an annual status
report for all grants issued by, or on behalf of, the Office in the previous fiscal year, which shall
include, for each grant:
“(1) Detailed information about the grantee and any subgrantees;
“(2) A description of the specific services provided to the community;
“(3) The name of the entity providing the services, if not the grantee;
20

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) The location of services and demographic profile of service recipients; and
“(5) The amount of grant funds dedicated to program costs, the amount dedicated
to other expenditures, and total amount contributed by private funding.”.
SUBTITLE L. OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL TERM SUCCESSION
CLARIFICATION ACT
Sec. 1111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Office of Inspector General Term Succession
Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 1112. Section 208(a)(1)(A-i) of the District of Columbia Procurement Practices Act
of 1985, effective February 21, 1986, (D.C. Law 6-85; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.115a(a)(1)(A-
i)), is amended to read as follows:
“(A-i)(i) Immediately upon the expiration of the term of the Inspector
General, the Principal Deputy Inspector General (including any acting Principal Deputy
Inspector General), shall serve as acting Inspector General until a new Inspector General is
confirmed by the Council pursuant to section 2 of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March
3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01).
“(ii) If a vacancy in the position of Inspector General occurs as a
consequence of resignation, disability, death, or a reason other than the expiration of the term of
the Inspector General, the Mayor shall appoint a replacement to fill the unexpired term in the
same manner provided in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph; provided, that the Mayor shall
submit the nomination to the Council within 30 days after the occurrence of the vacancy. A
person appointed to fill the unexpired term shall serve only for the remainder of the term.”.
Sec. 1113. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of May 19, 2026.
TITLE II. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND REGULATION
SUBTITLE A. DOWNTOWN BUILDING CONVERSIONS
Sec. 2001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Downtown Building Conversion Support Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2002. Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
21

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“47-870.01a. Central Washington activation projects— temporary tax abatement – First
Source exemptions.”.
(b) Section 47-860.02(a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
“(3) The affordable housing units are designed and administered in accordance
with the requirements of the Inclusionary Zoning Program; provided, that if the project is located
on real property that is not otherwise subject to the Inclusionary Zoning Program, then for the
purposes of both the affordable and market rate housing units provided pursuant to this
paragraph, the term “bedroom” as used in the Inclusionary Zoning Program shall include a
habitable room that:
“(A) Has a closet;
“(B) Is designated as a “bedroom” or “sleeping room” on construction
plans approved for a building permit; and
“(C) Receives natural light and ventilation in accordance with the relevant
construction code, regardless of whether the room has immediate access to an exterior window.”.
(2) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “construction and operations”
and inserting the word “construction” in its place.
(c) Section 47-860.03(a)(2)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “effect. A property” and
inserting the phrase “effect. Upon transmission of the letter of termination to the Office of Tax
and Revenue, the Office of Tax and Revenue shall assess and collect any tax benefits improperly
received during any period of ineligibility, in addition to interest, as provided by law. Amounts
recaptured under this subparagraph, including interest, shall be deposited into the General Fund
of the District. A property” in its place.
(d) Section 47-870(3)(A) is amended to read as follows:
“(3)(A) “Repositioning” means the construction or substantial improvement of a
property that results in the conversion of the property from a primarily non-residential use to a
new non-residential use or that results in an upgrade of a primarily office use to class A or higher
from a class below class A and the conversion or upgrade of the property results in the property
being expanded to 50,000 square feet or more.”.
(e) Section 47-870.01 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(2)(F) is amended by striking the phrase “within such a period
of time as the Mayor may set forth in the eligibility and reservation letter” and inserting the
phrase “for failure to comply with any condition set forth in the eligibility and reservation letter”
in its place.
(2) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “2025 and 2026” and
inserting the phrase “2025, 2026, and 2027” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
22

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the figure “$6 million” and
inserting the figure “$2.75 million” in its place.
(D) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “$8 million; and” and
inserting the phrase “$3.55 million;” in its place.
(E) Paragraph (5) is amended to read as follows:
“(5) For real property tax year 2030, $4.05 million; and”.
(F) A new paragraph (6) is added to read as follows:
“(6) For real property tax year 2031 and each subsequent real property tax year,
104% of the prior real property tax year’s cap.”.
(3) A new subsection (f-1) is added to read as follows:
“(f-1)(1) A property shall cease to receive a tax abatement under this section if, during
the period of the tax abatement, the Mayor determines that the property is no longer eligible for
the abatement. If the Mayor makes such a determination, the Mayor shall transmit to the property
owner and the Office of Tax and Revenue a letter of termination, setting forth the reason for the
termination and the date on which the termination took, or shall take, effect. Upon transmission
of the letter of termination to the Office of Tax and Revenue, the Office of Tax and Revenue
shall assess and collect any tax benefits improperly received during any period of ineligibility, in
addition to interest as provided by law. Amounts recaptured under this paragraph, including
interest, shall be deposited into the General Fund of the District.
“(2) A property shall no longer be eligible to receive a tax abatement under this
section if it is not in compliance with any condition set forth in the certification letter issued by
the Mayor pursuant to subsection (a)(2)(E) of this section or for any reason set forth by the
Mayor by rule.
“(3) If the Mayor determines that a property is no longer eligible for the
abatement, the Mayor may, in the Mayor’s sole discretion, provide the property owner a period
to cure the property’s ineligibility. If during the period to cure, the owner cures the property’s
ineligibility, the Mayor may restore the tax abatement; provided, that the tax abatement shall not
be provided for the period during which the property was ineligible, and the period of cure shall
not toll the 15-year period set forth in subsection (c) of this section.
“(4) If the Mayor restores a tax abatement pursuant to paragraph (3) of this
subsection, the Mayor shall transmit a letter of restoration to the property owner and the Office
of Tax and Revenue, setting forth the date on which the restoration took, or shall take, effect.”.
(f) A new section 47-870.01a is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-870.01a. Central Washington activation projects— temporary tax abatement – First
Source exemption.
“(a) A property for which the Mayor has approved a tax abatement under § 47-870.01
shall not, based on the approval and receipt of the tax abatement, be required to enter into a First
Source Agreement as to the construction and development phases of the project.
23

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b) For the purposes of this section, the term “First Source Agreement” means an
agreement with the Department of Employment Services entered into pursuant to § 2-219.03 and
Mayor’s Order 83-265, dated November 9, 1983, governing certain obligations regarding job
creation and employment.”.
Sec. 2003. Section 101.1(a-1)(2) of Title 12-M of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (12-M DCMR § 101.1(a-1)(2)) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) The Building Conversion Permit Fee set forth in subparagraph (1) of this
paragraph shall be utilized to calculate the permit fee for:
“(A) A construction project involving a change of use and occupancy for a
building from any non-residential category to Residential Group R-2, as defined by the
Construction Codes, and
“(B) A construction project that the Mayor has selected for a tax
abatement under D.C. Official Code § 47-870.01.”.
SUBTITLE B. RENT PAYMENT REPORTING PROGRAM
Sec. 2011. Short title
This subtitle may be cited as the “Rent Payment Reporting Emergency Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 2012. The Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10;
D.C. Official Code § 42-3501.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new designation for Title V-C to read as
follows:
“TITLE V-C. RENT PAYMENT REPORTING PROGRAM
“Sec. 541. Rental payment reporting program.
(b) A new Title V-C is added to read as follows:
“TITLE V-C
“RENT PAYMENT REPORTING PROGRAM
“Sec. 541. Rent payment reporting program.
“(a) The Mayor may establish and administer a rent payment reporting program
(“program”) under which a rental housing provider shall offer a tenant the option to report the
tenant’s rent payments, to one or more credit reporting agencies, as that term is defined in D.C.
Official Code § 28-3861(3).
“(b)(1) The program shall allow for a tenant who had previously agreed to participate in
the program to withdraw at any time.
“(2) A rental housing provider shall comply with a tenant’s request to stop rent
payment reporting within 30 days after receiving the request.
24

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) A tenant who elects to withdraw from the program shall not be allowed to opt
back in to the program again for a period of 6 months after the tenant withdraws from the
program.
“(4) If a tenant provides the rental housing provider with written notice that the
tenant intends to withhold the payment of rent for a rental housing provider’s failure to maintain
a unit in a condition consistent with the implied warranty of habitability and with Titles 12 and
14 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, or substantially similar subsequent
regulations, the rental housing provider shall cease rent payment reporting until the tenant
resumes making rental payments.
“(c) A rental housing provider’s offer to a tenant to report rent payments pursuant to the
program shall include a written notice to tenants that contains:
“(1) A statement that reporting of the tenant’s rent payments is optional;
“(2) Identification of each credit reporting agency to which rent payments will be
reported;
“(3) A statement describing which rent payments will be reported, and the
circumstances under which payments are considered timely, late, or missed;
“(4) A statement that the tenant may elect to stop rent payment reporting at any
time with instructions to the tenant on how to opt out and a disclaimer that the tenant cannot elect
to resume participation in the program for at least 6 months after the tenant withdraws from the
program; and
“(5) A signature block that the tenant shall date and sign in order to accept the
offer of rent payment reporting.
“(d) The Mayor may require a rental housing provider that receives a grant, loan, tax
abatement, or other financial support (collectively, “financial assistance”) from the District to, as
a condition of the financial assistance:
“(1) Participate in the program;
“(2) Participate in a third-party rent payment reporting program approved by
the Mayor; or
“(3) Provide information on their tenants’ rent payments to credit reporting
agencies, subject to each tenant’s consent.
“(e)(1) The Mayor may issue grants to rental housing providers who participate in the
program to pay the costs of set-up fees for reporting rent payments to credit reporting agencies,
annual fees for reporting rent payments to credit reporting agencies, technical assistance for
credit reporting agencies, and fees for pulling credit reports.
“(2) The requirements of the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), shall not apply to
grants issued under this subsection.
25

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(f) Within 90 days after the establishment of the program, the Department of Housing
and Community Development (“Department”) shall develop and publish a standardized notice
template for use by rental housing providers. A rental housing provider that uses the
Department’s standardized notice template shall be presumed to be in compliance with the notice
requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
“(g) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue
rules to implement this section.”.
SUBTITLE C. WORKFORCE HOUSING OPPORTUNITY TAX ABATEMENT
Sec. 2021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Workforce Housing Opportunity Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2022. Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-860a. Workforce housing opportunity tax abatement.”.
(b) A new section 47-860a is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-860a. Workforce housing opportunity tax abatement.
“(a) Real property tax imposed by § 47-811 on real property certified as eligible pursuant
to subsection (f) of this section shall be abated each year during the period set forth in subsection
(e) of this section, by the amount certified by the Mayor for that year; provided, that:
“(1) The developer provides a fiscal analysis prepared by a third-party showing
the amount of abatement required for the feasibility of the project;
“(2) The real property is developed with at least 30 housing units;
“(3) For the duration of the period set forth in subsection (e) of this section, at
least 20% of the housing units developed or redeveloped on the real property are maintained as
affordable to households earning 80% or less of the median family income and at least 20% of
the housing units are maintained as affordable to households earning 80% to 100% of the median
family income;
“(4) The developer files a covenant in the land records of the District, binding on
the developer and all of its successors in interest with respect to the property, covenanting to
comply with the requirements of paragraph (3) of this subsection;
“(5) The developer enters into an agreement with the District that requires the
developer to, at a minimum, contract with certified business enterprises for at least 35% of the
26

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
contract dollar volume of the construction and operations of the project, in accordance with § 2-
218.46;
“(6) The developer enters into a First Source Agreement for the construction,
development, and operations of the project; and
“(7) The developer enters into an agreement with the Mayor setting forth the
requirements of this subsection and such other terms and conditions as the Mayor considers
appropriate.
“(b) The total amount of the tax abatements certified by the Mayor pursuant to this
subsection (the “maximum fiscal year abatement amount”) shall not exceed:
“(1) $4 million in Fiscal Year 2029;
“(2) $5 million in Fiscal Year 2030;
“(3) $6 million in Fiscal Year 2031; and
“(4) In Fiscal Year 2032 and each subsequent fiscal year, an amount equal to
105% of the prior year’s maximum fiscal year abatement amount.
“(c) The amount of the tax abatement certified by the Mayor for an individual abatement
shall be no greater than the amount needed for the feasibility of the project, as demonstrated by
an independent financial analysis, and shall not exceed the total amount of residential taxes due
for any year during the term of the abatement.
“(d)A tax abatement certified by the Mayor under this section shall begin on the first day
of the tax year immediately following the tax year when the certificate of occupancy was issued
for the final housing unit counted toward satisfying the affordability requirement of subsection
(a)(3) of this section; provided, that a tax abatement provided pursuant to this section shall not
begin before October 1, 2028.
“(e) A tax abatement certified by the Mayor under this section shall continue until the end
of the 10th tax year after the tax year during which the abatement begins pursuant to subsection
(d) of this section; except, that the tax abatement provided for by this section may continue until
the end of the 20th tax year after the tax year during which the abatement begins pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section if the Mayor determines that the abatement is necessary for the
feasibility of the project;
“(f)(1) The Mayor may, through a competitive process, certify to the Office of Tax and
Revenue a real property’s eligibility to receive the tax abatement provided by this section;
provided, that the Mayor shall prioritize real property that is sold, conveyed, leased, or disposed
of by the District pursuant to § 10-801 et seq.
“(2) The Mayor’s certification shall include:
“(A) A description of the real property certified to receive the tax
abatement by street address, square, suffix, and lot;
“(B) The date the tax abatement begins and ends under subsection (e) of
this section;
27

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(C) The annual amount of tax abatement allocated to the property
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section;
“(D) A statement that the conditions specified in subsection (a) of this
section have been satisfied; and
“(E) Any other information that the Mayor considers necessary or
appropriate.
“(3) If at any time the Mayor determines that the real property has become
ineligible for the abatement provided by this section, the Mayor shall notify the Office of Tax
and Revenue and shall specify the date that the property became ineligible. The real property
shall be ineligible for the abatement on the first day of the tax year following the date when the
ineligibility occurred.
“(g) The tax abatement provided by this section shall be in addition to, not in lieu of, any
other tax relief or assistance from any other source.
“(h) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Certified business enterprise” means a local business enterprise certified
pursuant to Part D of Subchapter IX-A of Chapter 2 of Title 2.
“(2) “Developer” means the owner of housing units on real property eligible for a
tax abatement under this section.
“(3) “First Source Agreement” means an agreement with the District governing
certain obligations of the developer pursuant to § 2-219.03, and Mayor’s Order 83-265, dated
November 9, 1983, regarding job creation and employment.
“(4) “Median family income” has the meaning set forth in § 6-1041.01(5).
“(i) The Mayor, pursuant to § 2-501 et seq., may issue rules to implement this section.”.
SUBTITLE D. DEVELOPMENT OF FORMER FEDERAL PROPERTIES
Sec. 2031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Federal Property Development Tax Incentive
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2032. Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-861.05. Federal property tax abatements.”.
(b) A new section 47-861.05 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-861.05. Federal property tax abatements.
“(a) The real property tax imposed by § 47-811 on real property certified as eligible
pursuant to subsection (e) of this section may be abated each year during the period of years
28

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
determined by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, by the amount determined by
the Mayor for that year; provided, that:
“(1) The real property is:
“(A) A property that:
“(i) Is owned by the District;
“(ii) Was owned by the federal government immediately prior to
its ownership by the District;
“(iii) Was disposed by the federal government to the District after
January 1, 2026;
“(iv) Is ground leased to a private entity by the District pursuant to
a ground lease and development agreement;
“(v) Is developed pursuant to the ground lease and development
agreement with a project that has 200,000 square feet or more in gross floor area;
“(vi) Was not subject to tax under §§ 47-811 or 47-1005.01
immediately prior to being ground leased by the District government; and
“(vii) Continues to be subject to the ground lease and development
agreement;
“(B) A property that:
“(i) Was owned by the District;
“(ii) Was owned by the federal government immediately prior to
its ownership by the District;
“(iii) Was disposed by the federal government to the District after
January 1, 2026;
“(iv) Was disposed of by the District pursuant to a sale and
development agreement between the District and a private entity;
“(v) Is developed pursuant to the sale and development agreement
with a project that has 200,000 square feet or more in gross floor area;
“(vi) Was not subject to tax under §§ 47-811 or 47-1005.01 while
owned by the District government or federal government; and
“(vii) Continues to be subject to the sale and development
agreement;
“(C) A property that:
“(i) Was owned by the federal government;
“(ii) Was disposed of by the federal government to a private entity
after January 1, 2026, pursuant to a sale and development agreement between the federal
government and the private entity;
“(iii) Is developed pursuant to the sale and development agreement
with a project that has 200,000 square feet or more in gross floor area;
29

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(iv) Was not subject to tax under §§ 47-811 or 47-1005.01 while
owned by the federal government; and
“(v) Continues to be subject to the sale and development
agreement; or
“(D) A property that:
“(i) Is owned by the federal government;
“(ii) Is ground leased by the federal government to a private entity
after January 1, 2026, pursuant to a ground lease and development agreement between the
federal government and the private entity;
“(iii) Is developed pursuant to the ground lease and development
agreement with a project that has 200,000 square feet or more in gross floor area;
“(iv) Was not subject to tax under §§ 47-811 or 47-1005.01 while
owned by the federal government; and
“(v) Continues to be subject to the ground lease and development
agreement;
“(2) The owner or ground lessee of the real property enters into an agreement with
the District that:
“(A) Requires the developer to, at a minimum:
“(i) Contract with certified business enterprises for at least 35% of
the contract dollar volume of the construction and development of the project, in accordance
with § 2-218.46;
“(ii) Enter into a First Source Agreement for the construction and
development of the project;
“(iii) For the duration of the period set forth in subsection (c) of
this section, maintain at least 10% of the housing units developed or redeveloped on the real
property as affordable to households earning on average 60% or less of the median family
income;
“(iv) For the duration of the period set forth in subsection (c) of
this section, ensure that at least 10% of the housing units offered for sale are affordable to
households earning on average 80% or less of the median family income;
“(v) File a covenant in the land records of the District, binding on
the owner and all of its successors, covenanting to comply with the requirements of sub-
subparagraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subparagraph, and any additional terms included in the
covenant related to the design and administration of the housing units required by the Mayor by
rule; and
“(B) Sets forth such other terms and conditions as the Mayor considers
appropriate;
30

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) The project to be developed on the real property is one of special merit as
determined by the Mayor; and
“(4) The owner or ground lessee demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Mayor:
“(A) That a tax abatement is necessary for the project to be financially
feasible;
“(B) The amount of the tax abatement necessary for the project to be
financially feasible; and
“(C) An ability to complete the project in a timely manner.
“(b) The tax abatement provided for by this section shall last for up to 15 consecutive real
property tax years beginning in the tax year commencing after the tax year in which the
certificate of occupancy was issued for the development on the property.
“(c) The number of years and annual amount of the tax abatement provided under this
section shall be the number and amount, as determined in the sole discretion of the Mayor,
subject to subsection (b) of this section, necessary for the project to be financially feasible and to
be timely initiated and continued to completion by the owner or ground lessee of the real
property.
“(d) If, 5 years after the District and the owner or ground lessee enter into the agreement
required by subsection (a)(2) of this section, the owner or ground lessee has not made substantial
progress in developing the project, as determined by the Mayor, the Mayor may terminate the
agreement and rescind the project’s eligibility for a tax abatement under this section.
“(e)(1) The Mayor shall certify to the Office of Tax and Revenue a real property’s
eligibility for the abatement provided by this section. The Mayor’s certification shall include:
“(A) A description of the real property by street address, square, suffix,
and lot;
“(B) The date the certificate of occupancy was issued;
“(C) The date the tax abatement begins and ends under subsections (b) and
(c) of this section;
“(D) A statement that the conditions specified in subsection (a) of this
section have been satisfied;
“(E) The annual amount of the abatement as determined by the Mayor
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section; and
“(F) Any other information that the Mayor considers necessary or
appropriate.
“(2) If at any time the Mayor determines that the real property has become
ineligible for the abatement provided by this section, the Mayor shall notify the Office of Tax
and Revenue and shall specify the date that the property became ineligible. The property shall
cease to receive the abatement on the first day of the tax year following the date when the
property became ineligible.
31

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(f) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Certified business enterprise” means a local business enterprise certified
pursuant to Part D of Subchapter IX-A of Chapter 2 of Title 2.
“(2) “Developer” means the owner or ground lessee of real property eligible for a
tax abatement under this section.
“(3) “First Source Agreement” means an agreement with the District governing
certain obligations of the developer pursuant to § 2-219.03, and Mayor’s Order 83-265, dated
November 9, 1983, regarding job creation and employment.
“(4) “Special merit” means, with respect to a project under this section, providing
significant benefits to the District or to the community in which the project is located by virtue
of:
“(A) Providing a significant number of housing units or a substantial
square footage of neighborhood-serving or regional retail;
“(B) Historical designation of the site on or building in which the project
is located;
“(C) Complexity of the development; or
“(D) Social or other benefits having a high priority in the District or the
community within which the project is to be located.
“(g) The Mayor, pursuant to § 2-501 et seq., may issue rules to implement the provisions
of this section.”.
SUBTITLE E. WMATA JOINT DEVELOPMENT PROPERTIES
Sec. 2041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “WMATA Joint Development Properties Tax
Abatement Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2042. Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-861.06. Compact agency joint development tax abatements.”.
(b) A new section 47-861.06 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-861.06. Compact agency joint development tax abatements.
“(a) The real property tax imposed by § 47-811 on real property certified as eligible
pursuant to subsection (e) of this section may be abated each year during the period of years
32

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
determined by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, by the amount determined by
the Mayor for that year; provided, that:
“(1) The real property is:
“(A) A property that:
“(i) Is currently, or was previously, owned by a Compact Agency
and is currently, or was previously, subject to a joint development agreement with a Compact
Agency; and
“(ii) Is located at an eligible Compact Agency joint development
site;
“(2) The third-party owner or ground lessee of the real property enters into an
agreement with the District that:
“(A) Requires the developer to, at a minimum:
“(i) Contract with certified business enterprises for at least 35% of
the contract dollar volume of the construction and development of the private development
components of the project, in accordance with § 2-218.46;
“(ii) Enter into a First Source Agreement for the construction and
development of the private development components of the project;
“(iii) For the duration of the period set forth in subsection (c) of
this section, maintain at least 10% of the housing units developed or redeveloped on the real
property as affordable to households earning on average 60% or less of the median family
income; and
“(iv) For the duration of the period set forth in subsection (c) of
this section, ensure that at least 10% of the housing units offered for sale must be affordable to
households earning on average 80% or less of the median family income; and
“(B) Sets forth such other terms and conditions as the Mayor considers
appropriate;
“(3) The project to be developed on the real property is one of special merit as
determined by the Mayor; and
“(4) The owner or ground lessee demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Mayor:
“(A) That a tax abatement is necessary for the project to be financially
feasible;
“(B) The amount of the tax abatement necessary for the project to be
financially feasible; and
“(C) An ability to complete the project in a timely manner.
“(b) The tax abatement provided for by this section shall last for up to 20 consecutive real
property tax years beginning in the tax year commencing after the tax year in which the
certificate of occupancy was issued for the development on the property.
33

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) The number of years and annual amount of the tax abatement provided under this
section shall be the number and amount, as determined in the sole discretion of the Mayor,
subject to subsection (b) of this section, necessary for the project to be financially feasible and to
be timely initiated and continued to completion by the owner or ground lessee of the real
property.
“(d) If, 5 years after the District and the owner or ground lessee enter into the agreement
required by subsection (a)(2) of this section, the owner or ground lessee has not made substantial
progress in developing the project, as determined by the Mayor, the Mayor may terminate the
agreement and rescind the project’s eligibility for a tax abatement under this section.
“(e)(1) The Mayor shall certify to the Office of Tax and Revenue a real property’s
eligibility for the abatement provided by this section. The Mayor’s certification shall include:
“(A) A description of the real property by street address, square, suffix,
and lot;
“(B) The date the certificate of occupancy was issued;
“(C) The date the tax abatement begins and ends under subsections (b) and
(c) of this section;
“(D) A statement that the conditions specified in subsection (a) of this
section have been satisfied;
“(E) The annual amount of the abatement as determined by the Mayor
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section; and
“(F) Any other information that the Mayor considers necessary or
appropriate.
“(2) If at any time the Mayor determines that the real property has become
ineligible for the abatement provided by this section, the Mayor shall notify the Office of Tax
and Revenue and shall specify the date that the property became ineligible. The property shall be
ineligible for the abatement on the first day of the tax year following the date when the
ineligibility occurred.
“(f) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Certified business enterprise” means a local business enterprise certified
pursuant to Part D of Subchapter IX-A of Chapter 2 of Title 2.
“(2) “Compact Agency” means the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
Authority.
“(3) “Developer” means the owner or ground lessee of real property eligible for a
tax abatement under this section.
“(4) “Eligible Compact Agency joint development site” means a site located on
property currently or previously owned by a Compact Agency and within 1,750 feet of a
Metrorail station.
34

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(5) “First Source Agreement” means an agreement with the District governing
certain obligations of the developer pursuant to § 2-219.03, and Mayor’s Order 83-265, dated
November 9, 1983, regarding job creation and employment.
“(6) “Joint development agreement” means a contract between a Compact Agency
and a third party to sell or ground lease Compact Agency property for development.
“(7) “Private development components” means construction and development
aspects of a project that are not transit-related infrastructure delivered in coordination with
WMATA.
“(8) “Special merit” means, with respect to a project under this section, providing
significant benefits to the District or to the community in which the project is located by virtue
of:
“(A) Providing a significant number of housing units or a substantial
square footage of neighborhood-serving or regional retail;
“(B) Historical designation of the site on or building in which the project
is located;
“(C) Complexity of the development; or
“(D) Social or other benefits having a high priority in the District or the
community within which the project is to be located.
“(g) The Mayor, pursuant to § 2-501 et seq., may issue rules to implement the provisions
of this section.”.
SUBTITLE F. ROSEMOUNT CENTER GRANT
Sec. 2051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Rosemount Center Grant Emergency Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 2052. Section 2032(pp) of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C.
Law 19-168; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04(pp)), is amended by adding a new paragraph (3) to
read as follows:
“(3) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2027, the
Deputy Mayor shall award a grant of $1 million to the Center to support the Center’s purchase of
the real property the Center currently leases, located at 2000 Rosemount Avenue, NW.”.
SUBTITLE G. SUPERMARKET TAX INCENTIVE
Sec. 2061. Short title.
35

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Supermarket Tax Incentive Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2062. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-1002(23) is amended to read as follows:
“(23)(A) Subject to the provisions of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a
qualified supermarket, as defined in § 47-3801(2), that is a development, as defined in § 47-
3801(1), or that experienced hardship, as described in § 47-3802(a)(2).
“(B) The real property tax exemption granted by subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph shall apply only:
“(i)(I) For qualified supermarket developments that have been
certified for an exemption pursuant to Chapter 38 of this title before October 1, 2026, for 10
consecutive real property tax years beginning with the real property tax year in which a
certificate of occupancy was issued for the development;
“(II) For qualified supermarket developments that have
been certified for an exemption pursuant to Chapter 38 of this title on or after October 1, 2026,
for 5 consecutive real property tax years beginning with either the real property tax year in which
a certificate of occupancy was issued for the development or the real property tax year in which
the Mayor certifies to the Office of Tax and Revenue that the development has made eligible
improvements, as defined in § 47-3801(1)(C); and
“(III) For qualified supermarkets that experienced hardship,
for 5 consecutive real property tax years beginning with the real property tax year in which the
Mayor certifies to the Office of Tax and Revenue that the qualified supermarket experienced
such hardship;
“(ii) For additional tax years as extended by the Mayor pursuant to
§ 47-3802;
“(iii) During the time that the real property is used as a
supermarket;
“(iv) In the case of a qualified supermarket located on real property
not owned by the supermarket, if the owner of the real property leases the land or structure to the
supermarket at a fair market rent reduced by the amount of the real property tax exemption; and
“(v) During the time that the supermarket is in compliance with the
requirements of Subchapter X of Chapter 2 of Title 2;”.
(b) Section 47-1508(a) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the word “act” and inserting the
word “chapter” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (9) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
36

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(9)(A) The personal property of a qualified supermarket, as defined in § 47-
3801(2), as follows:
“(i)(I) In the case of a qualified supermarket that is a development,
as defined in § 47-3801(1), that is certified for the exemption pursuant to Chapter 38 of this title
before October 1, 2026, for the first 10 years for which the tax imposed by this chapter would
otherwise be due;
“(II) In the case of a qualified supermarket that is a
development, as defined in § 47-3801(1), that is certified for the exemption pursuant to Chapter
38 of this title on or after October 1, 2026, for the first 5 years for which the tax imposed by this
chapter would otherwise be due; and
“(III) In the case of a qualified supermarket that
experienced hardship, as described in § 47-3802(a)(2), for 5 consecutive personal property tax
years beginning with the personal property tax year in which the Mayor certifies to the Office of
Tax and Revenue that the qualified supermarket has experienced such hardship; and
“(ii) For any additional tax years as extended by the Mayor
pursuant to § 47-3802.”.
(B) Subparagraph (B)(ii) is amended by striking the phrase “the
development of a qualified supermarket” and inserting the phrase “a qualified supermarket
located” in its place.
(c) Chapter 38 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-3801 is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) “Development” means:
“(A) The new construction of a qualified supermarket for which building
permits are issued on or after October 4, 2000;
“(B) The rehabilitation of a qualified supermarket for which building
permits are issued on or after October 4, 2000, and before October 1, 2026. For the purposes of
this subparagraph, the term “rehabilitation” means a capital investment within any 24-month
period in a qualified supermarket that exceeds 50% of the adjusted basis of the building as
calculated for District income tax purposes; or
“(C) The improvement of a qualified supermarket for which building
permits are issued on or after October 1, 2026. For the purposes of this subparagraph,
“improvement” means a capital investment within any 24-month period in the qualified
supermarket that exceeds 10% of the current assessed value of the building space being leased or
owned for the qualified supermarket, exclusive of parking.”.
(B) A new paragraph (1E) is added to read as follows:
“(1E) “Hardship” means operating at a net loss for a tax year, as demonstrated on
a profit and loss statement.”.
37

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) Paragraph (3)(A)(i) is amended to read as follows:
“(i) Holds a food service license with a “grocery store” notation;”.
(2) Section 47-3802 is amended as follows:
(A) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) The development of a qualified supermarket shall be eligible for:
“(A) A 5-year or 10-year real property tax exemption as provided in § 47-
1002(23);
“(B) An exemption from the license fee under § 47-2851.04 for:
“(i) Ten years, if the exemption has been certified pursuant to this
title before October 1, 2026; or
“(ii) Five years, if the exemption has been certified pursuant to this
title on or after October 1, 2026;
“(C) A 5-year or 10-year personal property tax exemption as provided
under § 47-1508(a)(9); and
“(D) A sales and use tax exemption under § 47-2005(28) on the purchase
of all building materials related to the development of the qualified supermarket.
“(2) A qualified supermarket that experienced hardship in each of the 2 tax years
prior to the supermarket’s request for certification of eligibility for the exemption shall be
eligible for:
“(A) A 5-year real property tax exemption as provided in § 47-1002(23);
“(B) A 5-year exemption from the license fee under § 47-2851.04; and
“(C) A 5-year personal property tax exemption as provided under § 47-
1508(a)(9).”.
(B) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a qualified” and inserting the phrase “A qualified” in
its place.
(C) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(i) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “eligibility for
the exemption.” and inserting the phrase “eligibility for the exemption. In the case of an
applicant seeking an exemption as a qualifying supermarket that experienced hardship, the
application shall include a profit and loss statement for the supermarket for the previous 2 tax
years.” in its place.
(ii) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “subsection
(a)(1)” and inserting the phrase “subsection (a)(1)(A) and (2)(A)” in its place.
(D) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “subsection (a)(1)
through (3) of this section throughout the 10-year tax abatement period even if, during the 10-
year period” and inserting the phrase “subsection (a)(1)(A) through (C) and (2)(A) through (C)
38

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
of this section throughout the certified tax exemption period even if, during the certified period”
in its place.
(E) New subsections (g) and (h) are added to read as follows:
“(g) At the Mayor’s discretion, the Mayor may extend, in whole or in part, a tax
exemption received or previously extended pursuant to this section in an increment of no more
than 5 years, if:
“(1) The qualified supermarket submits to the Mayor the application required by
subsection (h) of this section; and
“(2) The Mayor determines:
“(A) The entity continues to be a qualified supermarket;
“(B) An extension of the tax exemption is necessary to maintain the
financial or operational viability of the qualified supermarket; and
“(C) The qualified supermarket is fulfilling a need that would otherwise
not be met in the surrounding community by providing access to a variety of food and grocery
options.
“(h) To be eligible for an extension pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, a qualified
supermarket shall, no later than 60 days before the expiration of its existing tax exemption,
submit to the Mayor an application that includes:
“(1) An enumeration of the sales and income tax generated by the qualified
supermarket over the prior 5 years;
“(2) An enumeration of the amount and type of tax exemptions received by the
qualified supermarket during the prior 5 years;
“(3) A detailed description of the financial or operational need for the extension
of the tax exemption;
“(4) A description of how the qualified supermarket met community needs during
the previous 5 years, including a description of the cleanliness and appearance of the qualified
supermarket, the quality and variety of products carried, the adequacy of staffing levels, and how
the qualified supermarket has addressed concerns raised during the community listening sessions
required by subsection (c) of this section and a description of how the qualified supermarket
intends to continue to meet community needs and address concerns raised during listening
sessions in the subsequent 5 years; and
“(5) Data showing the percentage and dollar amount of transactions in which a
customer used SNAP benefits, WIC benefits, the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer program,
or other federal or District benefit programs identified by the Mayor.”.
(3) Section 47-3804 is amended by striking the phrase “The Mayor shall” and
inserting the phrase “The Mayor may” in its place.
SUBTITLE H. O STREET, SE, EMINENT DOMAIN AUTHORITY
39

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 2071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “O Street, SE, Eminent Domain Authority Emergency
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2072. The Council finds that:
(1) Residents have identified a vacant parcel of land, which serves as a prime
opportunity for neighborhood revitalization and green space expansion. This parcel is not
suitable for residential or commercial development; stakeholders have long requested that the
District acquire the property and convert it into a publicly accessible neighborhood park.
(2) The Dupont Park neighborhood is a residential neighborhood characterized by
nearby green space and hundreds of acres of forested trails for hiking, nature walks, biking, and
outdoor community events. The neighborhood offers access to outdoor recreation and reflects a
park-like setting that complements Fort Dupont Park, which is situated to the north of the Dupont
Park neighborhood.
(3) Lots 5542S-0030, 5542S-0031, and 5542S-0043 (the “Property”), located
within the Dupont Park neighborhood at approximately 3210 and 3212 O Street, SE, is
approximately 14,340 square feet. The Property currently consists of green space that sits
beneath the O Street Wall, a retaining wall that has been enhanced, repaired, and restabilized in
the past.
(4) Development of the Property is a high-priority measure for the District and
residents of Ward 7. Dupont Park residents have expressed concerns with the Property because
of the need to improve environmental sustainability and stormwater management, increase
recreational opportunities for children and families, and support long-term property stabilization
and quality of life improvements long sought by neighbors in this area.
(5) The Property presents an opportunity for redevelopment and a reduction in
blight in the Dupont Park neighborhood. The Property is appropriate for neighborhood
development, including a community park and walking trail, accessible green space, enhancing
neighborhood connectivity, and providing residents with a safe location for recreational and
outdoor activities.
(6) Acquisition of the Property by the District and subsequent operation of the
Property by the Department of Parks and Recreation (the “Department”) will allow an
opportunity for the Department to invigorate an unused and blighted parcel and to reposition the
Property for revitalization as a safe community space for residents.
Sec. 2073. Exercise of eminent domain.
The Mayor may exercise eminent domain in accordance with the procedures set forth in
subchapter II of Chapter 13 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official Code to acquire lots
40

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
5542S-0030, 5542S-0031, and 5542S-0043, in order to achieve the public purposes set forth in
section 2072.
SUBTITLE I. VACANT BUILDING REGISTRATION FEE
Sec. 2081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Vacant Building Registration Fee Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec 2082. An Act To provide for the abatement of nuisances in the District of Columbia
by the Commissioners of said District, and for other purposes, approved April 14, 1906 (34 Stat.
114; D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 5(14) (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.05(14)) is amended to read as follows:
“(14)(A) “Vacant building” means any real property improved by a building that
is not lawfully occupied on a regular or habitual basis by the owner or a tenant or other person
having the permission of the owner; provided, that, in the case of a residential building, the
Mayor determines that there is no resident for whom an intent to return and lawfully occupy the
building can be shown.
“(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a single-family
or 2-family building that the owner or owner's agent is actively attempting to sell or rent, as
evidenced by MLS electronic listing, shall not be considered a vacant property; provided, that the
time period for attempting such sale or rent shall not exceed 6 months from the date of the initial
listing, offer, or advertisement of sale or rent; provided further, that the building is in compliance
with the requirements of section 12 and applicable property maintenance code standards for the
District of Columbia, and, if a rental, properly licensed in accordance with applicable District
regulations.”.
(b) The lead-in language of section 6(a) (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.06(a)) is amended
by striking the phrase “register the building and pay the registration fee” and inserting the phrase
“register the building” in its place.
(c) Section 6a (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.06a) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “, the registration fee
pursuant to section 9, or” and inserting the word “or” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is as amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “subject to the
registration fee pursuant to section 9 or” and inserting the phrase “subject to” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2)(A) is repealed.
(3) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “but not subject to the
registration fee requirements of section 9, the fines and penalties collected under section 10, or
the increased real property tax rates for vacant buildings set forth in D.C. Official Code § 47-
41

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
812(b-10)” and inserting the phrase “but not subject to the fines and penalties collected under
section 10 or the increased real property tax rates for vacant buildings set forth in D.C. Official
Code § 47-812(b-10)” in its place.
(d) Section 8 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.08) is amended by striking the phrase
“registration related. If the registration is denied or revoked, no registration fees or parts thereof
shall be returned.” and inserting the phrase “registration related.” in its place.
(e) Section 9 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.09) is repealed.
(f) Section 10(a) (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.10(a)) is repealed.
(g) Section 12 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.12) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (12) is amended by striking the phrase “and fire hazards;” and
inserting the phrase “and fire hazards, including rat harborages;” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (13) is amended by striking the phrase “public health and safety”
and inserting the phrase “public health or safety, including by rat harborages” in its place.
(h) Section 14(a) (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.14(a)) is repealed.
(i) Section 15(a) (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.15(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“registration or fee payment” and inserting the word “registration” in its place.
(j) Section 21 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3131.21) is amended by striking the phrase
“sections 5 through 20” and inserting the phrase “the provisions of this act” in its place.
Sec. 2083. The Vacant to Vibrant Amendment Act of 2026, effective October 1, 2025
(D.C. Law 26-41; 72 DCR 8881), is amended as follows:
(a) Amendatory section 12(a)(15) in section 202(j) is amended by striking the phrase “or
fire hazards” and inserting the phrase “or fire hazards, including rat harborages” in its place.
(b) Section 401(a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) Sections 121, 122, 131, amendatory section 20 in section 202(p), and sections 301,
302(a), 303, 304, and 305 of this act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of their fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan.”.
SUBTITLE J. BUILDING CODE INFRACTION FINES
Sec. 2091. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Building Code Infraction Fines Inflation Adjustment
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2092. The second section 11 of the Construction Codes Approval and Amendments
Act of 1986, effective December 13, 2017 (D.C. Law 22-33; D.C. Official Code § 6-1431), is
redesignated as section 11a and amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 11a. Housing and building infraction fines; periodic adjustments.
42

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a) On January 1 of each year, beginning on January 1, 2018, and ending on January 1,
2026, a fine amount listed in section 3201.1 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (16 DCMR § 3201.1), when assessed for an infraction listed in sections 3301
through 3313 and section 3315 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (16
DCMR §§ 3301 through 3313 and 3315), shall be adjusted according to the most recent
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers in the Washington Metropolitan Statistical area,
as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
“(b) A schedule of the fine amounts for each infraction listed in sections 3301 through
3313 and section 3315 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (16 DCMR
§§ 3301 through 3313 and 3315), as adjusted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, shall be
published in the District of Columbia Register within 30 days after the adjustments become
effective; provided, that a failure to publish the schedule in the District of Columbia Register
shall not impair the validity of the adjusted fine amounts.”.
Sec. 2093. Section 3201.8 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations
(16 DCMR § 3201.8) is amended to read as follows:
“3201.8 (a) On January 1 of each year, beginning on January 1, 2018, and ending on
January 1, 2026, a fine amount listed in § 3201.1, when assessed for an infraction listed in 16
DCMR §§ 3301 through 3313 and 3315 , shall be adjusted according to the most recent
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers in the Washington Metropolitan Statistical area,
as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
“(b) A schedule of the fine amounts for each infraction listed in 16 DCMR §§ 3301
through 3313 and 3315, as adjusted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall be
published in the District of Columbia Register within 30 days after the adjustments become
effective; provided, that a failure to publish the schedule in the District of Columbia Register
shall not impair the validity of the adjusted fine amounts.”.
Sec. 2094. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of January 1, 2018.
SUBTITLE K. EVENTS DC GRANTS
Sec. 2101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Events DC Grants Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2102. DC history grants.
(a) In Fiscal Year 2027, the Washington Convention and Sports Authority (“Events DC”)
shall issue the following grants:
43

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) $250,000 to fund a District of Columbia nonprofit organization that teaches
and promotes the District’s extensive history and culture in the struggle for freedom,
opportunity, and democracy, with an emphasis on including the entire District across all 8 wards
in this history; and
(2) $250,000 to a nonprofit organization occupying space in the Carnegie Library
building that is engaged in collecting, interpreting, and sharing the history of the District.
(b) Grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other grants
awarded by Events DC in support of historical education and research.
Sec. 2103. National Cherry Blossom Festival grant.
(a) There is established a matching grant program (“Program”) to support the 2027
National Cherry Blossom Festival, which shall be administered by Events DC.
(b) Under the Program, a matching grant shall be awarded to a nonprofit organization that
organizes and produces an event or events as part of the official, month-long National Cherry
Blossom Festival (“Festival”) at a rate of $2 for every dollar that the organization has raised in
corporate donations by April 30, 2027; except, that the total matching grant shall not exceed $1.5
million.
(c) In Fiscal Year 2027, of the funds allocated to the Non-Departmental Account, $1.5
million shall be transferred to Events DC to use for the grant authorized by subsection (b) of this
section.
(d) A grant awarded pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other grant
awarded by Events DC in support of the Festival.
Sec. 2104. Section 203 of the Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994,
effective September 28, 1994 (D.C. Law 10-188; D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.03), is amended
by adding a new paragraph (10O) to read as follows:
“(10O) To provide an annual grant to the Martin Luther King Holiday DC
Committee, or a nonprofit successor or affiliate organization designated by the Martin Luther
King Holiday DC Committee (“host”), that is responsible for organizing, operating, and applying
for District permits or approvals for the annual Martin Luther King, Jr. Holiday DC Parade
(“MLK Parade”), subject to the following conditions:
“(A) The grant shall be used to cover the costs of fees incurred for
administering the special annual events comprising the MLK Parade, including:
“(i) Special Event User Fees required by the Department of
Licensing and Consumer Protection;
“(ii) Special Event User Fees and other fees required by the
Metropolitan Police Department;
44

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(iii) Special Event User Fees and other fees required by the
Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration;
“(iv) Fees for on-site permitting and monitoring inspectors, on-site
monitoring, Advanced Life Support Units, EMS bicycle teams and ambulance carts, use of
trucks, and other fees required by the Department of Fire and Emergency Medical Services;
“(v) Food vendor inspection fees and other fees required by the
Department of Health;
“(vi) Fees for clean-up prior to and after the event, trash removal,
towing services, and other fees required by the Department of Public Works; and
“(vii) Fees for flag installation and removal, traffic control officer
assistance, variable message boards, and other fees required by the Department of
Transportation; and
“(B) The grant funds shall not be used for expediting fees or penalties
incurred by the host;”.
SUBTITLE L. CLEAN ENERGY DC BUILDING CODE MODIFICATIONS
Sec. 2111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Clean Energy DC Building Code Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2112. Net Zero Building Code Delay and All-Electric Requirement
Section 2 of the Clean Energy DC Building Code Amendment Act of 2022, effective
September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-177; D.C. Official Code § 6-1453.01), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by adding a new paragraph (2A) to read as follows:
“(2A) “Level 3 alteration” shall have the same meaning as provided in the
Building Codes.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the date “December 31, 2026” and insert the date “December
31, 2027” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “new construction or substantial improvements” and
insert the phrase “new construction of covered buildings or Level 3 alterations to covered
buildings” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) By December 31, 2026, the Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of
Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C.
Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue final regulations prohibiting the use of on-site fuel
45

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
combustion for the provision of thermal energy for all new construction of covered buildings and
additions greater than 10,000 square feet to covered buildings.”.
(3) New paragraphs (3) and (4) are added to read as follows:
“(3) No permit application for the new construction of a covered building or an
addition greater than 10,000 square feet to a covered building submitted after December 31,
2026, shall be approved if the building or addition design provides for the use of on-site fuel
combustion for the provision of thermal energy for space heating and water heating.
“(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no building permit application
for the new construction of a covered building, an addition greater than 10,000 square feet to a
covered building, or a Level 3 alteration to a covered building submitted after December 31,
2026, shall be approved unless the building design is such that the building conserves an amount
of energy attributable to building operation that is equal to or greater than the amount that would
be conserved if such building complied with the 2024 International Energy Conservation Code.”.
(c) Subsection (c)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “newly constructed or
substantially improved covered buildings” and inserting the phrase “covered buildings that were
newly constructed or underwent Level 3 alterations” in its place.
SUBTITLE M. [RESERVED]
SUBTITLE N. GREATER WASHINGTON HISPANIC CHAMBER OF
COMMERCE GRANTS
Sec. 2131. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Greater Washington Hispanic Chamber of Commerce
Grantmaking Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2132. Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168;
D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04), is amended by adding a new subsection (rr) to read as follows:
“(rr) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor may issue
grants to the Greater Washington Hispanic Chamber of Commerce for the purpose of supporting
business development efforts and providing technical assistance and support.”.
SUBTITLE O. VITALITY FUND
Sec. 2141. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Vitality Fund Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
46

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 2142. Section 2013 of the Vitality Fund Act of 2024, effective September 18, 2024
(D.C. Law 25-217; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.452), is amended by adding a new subsection (e)
to read as follows:
“(e) A recipient of a grant awarded pursuant to this section shall not, based on the award
or receipt of such grant, be required to enter into an agreement pursuant to section 4 of the First
Source Employment Agreement Act of 1984, effective June 29, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-93; D.C.
Official Code § 2-219.03).”.
SUBTITLE P. LRSP VOUCHERS FOR FAMILIES EXITING RAPID
REHOUSING
Sec. 2151. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Local Rent Supplement Program Vouchers for Families
Exiting Rapid Rehousing Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2152. Section 26a(b) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Act of 1999,
effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code § 6-226(b)), is amended by
adding a new paragraph (5) to read as follows:
“(5) During Fiscal Year 2027, the Authority shall provide families referred by the
Department of Human Services pursuant to section 31c of the Homeless Services Reform Act of
2005, passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-724), with the
exclusive opportunity to apply for the 26 new Rent Supplement Program vouchers funded in the
Fiscal Year 2027 Local Budget Act of 2026, passed on 2nd reading on June 23, 2026 (Enrolled
version of Bill 26-659).”.
SUBTITLE Q. CREATIVE ECONOMY GRANT PROGRAM RULES
Sec. 2161. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Creative Economy Grant Program Rules Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2162. The Go-Go Official Music of the District of Columbia Designation Act of
2020, effective April 11, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-71; D.C. Official Code § 1-167.01 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new section 3a to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. Establishment of Go-Go Support Program.
“(a) There is established the Go-Go Support Program (“Program”) to award grants to
District organizations to preserve the history of go-go music and promote go-go as an art form.
“(b) The Program shall be administered by the Director of the Office of Cable Television,
Film, Music, and Entertainment (“Director”), subject to the availability of funds.
47

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) In considering applications for Program grants, the Director shall score applications
on an objective, quantitative basis consistent with Program rules issued by the Mayor and shall
retain and preserve written records of the scores awarded to each applicant and the basis for each
score.
“(d)(1) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative
Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.),
and in consultation with the Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment, shall
issue rules to implement the provisions of this section.
“(2) Rules issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be submitted
to the Council for a 30-day period of review. The Council may approve the rules in whole or in
part. If the Council does not approve the rules within the 30-day review period, the rules shall be
deemed approved.
“(3) The Director may not award Program grants until the Council approves the
rules or the rules are deemed approved, pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection.”.
SUBTITLE R. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACQUISITION AUTHORITY
Sec. 2171. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Economic Development Acquisition Authority
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2172. Section 5 of An Act To grant additional powers to the Commissioners of the
District of Columbia, and for other purposes, approved December 20, 1944 (58 Stat. 822; D.C.
Official Code § 1-301.04), is amended as follows:
(a) The existing text is designated as subsection (b).
(b) A new subsection (a) is added to read as follows:
“(a) The Mayor may acquire property by negotiated sale for governmental purposes,
including to support and promote economic development and neighborhood revitalization.”.
SUBTITLE S. RHODE ISLAND AVENUE, NE, AND 12TH STREET, NE,
RETAIL GRANTS
Sec. 2181. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Rhode Island Avenue, NE, and 12th Street, NE, Retail
Grants Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2182. Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168;
D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (ll) is amended as follows:
48

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
“(ll)(1)(A) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor shall
establish a Rhode Island Avenue Support Grant Program to award grants in Fiscal Years 2026
and 2027 through a competitive process to eligible businesses, eligible commercial property
owners, and eligible neighborhood management organizations operating in the Rhode Island
Avenue Corridor in accordance with this subsection.”.
(B) Subparagraph (C)(ii) is amended to read as follows:
“(ii) Lease or actively market for lease a commercial property on
the Rhode Island Avenue Corridor to an eligible business at commercially reasonable rates in the
submarket;”.
(C) A new subparagraph (C-i) is added to read as follows:
“(C-i) An eligible neighborhood management organization shall:
“(i) Be a main street or civic organization that serves the Rhode
Island Avenue Corridor;
“(ii) Be actively engaged in efforts to support eligible businesses
and eligible commercial property owners; and
“(iii) Be in good standing with DLCP, OTR, and IRS.”.
(D) A new subparagraph (D-i) is added to read as follows:
“(D-i) An eligible neighborhood management organization seeking a grant
under this subsection shall submit to the Deputy Mayor an application, in a form prescribed by
the Deputy Mayor, which shall include:
“(i) A proposal to support efforts to attract a grocer to the Rhode
Island Avenue Corridor, to improve wayfinding to and along the Rhode Island Avenue Corridor,
or to support the beautification of the corridor; and
“(ii) Any additional information requested by the Deputy Mayor.”.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(A) The existing text is designated as subparagraph (A).
(B) A new subparagraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) In Fiscal Year 2027, the Deputy Mayor shall award at least $200,000
in grant funds to eligible businesses and commercial property owners and at least $200,000 in
grant funds to an eligible neighborhood management organization.”.
(3) Paragraph (5)(A)(ii) is amended by striking the phrase “eligible business or
property owner” and inserting the phrase “eligible business, property owner, or neighborhood
management organization” in its place.
(b) a new subsection (ss) is added to read as follows:
“(ss)(1)(A) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December
49

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor shall
establish a 12th and Monroe Streets, NE, Support Grant Program to award grants in Fiscal Year
2027 through a competitive process to eligible businesses, eligible commercial property owners,
and eligible neighborhood management organizations operating or willing to operate in the 12th
and Monroe Streets, NE, Retail Zone in accordance with this subsection.
“(B) An eligible business shall:
“(i) Be registered as an entity in the District;
“(ii) Be in good standing with DLCP, OTR, the Department of
Employment Services, and IRS;
“(iii) Have fewer than 30 full-time employees;
“(iv) Sign or intend to sign a medium- or long-term lease of a
commercial property in the 12th and Monroe Streets, NE, Retail Zone; and
“(v) Offer retail, educational programs, entertainment, food, or
other services or activities that strengthen community connections and attract foot traffic to the
12th and Monroe Streets, NE, Retail Zone.
“(C) An eligible commercial property owner shall:
“(i) Own a commercial property in the 12th and Monroe Streets,
NE, Retail Zone;
“(ii) Sign or intend to sign a medium- or long-term lease with an
eligible business for the commercial property in the 12th and Monroe Streets, NE, Retail Zone;
“(iii) Be in good standing with DLCP, OTR, and IRS; and
“(iv) Not be a beneficial owner of the eligible business that is or
will be occupying the commercial property in the 12th and Monroe Streets, NE, Retail Zone.
“(D) An eligible neighborhood management organization shall:
“(i) Be a main street or civic organization that serves or is willing
to serve the 12th and Monroe Streets, NE, Retail Zone;
“(ii) Be actively engaged in efforts to support eligible businesses
and eligible commercial property owners; and
“(iii) Be in good standing with DLCP, OTR, and IRS;
“(E) A business or commercial property owner seeking a grant under this
subsection shall submit to the Deputy Mayor an application, in a form prescribed by the Deputy
Mayor, which shall include:
“(i) A signed current medium- or long-term lease or evidence of
the intent to sign a medium- or long-term lease; and
“(ii) Any additional information requested by the Deputy Mayor.
“(F) An eligible neighborhood management organization seeking a grant
under this subsection shall submit to the Deputy Mayor an application, in a form prescribed by
the Deputy Mayor, which shall include:
50

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i) A proposal to organize cluster façade improvements within the
12th and Monroe Streets, NE, Retail Zone, to enhance the appearance of a block or blocks of
retail or commercial building facades, signage, awnings, lighting, street planters, plants, and
trees, or a proposed contract with a vendor to provide or subsidize façade and interior
improvements for multiple eligible businesses; and
“(ii) Any additional information requested by the Deputy Mayor.
“(G)(i) An eligible business awarded a grant pursuant to this subsection
shall use the grant funds for tenant or public space improvements.
“(ii) A property owner awarded a grant pursuant to this subsection
shall use the grant to abate rent payments or otherwise provide a benefit, which may include a
tenant improvement allowance, including for façade repair and interior and exterior space
renovations, to the eligible business in an amount equal in value to or greater than the amount of
the grant and shall submit evidence to the Deputy Mayor demonstrating compliance with this
sub-subparagraph.
“(H) To receive the annual grant funds disbursement, a business or
commercial property owner awarded a grant pursuant to this subsection shall annually submit to
the Deputy Mayor proof of continued participation in the medium- or long-term lease and other
documentation as required by the Deputy Mayor.
“(I) If an eligible business awarded a grant pursuant to this subsection
ends its lease early, and a likewise eligible business assumes the same lease, the new lessee may
apply to the Deputy Mayor through a noncompetitive process for a grant up to the amount of the
remaining funds that the original grantee was awarded.
“(J) If an eligible property owner awarded a grant pursuant to this
subsection transfers the property to a likewise eligible property owner, and the likewise eligible
property owner assumes the same medium- or long-term lease, the new property owner may
apply to the Deputy Mayor through a noncompetitive process for a grant up to the amount of the
remaining funds that the original grantee was awarded.
“(2) In Fiscal Year 2027, the Deputy Mayor shall award at least $200,000 in grant
funds for the 12th and Monroe Streets, NE, Retail Zone.
“(3) The Deputy Mayor may award one or more grants to a third-party grant-
managing entity for the purpose of administering the program pursuant to this subsection and
making subgrants on behalf of the Deputy Mayor in accordance with the requirements of this
subsection or regulations issued pursuant to this subsection.
“(4) The Deputy Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia
Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code §
2-501 et seq.), may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.
51

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(5)(A) The Deputy Mayor and any third-party entity chosen pursuant to
paragraph (3) of this subsection shall maintain a list of all grants awarded pursuant to this
subsection, identifying for each award:
“(i) The grant recipient;
“(ii) The name and address of the eligible business, property
owner, or neighborhood management organization;
“(iii) The date of the award;
“(iv) The intended use of the award; and
“(v) The award amount.
“(B) The list required by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be
published in the District of Columbia Register every 6 months.
“(C) The Deputy Mayor and any third-party entity chosen pursuant to
paragraph (3) of this subsection shall collect necessary information to evaluate the effectiveness
of the program, including:
“(i) The total award amount and duration of the award;
“(ii) The share of the award as a percentage of the total lease cost;
and
“(iii) The length of time that eligible businesses or eligible
commercial property owners awarded grant funds pursuant to this subsection remain in their
leases.
“(6) For the purposes of this subsection, the term:
“(A) “12th and Monroe Streets, NE, Retail Zone” means the parcels,
squares, and lots within and along 12th Street, NE, from the intersection of 12th Street, NE, and
Rhode Island Avenue, NE, to the intersection of 12th Street, NE, and Michigan Avenue, NE, and
within and along Monroe Street, NE, from the intersection of Michigan Avenue, NE, and
Monroe Street, NE, to the intersection of Monroe Street, NE, and 12th Street, NE.
“(B) “Entity” shall have the same meaning as provided in D.C. Official
Code § 29-101.02(10).
“(C) “Medium- or long-term lease” means a fixed-term rental agreement
with a lease period of no fewer than 2 years, with a minimum of 6 months remaining on an
existing lease as of the closing date of the application period, exclusive of options.”.
SUBTITLE T. CORPORATE FILING FEES
Sec. 2191. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Corporation Fees Regulation Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2192. Chapter 6 of Title 17 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (17
52

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
DCMR § 600.1 et seq.) is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection 602.1(e) (17 DCMR § 602.1(e)) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “two hundred twenty
dollars ($220)” and inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (10) is amended by striking the phrase “two hundred twenty
dollars ($220)” and inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
(3) Subparagraph (11) is amended by striking the phrase “two hundred twenty
dollars ($220)” and inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
(b) Subsection 603.1 (17 DCMR § 603.1) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (i) is amended by striking the phrase “eighty dollars ($80)” and
inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (j) is amended by striking the phrase “eighty dollars ($80)” and
inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (k) is amended by striking the phrase “eighty dollars ($80)” and
inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
(c) Subsection 605.1(d) (17 DCMR § 605.1(d)) is amended by striking the phrase “two
hundred twenty dollars ($220)” and inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
(d) Subsection 607.1(f) (17 DCMR § 607.1(f)) is amended by striking the phrase “two
hundred twenty dollars ($220)” and inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
(e) Subsection 608.1(g) (17 DCMR § 608.1(g)) is amended by striking the phrase “two
hundred twenty dollars ($220)” and inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
(f) Subsection 611.1(d) (17 DCMR § 611.1(d)) is amended by striking the phrase “two
hundred twenty dollars ($220)” and inserting the phrase “five dollars ($5)” in its place.
SUBTITLE U. GOLDEN TRIANGLE BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
Sec. 2201. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Golden Triangle Business Improvement District
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2202. Section 202(c)(2) of the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996,
effective March 17, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-257; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.52(c)(2)), is amended
by adding a new subparagraph (F) to read as follows:
“(F) For tax year 2027 and thereafter, a 3% annual increase in the prior
year’s BID tax rate is hereby authorized and imposed, subject to the requirements of section 8.”.
SUBTITLE V. HOME PURCHASE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
Sec. 2211. Short title.
53

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Home Purchase Assistance Program Revision
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2212. Section 3a(e)(1)(A) of the Home Purchase Assistance Fund Act of 1978,
effective July 1, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-139; D.C. Official Code § 42-2602.01(e)(1)(A)), is amended
by striking the phrase “At the beginning of each quarter in a fiscal year, funds necessary” and
inserting the phrase “Funds necessary” in its place.
SUBTITLE W. CHILDREN’S NATIONAL HOSPITAL
Sec. 2221. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Children’s National Hospital Grantmaking Authority
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2222. Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168;
D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04), is amended by adding a new subsection (qq) to read as follows:
“(qq) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor may issue one
or more grants to Children’s National Hospital for site assessments for a new hospital campus.”.
Sec. 2223. Applicability.
Section 2222 shall apply as of July 15, 2026.
SUBTITLE X. NONPROFIT AFFORDABLE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT TAX
RELIEF CLARIFICATION
Sec. 2231. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Nonprofit Affordable Housing Development Tax Relief
Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2232. Section 47-1005.02 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
adding a new subsection (e) to read as follows:
“(e) For purposes of this section, an organization that is not organized or operated for
private gain is considered to control an entity if the organization owns, directly or indirectly, a
majority voting interest in the entity or the entity’s managing member.”.
SUBTITLE Y. RELEASES OF DEEDS OF TRUST
Sec. 2241. Short title.
54

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Release of Deeds of Trust Emergency Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 2242. Section 545b(b)(2) of An Act To establish a code of law for the District of
Columbia, effective April 29, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-86; D.C. Official Code § 42-818.02(b)(2)), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “competent jurisdiction.” and
inserting the phrase “competent jurisdiction; or” in its place.
(b) A new subparagraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) The deed of trust is held by the District government.”.
Sec. 2243. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of April 29, 1998.
SUBTITLE Z. HOUSING PRODUCTION TRUST FUND
Sec. 2251. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Housing Production Trust Fund Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2252. The Housing Production Trust Fund Act of 1988, effective March 16, 1989
(D.C. Law 7-202; D.C. Official Code § 42-2801 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 42-2802) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b-1) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(b-1)(1) At least 40% of the total housing units across all new projects for which HTPF
funds are obligated in a fiscal year shall be set aside for very low-income households, which
includes individuals who have previously been incarcerated for or convicted of a felony under
state or federal law and who are otherwise entitled to services and assistance pursuant to this act.
The Mayor shall submit a written request to the Council for a waiver of this 40% requirement if,
in the judgment of the Mayor, compliance with the requirement is not feasible. The Council shall
approve or disapprove the waiver by resolution within 30 days, and the resolution shall be
deemed disapproved if the Council does not act within this 30-day period.”.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) At least 50% of the total housing units across all new projects for which
HTPF funds are obligated in a fiscal year shall be set aside for extremely low-income
households. The Mayor shall submit a written request to the Council for a waiver of the 50%
requirement if, in the judgment of the Mayor, compliance with the requirement is not feasible.
55

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
The Council shall approve or disapprove the waiver by resolution within 30 days, and the
resolution shall be deemed disapproved if the Council does not act within this 30-day period.”.
(2) A new subsection (b-8) is added to read as follows:
“(b-8)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this act or any other law, the Mayor in Fiscal
Year 2027 shall use 15% of the Fund for the purpose of assisting in the preservation of
affordable rental housing.
“(2) The Mayor’s selection process for funding viable preservation of affordable
rental housing proposals pursuant to this subsection shall provide a preference for projects or
proposals that have previously received Fund commitments.”.
(3) Subsection (d)(9) is amended as follows:
(A) The tabular array in subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
“
Affordability Level Total Number of Proposed Units
Selected Project Proposals All Project Proposals that Met
Minimum Requirements
New Preservation New Preservation
Construction Units Construction Units
Extremely low-
income studio
Extremely low-
income 1 bedroom
Extremely low-
income 2 bedrooms
Extremely low-
income 3+ bedrooms
Total Extremely low-
income Units
Very low-
income studio
Very low-income 1
bedroom
Very low-income 2
bedrooms
Very low-income 3+
bedrooms
Total Very low-
income units
56

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Low-income studio
Low-income 1
bedroom
Low-income 2
bedrooms
Low-income 3+
bedrooms
Total Low-income
units
Total Affordable
Units
” .
(B) Subparagraph (D) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (v) is amended to read as follows:
“(v) For new construction projects, number of housing units per
project proposal that will be affordable to households earning up to 30% of the area median
income, the number of housing units per project proposal that will be affordable to households
earning between 30% and 50% of the area median income, the number of housing units per
project proposal that will be affordable to households earning between 50% and 80% of the area
median income, and the amount of Local Rent Supplement assistance proposed for the project;
and”.
(ii) A new sub-subparagraph (vi) is added to read as follows:
“(vi) For each preservation project proposal, number of housing
units that will, upon completion of rehabilitation, be rented at levels affordable to households
earning up to 30% of the area median income, the number of housing units that will be rented at
levels affordable to households earning between 30% and 50% of the area median income, and
the number of housing units that will be rented at levels affordable to households earning
between 50% and 80% of the area median income;”.
(b) Section 4a (D.C. Official Code § 42-2803.01) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4a. Annual reporting.”
(2) Paragraphs (7), (8), (9), (10), and (11) are amended to read as follows:
“(7) The percentage of total housing units in new construction projects to which
Fund funds are legally obligated during the prior fiscal year, to rental housing or homeownership
opportunities for households with incomes at or below 30% of the area median income;
“(8) The percentage of total housing units in new construction projects to which
Fund funds are legally obligated during the prior fiscal year, to rental housing or homeownership
opportunities for households with incomes at or below 50% of the area median income;
57

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(9) The percentage of total housing units in new construction projects to which
Fund funds are legally obligated during the prior fiscal year to rental housing or homeownership
opportunities for households with incomes at or below 80% of the area median income;
“(10) For rental units in preservation projects to which Fund funds are legally
obligated during the prior fiscal year, the percentage that will:
“(A) Have, upon completion of rehabilitation, rents affordable to
households earning up to 30% of the area median income;
“(B) Have, upon completion of rehabilitation, rents affordable to
households earning between 30% and 50% of the area median income;
“(C) Have, upon completion of rehabilitation, rents affordable to
households earning between 50% and 80% of the area median income;
“(D) Have, upon completion of rehabilitation, rents affordable to
households earning more than 80% of the area median income;
“(E) Be rented at levels affordable to households earning up to 30% of the
area median income pursuant to an affordable housing covenant;
“(F) Be rented at levels affordable to households earning between 30%
and 50% of the area median income pursuant to an affordable housing covenant; and
“(G) Be rented at levels affordable to households earning between 50%
and 80% of the area median income pursuant to an affordable housing covenant;
“(11) The number of housing units assisted, including the number of rental
housing units assisted and the number of homeownership units assisted; and”.
(3) A new paragraph (12) is added to read as follows:
“(12) The amount expended on administrative costs during the prior fiscal year.”.
SUBTITLE AA. FILM, TELEVISION, AND ENTERTAINMENT REBATE FUND
OPTIMIZATION
Sec. 2261. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Maximizing Our Value in Entertainment (MOVIE)
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2262. Section 2(b) of the Film DC Economic Incentive Act of 2006, effective March
14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-290; D.C. Official Code § 2-1204.11(b)), is amended as follows:
(a) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “up to” and inserting the word
“of” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the figure “35%” and inserting the figure “25%”
in its place.
(c) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the figure “21%” and inserting the figure “10%”
in its place.
58

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(d) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the figure “30%” and inserting the figure “20%”
in its place.
SUBTITLE BB. PROTECTING ADJACENT AND ADJOINING HOMEOWNERS
CLARIFICATION
Sec. 2271. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Protecting Adjacent and Adjoining Property Owners
from Construction Damage Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2272. Section 6a(a)(2A)(A)(i)(I) of the Construction Codes Approval and
Amendments Act of 1986, effective April 20, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-261; D.C. Official Code § 6-
1405.01(a)(2A)(A)(i)(I)), is amended to read as follows:
“(i)(I) Demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the Building Code
Official, that the coverage provided by his or her commercial general liability insurance policy is
not limited to the property that is the subject of the permit application and does not exclude
claims for injuries to persons or damages to adjacent or adjoining properties or their lawful
occupants, for risks of loss, damage to property, or injury to or death of persons arising out of or
in connection with the performance of the work proposed to be performed under the permit.”.
SUBTITLE CC. STREETSCAPE FUND CLARIFICATION
Sec. 2281. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Streetscape Business Development Relief Fund
Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2282. Section 603(c) of the Streetscape Fund Amendment Act of 2010, effective
April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-370; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.191(c)), is amended to read as
follows:
“(c)(1) If a streetscape construction, capital infrastructure, or rehabilitation project is
undertaken within the District by or on behalf of the District or a District instrumentality, or by
or on behalf of a public utility or private entity acting pursuant to a District permit, franchise, or
authorization, the Mayor, in the Mayor’s sole discretion, may make interest-free loans or issue
grants from the Fund to a District Main Streets Program organization or an individual or entity
that operates a retail business within the boundaries of or adjoining the streetscape construction,
capital infrastructure, or rehabilitation project that is adversely affected by the project.
“(2) To obtain a loan or grant, a District Main Streets Program organization or
individual or entity operating a retail business shall submit an application in the form and with
the information that the Mayor shall require. The Mayor shall determine the terms and conditions
of each loan or grant based upon the application submitted by the District Main Street Program
59

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
organization or individual or entity operating a retail business; provided, that the term of a loan
or grant issued pursuant to this section shall not exceed 5 years after the termination of the
streetscape construction, capital infrastructure, or rehabilitation project.”.
SUBTITLE DD. INTERNET GAMING REVENUE FUND
Sec. 2291. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Internet Gaming Revenue Fund Establishment
Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2292. Internet Gaming Revenue Fund.
(a) There is established as a special fund the Internet Gaming Revenue Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Office of the Chief Financial Officer in accordance with
subsection (c) of this section.
(b) The following revenue collected pursuant to the Internet Gaming and Consumer
Protection Amendment Act of 2026, as introduced on April 9, 2026 (Bill 26-656) (“Act”), shall
be deposited into the Fund:
(1) All tax revenue collected pursuant to the Act; and
(2) All community impact assessments collected pursuant to the Act.
(c) Beginning in Fiscal Year 2027, and each year thereafter, money in the Fund shall be
used as follows:
(1) Tax revenue collected pursuant to the Act shall be used as follows:
(A) The first $750,000 of tax revenue collected shall be transferred to the
Department of Behavioral Health for prevention, education, treatment, referral, and recovery
services related to gambling addiction and related behavioral health needs; and
(B) All remaining tax revenue shall be transferred to the local fund of the
District of Columbia.
(2) Revenue received from the community impact assessments shall be transferred
annually to the following agencies for the following purposes:
(A) 30% to the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking, for debt
management, financial counseling, consumer financial protection, and financial literacy
programs and services;
(B) 30% to the Office of Victim Services and Justice Grants, for domestic
violence, intimate partner violence, survivor services, and family stability programs;
(C) 10% to the Department of Health, for research and evaluation services
on gambling behavior and gambling addiction; and
(D) 30% to the Department of Employment Services, for youth
development and training programs related to artificial intelligence, gaming, coding and software
development, and related technology fields.
60

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.
SUBTITLE EE. ARTS AND HUMANITIES GRANTS
Sec. 2301. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Arts and Humanities Grants Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2302. The Commission on the Arts and Humanities Act, effective October 21, 1975
(D.C. Law 1-22; D.C. Official Code § 39-201 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 6(c-1) (D.C. Official Code § 39-205(c-1)) is amended by adding a new
paragraph (3) to read as follows:
“(3) In Fiscal Year 2027:
“(A) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), and paragraph
(2)(B) of this subsection, the Commission shall issue the following grants:
“(i) $2,000,000 to the Ford’s Theatre, to retire accrued debt; and
“(ii) $100,000 to Levine Music, to provide accessible music
education.
“(B) Grants issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be
in addition to any other amounts the recipients otherwise would be eligible to apply for and shall
not be used in any calculation or weighting for General Operating Support or other grant
awards.”.
(b) Section 6d(f)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 39-205.04(f)(1)), is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (A)(iii) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (B)(ii)(II)(dd) is amended by striking the period and inserting
the phrase “; and” in its place.
(3) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:
“(C)(i) In Fiscal Year 2027, to Woolly Mammoth Theatre Company, up to
a maximum of $500,000, $1 for every $2 raised from non-governmental sources, as evidenced
by a notarized, itemized list of donations submitted by Woolly Mammoth Theatre Company to
the Commission:
“(I) During the period from August 1, 2026, to October 31,
2026, to be disbursed in a lump sum not later than December 31, 2026;
61

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(II) During the period from November 1, 2026, to January
31, 2027, to be disbursed in a lump sum not later than February 28, 2027;
“(III) During the period from February 1, 2027, to April 30,
2027, to be disbursed in a lump sum not later than May 31, 2027; and
“(IV) During the period from May 1, 2027, to July 31,
2027, to be disbursed in a lump sum not later than September 30, 2027.
“(ii) Grants issued pursuant to sub-subparagraph (i) of this
subparagraph shall be in addition to any other amounts the recipients otherwise would be eligible
to apply for and shall not be used in any calculation or weighting for General Operating Support
or other grant awards.”.
SUBTITLE FF. DMPED GRANTS
Sec. 2311. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development Grants Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2312. Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168;
D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (jj)(3) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated as subparagraph (A).
(2) A new subparagraph (B) is added to read as follows:.
“(B) In Fiscal Year 2027, the Deputy Mayor shall award a grant of $1
million to DC City, LLC for the purpose of supporting an existing technology incubator in the
District.”.
(b) Subsection (kk) is amended to read as follows:
“(kk)(1) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor may issue
grants to the African American Civil War Memorial Freedom Foundation, Inc. for the purpose of
redeveloping and operating the African American Civil War Museum, located at 1925 Vermont
Avenue, NW.
“(2) In Fiscal Year 2026, the Deputy Mayor shall award a grant for $600,700 to
the African American Civil War Memorial Freedom Foundation, Inc. pursuant to paragraph (1)
of this subsection.”.
(c) Subsection (oo) is amended by striking the phrase “in Fiscal Year 2026” and inserting
the phrase “in Fiscal Years 2026 and 2027” in its place.
(d) New subsections (tt) and (uu) are added to read as follows:
62

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(tt)(1) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor shall issue one
or more grants to a leaseholder of the Rock Creek Tennis Center to make improvements to bring
the facilities into compliance with Association of Tennis Professionals Tour and Women’s
Tennis Association Tour event standards.
“(2) Beginning October 1, 2026, and quarterly thereafter until the completion of
the project, the Deputy Mayor, in consultation with the leaseholder of the Rock Creek Tennis
Center, shall make publicly available updates on the improvements being made pursuant to
paragraph (1) of this subsection and how such improvements impact residents and businesses in
Advisory Neighborhood Commission 4E and the Sixteenth Street Heights and Crestwood
neighborhoods.
“(uu) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2027, the Deputy
Mayor shall award a total of $400,000 in grants to businesses and property owners for the
purposes of supporting rental assistance, operating expenses, and capital improvements for
businesses or properties that are located in the parcels, squares, and lots within and along
Georgia Avenue, NW, from the intersection of Georgia Avenue, NW, and Rock Creek Church
Road, NW, to the intersection of Georgia Avenue, NW, and Florida Avenue, NW.”.
Sec. 2313. The Rock Creek Tennis Center Transfer of Jurisdiction and Funding Act of
2025, effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; 72 DCR 9825), is repealed.
Sec. 2314. Applicability.
Sections 2312(b) and (d) and 2313 shall apply as of the effective date of the Fiscal Year
2026 Revised Local Budget Adjustment Emergency Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on
June 23, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-662).
SUBTITLE GG. STADIUM ARMORY METRO FUNDING
Sec. 2321. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Stadium Armory Metro Funding Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2322. Section 2052(d)(1) of the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund Establishment Act
of 2025, effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; D.C. Official Code § 10-1605.31(d)(1)),
is amended as follows:
(a) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(b) A new subparagraph (B-i) is added to read as follows:
63

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B-i) In Fiscal Year 2030, be transferred to local funds in an amount
estimated to be the Fiscal Year 2030 debt service cost incurred by the District for the capital
subsidy provided to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority for the purpose of
improvements at Stadium-Armory Metro; and”.
(c) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “In Fiscal Year 2030” and
inserting the phrase “In Fiscal Year 2031” in its place.
SUBTITLE HH. EQUITABLE INDUSTRIAL LAND USE
Sec. 2331. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Planning for Equitable Land Use Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2332. The District of Columbia Comprehensive Plan Act of 1984, effective April
10, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-76; D.C. Official Code § 1-306.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 10 to read as follows:
“Sec. 10. Equitable industrial land use policy.
“The 20-year comprehensive plan submitted to the Council of the District of Columbia in
2027 shall include reforms to the general land use map, the future land use map, elements, and
policies targeted at reducing the inequitable concentration of industrial land in District
communities.”.
SUBTITLE II. ART ALL NIGHT SPONSORSHIPS
Sec. 2341. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Art All Night Commercial Revitalization Support
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2342. The Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act
of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 2313 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.13) is amended by adding a new subsection
(c-2) to read as follows:
“(c-2)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department may enter into
written agreements with entities and individuals for sponsorships and advertisements for Art All
Night.
“(2) There shall be no limit to the value of goods, services, or funds that may be
received from an entity or individual under an agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection,
regardless of whether the entity is located, or the individual resides, within the District.
64

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) The Chief Financial Officer shall deposit all funds received pursuant to
agreements entered into pursuant to this subsection into the Art All Night Fund established by
section 2313a.
“(4) The Department shall keep an accounting of all goods, services, and funds
received pursuant to agreements entered into pursuant to this subsection and how all funds have
been used.”.
(b) A new section 2313a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 2313a. Art All Night Fund.
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Art All Night Fund (“Fund”), which shall
be administered by the Department in accordance with this section.
“(b) All funds received from agreements entered into pursuant to section 2313(c-2) shall
be deposited in the Fund.
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used to pay for the costs of implementing, supporting,
and promoting Art All Night.
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
SUBTITLE JJ. BRUCE MONROE EXTENSION OF DISPOSITION
AUTHORITY
Sec. 2351. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Bruce Monroe Extension of Disposition Authority
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2352. Section 1(d-8) of An Act Authorizing the sale of certain real estate in the
District of Columbia no longer required for public purposes, approved August 5, 1939 (53 Stat.
1211; D.C. Official Code § 10-801(d-8)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d-8) Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, the time period within which the
Mayor may dispose of a portion of the District-owned real property located at 3012 Georgia
Avenue, N.W., known for tax and assessment purposes as Lot 0849 in Square 2890, for a mixed-
use development that provides affordable housing, residential market-rate housing, commercial
or community amenity space, and any ancillary uses allowed under applicable law, pursuant to
the Bruce Monroe Disposition Approval Resolution of 2016, effective December 20, 2016 (Res.
21-721; 64 DCR 10453), as extended by the Bruce Monroe Disposition Extension Approval
Resolution of 2018, effective November 13, 2018 (Res. 22-643; 65 DCR 13002), as further
extended by the Bruce Monroe Extension of Disposition Authority Amendment Act of 2020,
65

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
effective March 16, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-248; 68 DCR 1143), and as further extended by the
Bruce Monroe Extension of Disposition Authority Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 7,
2025 (D.C. Law 25-273; 71 DCR 16294), including specified site use requirements for a park or
other public uses, as approved by the Zoning Commission for the District of Columbia in Zoning
Commission Order No. 16-11, and in any subsequent applicable orders, is extended to December
20, 2029.”.
Sec. 2353. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of December 20, 2026.
SUBTITLE KK. FEDERAL PROPERTIES TAX FUND
Sec. 2361. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Federal Properties Tax Fund Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2362. Federal Property Tax Fund.
(a) There is established as a special fund the Federal Properties Tax Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsections (c) and (d) of this
section.
(b) Revenue from the real property tax imposed by D.C. Official Code § 47-811 and the
possessory interest tax imposed by D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.01 on covered former federal
properties shall be deposited in the Fund.
(c) Money in the Fund may be used to:
(1) Implement and support infrastructure improvements, civic projects,
redevelopment, and property acquisition in the following areas:
(A) The Downtown BID, as defined in section 201(b) of the Business
Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective March 17, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-257; D.C. Official
Code § 2-1215.51(b));
(B) The Golden Triangle BID, as defined in section 202(b) of the
Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective March 17, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-257; D.C.
Official Code § 2-1215.52(b));
(C) The Southwest BID, as defined in section 210(b) of the Business
Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective September 9, 2014 (D.C. Law 20-136; D.C.
Official Code § 2-1215.60(b)); or
(D) The parcels, lots, and public right of way within, or adjacent to,
squares 0184, 0267, and 0299;
(2) Pay debt service, including principal and interest, costs of issuance, and credit
enhancements, and any costs of defeasance on bonds issued to support development of a covered
former federal property; and
66

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) Pay the costs of tax abatements awarded pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-
861.05.
(d) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not revert
to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of the
fiscal year, or at any other time.
(e) For the purposes of this section, the term “covered former federal property” means:
(1) A property located in one of the geographic areas listed in subsection (c)(1)
(A), (B), or (C) of this section that:
(A) Is owned by the District;
(B) Was owned by the federal government immediately prior to its
ownership by the District;
(C) Was disposed by the federal government to the District after January
1, 2026;
(D) Is ground leased to a private entity by the District pursuant to a ground
lease and development agreement;
(E) Was not subject to tax under D.C. Official Code §§ 47-811 or 47-
1005.01 immediately prior to being ground leased by the District government; and
(F) Continues to be subject to the ground lease and development
agreement;
(2) A property located in one of the geographic areas listed in subsection (c)(1)
(A), (B), or (C) of this section that:
(A) Was owned by the District;
(B) Was owned by the federal government immediately prior to its
ownership by the District;
(C) Was disposed by the federal government to the District after January
1, 2026;
(D) Was disposed of by the District pursuant to a sale and development
agreement between the District and a private entity;
(E) Was not subject to tax under D.C. Official Code §§ 47-811 or 47-
1005.01 while owned by the District government or federal government; and
(F) Continues to be subject to the sale and development agreement;
(3) A property located in one of the geographic areas listed in subsection (c)(1)
(A), (B), or (C) of this section that:
(A) Was owned by the federal government;
(B) Was disposed of by the federal government to a private entity after
January 1, 2026, pursuant to a sale and development agreement between the federal government
and the private entity;
67

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) Was not subject to tax under D.C. Official Code §§ 47-811 or 47-
1005.01 while owned by the federal government; and
(D) Continues to be subject to the sale and development agreement; or
(4) A property located in one of the geographic areas listed in subsection (c)(1)
(A), (B), or (C) of this section that:
(A) Is owned by the federal government;
(B) Is ground leased by the federal government to a private entity after
January 1, 2026, pursuant to a ground lease and development agreement between the federal
government and the private entity;
(C) Was not subject to tax under D.C. Official Code §§ 47-811 or 47-
1005.01 while owned by the federal government; and
(D) Continues to be subject to the ground lease and development
agreement.
(f) No later than a year after revenue is deposited into the Fund pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section, and annually thereafter, the Mayor shall submit to the Council a report that
provides an analysis of:
(1) Planned spending of the revenues by use and geographic area, as prescribed
in subsection (c) of this section;
(2) Prior spending of any revenues deposited into the Fund by use and geographic
area, as prescribed in subsection (c) of this section; and
(3) How planned or prior spending of revenues deposited into the Fund advances
the economic development goals of each geographic area listed in subsection (c)(1) of this
section.
(g) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue
rules to implement this section.
SUBTITLE LL. RFK CAMPUS CBE CLARIFICATION
Sec. 2371. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Robert F. Kennedy Stadium Complex CBE
Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2372. Section 5(c)(1) of the Robert F. Kennedy Campus Redevelopment
Amendment Act of 2025, effective November 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-54; D.C. Official Code §
10-1605.04(c)(1)), is amended to read as follows:
“(1)(A) The equity and development participation requirements of section
2349a(a) of the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of
68

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
2005, effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.49a(a)), shall not
apply to the Stadium Project; and
“(B) The Developer shall require at least 20% equity, excluding debt
financing, mezzanine financing, or other equity contributions by limited or institutional
investors, and 20% development participation from certified business enterprises in the
Commercial Development.”.
TITLE III. PUBLIC SAFETY AND JUSTICE
SUBTITLE A. SAFE PASSAGE PROGRAM
Sec. 3001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Safe Passage Program Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 3002. Section 3023(a)(2) of the Office of Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and
Justice Establishment Act of 2011, effective September 6, 2023 (D.C. Law 25-50; D.C. Official
Code § 1-301.192(a)(2)), is amended by striking the phrase “shall establish” and inserting the
phrase “may establish” in its place.
SUBTITLE B. HOMELAND SECURITY COMMISSION DISSOLUTION
Sec. 3011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Homeland Security Commission Dissolution
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 3012. Title II of the Homeland Security, Risk Reduction, and Preparedness
Amendment Act of 2006, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-262; D.C. Official Code § 7-
2271.01 et seq.), is repealed.
Sec. 3013. All records and information of the District of Columbia Homeland Security
Commission (“Commission”) shall, on October 1, 2026, become the records and information of
the Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency (“HSEMA”), and all such records
and information obtained by the Commission pursuant to Title II of the Homeland Security, Risk
Reduction, and Preparedness Amendment Act of 2006, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-
262; D.C. Official Code § 7-2271.01 et seq.), shall be destroyed by HSEMA by September 30,
2027.
Sec. 3014. Ongoing confidentiality.
(a) Persons other than District of Columbia Homeland Security Commission
(“Commission”) members who attended any Commission meeting that, pursuant to section 204
of the Homeland Security, Risk Reduction, and Preparedness Amendment Act of 2006, effective
69

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-262; D.C. Official Code § 7-2271.04), was not open to the public,
shall not disclose what occurred at the meeting to anyone who was not in attendance.
(b) Commission members who attended meetings not open to the public shall not disclose
what occurred with anyone who was not in attendance, except other Commission members.
(c) Members of the Commission, persons who attended a Commission meeting, and
persons who presented information to the Commission may not be required to disclose, in any
administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding, information presented at or opinions formed as a
result of a Commission meeting.
(d) All information and records generated by the Commission, including statistical
compilations and reports, and all information and records acquired by the Commission, are
confidential and all such information and records in possession of the Homeland Security and
Emergency Management Agency (“HSEMA”) pursuant to section 3013 are confidential.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, Commission information and records may be disclosed by
HSEMA as necessary to carry out its duties and purposes. The information and records may be
disclosed by HSEMA to another homeland security agency or a homeland security commission
if the other agency or commission is governed by confidentiality provisions that afford the same
or greater protections as those that were provided in Title II of the Homeland Security, Risk
Reduction, and Preparedness Amendment Act of 2006, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-
262; D.C. Official Code § 7-2271.01 et seq.).
(e) Except as permitted by this section, information and records of the Commission shall
not be disclosed voluntarily, pursuant to a subpoena, in response to a request for discovery in any
adjudicative proceeding, or in response to a request made under made under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1976, effective March 29, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-531
et seq.), nor shall they be introduced into evidence in any administrative, civil, or criminal
proceeding.
(f) Information and records that were presented to the Commission shall not be immune
from subpoena or discovery, or prohibited from being introduced into evidence, solely because
the information and records were made available to the Commission, if the information and
records could have been obtained through other sources.
Sec. 3015. Conforming Amendments
(a) Section 2(e)(29) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law
2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(e)(29)), is repealed.
(b) Section 204(a)(13) of the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March 29,
1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-534(a)(13)), is amended to read as follows:
“(13) Information exempt from disclosure by section 3014(e) of the Homeland
Security Commission Dissolution Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency
basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-724);”.
70

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE C. CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECKS
Sec. 3021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Criminal Background Check and Fingerprinting
Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 3022. Section 3043 of the Background Check Fingerprinting Authority and Rap
Back Program Act of 2025, effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; D.C. Official Code §
4-1551.03), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) When conducting the fingerprinting of an individual is required or authorized by any
District or federal law or regulation for the purposes of conducting a background check of the
individual, MPD, or an entity authorized by MPD for the purpose of fingerprint collection, shall
fingerprint the individual and shall submit the fingerprints to the FBI for the purpose of
conducting a criminal history background check. MPD shall receive the results of the criminal
history check and shall disseminate the results of the criminal history check to the District
agency authorized by law to receive such information and to no other entity.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) The authority provided by this section applies to:
“(1) Fingerprinting authorized under the District of Columbia Rap Back Program;
and
“(2) Fingerprinting required or authorized for the purposes of administering the
following provisions of District law:
“(A) Subsection 1102.1 of Title 6-A of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (6-A DCMR § 1102.1), relating to the commission or employment of a special
police officer, conducted by MPD;
“(B) Subsection 2105.1 of Title 17 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (17 DCMR § 2105.1), relating to the certification or employment of a security
officer, conducted by MPD;
“(C) Title V of the Prevention of Child Abuse and Neglect Act of 1977,
effective June 27, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-136; D.C. Official Code § 4-1305.01 et seq.), relating to
individuals who seek to be approved or licensed as an adoptive parent, kinship caregiver, or legal
guardian, individuals with whom a child is placed under D.C. Official Code § 16-2320(a), and
adults residing in the home of such individuals, conducted by MPD;
“(D) The Firearms Control Regulations Act of 1975, effective September
24, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-85; D.C. Official Code § 7-2501.01 et seq.), relating to firearm
registration applicants, conducted by MPD;
71

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(E) Subsection 2321.5(d) of Title 24 of the District of Columbia
Municipal Regulations (24 DCMR § 2321.5(d)), relating to firearms dealer licensing, conducted
by MPD;
“(F) Subsection 2337.2(d) of Title 24 of the District of Columbia
Municipal Regulations (24 DCMR § 2337.2(d)), relating to concealed carry pistol licensing,
conducted by MPD;
“(G) The District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985,
effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01 et seq.) (“Health
Occupations Revision Act”), relating to licensed health professionals regulated by the
Department of Health and the health-licensing boards established under the Health Occupations
Revision Act, conducted by the Department of Health;
“(H) The Department of Corrections Criminal Background Investigation
Authorization Act of 1998, effective June 19, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-126; D.C. Official Code § 24-
211.41), relating to Department of Corrections employees, including non-probationary
employees, conducted by the Department of Corrections; and
“(I) Section 305 of the Law to Legalize Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games
and Bingo and Raffles for Charitable Purposes in the District of Columbia, effective May 3,
2019 (D.C. Law 22-312; D.C. Official Code § 36-621.05), relating to Office of Lottery and
Gaming applicants for a license or renewal of a license, conducted by the Office of Lottery and
Gaming.”.
Sec. 3023. Section 202 of the Criminal Background Checks for the Protection of Children
Act of 2004, effective April 13, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-353; D.C. Official Code § 4-1501.02), is
amended by adding a new paragraph (1A) to read as follows:
“(1A) “Appropriate personnel authority” means a District of Columbia
government agency with authority over personnel, hiring, or volunteer decisions for a covered
child or youth services provider.”.
SUBTITLE D. PUBLIC SAFETY GRANTS
Sec. 3031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Public Safety Grants Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 3032. Section 3023 of the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice
Establishment Act of 2011, effective September 6, 2023 (D.C. Law 25-50; D.C. Official Code §
1-301.192), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (4)(J) is amended to read as follows:
72

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(J) Implementing other innovative strategies to promote public safety,
such as providing youth safety services.”.
(2) A new paragraph (8) is added to read as follows:
“(8) The Deputy Mayor shall issue no less than the following amounts in total
grant awards pursuant to this subsection:
“(A) In Fiscal Year 2026, $410,030; and
“(B) In Fiscal Year 2027, $700,000.”.
(b) Subsection (d)(6) is amended to read as follows:
“(6) The Deputy Mayor shall issue no less than the following amounts in total
grant awards pursuant to this subsection:
“(A) In Fiscal Year 2026, $950,000; and
“(B) In Fiscal Year 2027, $900,000.”.
Sec. 3033. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of the effective date of the Fiscal Year 2026 Revised Local
Budget Adjustment Emergency Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on June 23, 2026
(Enrolled version of Bill 26-662).
TITLE IV. PUBLIC EDUCATION SYSTEM
SUBTITLE A. UNIFORM PER STUDENT FUNDING FORMULA
Sec. 4001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Funding for Public Schools and Public Charter Schools
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4002. The Uniform Per Student Funding Formula for Public Schools and Public
Charter Schools Act of 1998, effective March 26, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-207; D.C. Official Code §
38-2901 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 104(a) (D.C. Official Code § 38-2903(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“is $15,070 per student for Fiscal Year 2026 and $14,110 for subsequent fiscal years” and
inserting the phrase “is $15,648 per student for Fiscal Year 2027 and $14,632 per student for
subsequent fiscal years” in its place.
(b) Section 105 (D.C. Official Code § 38-2904) is amended by striking the tabular array
and inserting the following tabular array in its place:
“Grade Level Weighting Per Pupil Allocation in FY 2027
“Pre-Kindergarten 3 1.34
$20,968
“Pre-Kindergarten 4 1.30 $20,342
“Kindergarten 1.30 $20,342
73

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Grades 1-5 1.00 $15,648
“Grades 6-8 1.08 $16,900
“Grades 9-12 1.22 $19,091
“Alternative program 1.58 $24,724
“Special education school 1.17 $18,308
“Adult 1.00 $15,648
”.
(c) Section 106(c) (D.C. Official Code § 38-2905(c)) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) The supplemental allocations shall be calculated by applying weightings to the
foundation level as follows:
“Special education add-ons:
“Level/ Program Definition Weighting Per Pupil Allocation in
FY 2027
“Level 1 Special 8 hours or less per school week of 0.97 $15,179
Education specialized services
“Level 2 Special More than 8 hours and less than or 1.20 $18,778
Education equal to 16 hours per school week of
specialized services
“Level 3 Special More than 16 hours and less than or 1.97 $30,827
Education equal to 24 hours per school week of
specialized services
“Level 4 Special More than 24 hours per school week 3.49 $54,612
Education of specialized services which may
include instruction in a self-
contained (dedicated) special
education school other than
residential placement
“Special Funding provided in addition to 0.099 $1,549
Education special education level add-on
Compliance funding on a per-student basis for
special education compliance
“Attorneys’ Fees Funding provided in addition to 0.089 $1,393
Supplement special education level add-on
funding on a per-student basis for
attorneys’ fees
“General education add-ons:
74

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Level/ Program Definition Weighting Per Pupil Allocation in
FY 2027
“Elementary ELL Additional funding for English 0.50 $7,824
language learners in grades PK3-5
“Secondary ELL Additional funding for English 0.75 $11,736
language learners in grades 6-12,
alternative students, adult students,
and students in special education
schools
“At-risk (general) Additional funding for students in 0.30 $4,694
foster care, who are homeless, on
TANF or SNAP, or behind grade
level in high school
“At-risk High Funding provided in addition to at- 0.06 $939
School Over-age risk (general) funding for students
Supplement who are behind grade level in high
school
“At-risk > 40% Funding provided in addition to at- 0.07 $1,095
Concentration risk (general) funding for the number
Supplement of at-risk students above 40%
enrolled in a school where at least
40% of the student population is at-
risk
“At-risk > 70% Funding provided in addition to at- 0.07 $1,095
Concentration risk (general) funding and at-risk >
Supplement 40% concentration supplement
funding for the number of at-risk
students above 70% enrolled in a
school where at least 70% of the
student population is at-risk
“Residential add-ons:
“Level/ Program Definition Weighting Per Pupil Allocation in
FY 2027
“Residential Funding provided on a per-student 1.67 $26,132
(general) basis for a District of Columbia
Public Schools school or public
75

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
charter school that provides students
with room and board in a residential
setting, in addition to their
instructional program
“Level 1 Special Funding in addition to residential 0.37 $5,790
Education - funding to support the after-hours
Residential Level 1 special education needs of
students living in a DCPS school or
public charter school that provides
students with room and board in a
residential setting
“Level 2 Special Funding in addition to residential 1.34 $20,968
Education - funding to support the after-hours
Residential Level 2 special education needs of
students living in a DCPS school or
public charter school that provides
students with room and board in a
residential setting
“Level 3 Special Funding in addition to residential 2.89 $45,223
Education - funding to support the after-hours
Residential Level 3 special education needs of
students living in a DCPS school or
public charter school that provides
students with room and board in a
residential setting
“Level 4 Special Funding in addition to residential 2.89 $45,223
Education - funding to support the after-hours
Residential Level 4 special education needs of
students living in a DCPS school or
public charter school that provides
students with room and board in a
residential setting
“LEP/NEP - Funding in addition to residential 0.668 $ 10,453
Residential (general) funding to support the
after-hours limited and non-English
proficiency needs of students living
in a DCPS school or public charter
school that provides students with
76

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
room and board in a residential
setting
“Special education add-ons for students with an extended school year (“ESY”) services
indicated in their individualized education programs (“IEPs”):
“Level/ Definition Weighting Per Pupil
Program Allocation in
FY 2027
“Special Additional funding to support the summer school 0.063 $986
Education or program need for Level 1 special education
Level 1 ESY students with ESY services indicated in their
IEPs
“Special Additional funding to support the summer school 0.227 $3,552
Education or program need for Level 2 special education
Level 2 ESY students with ESY services indicated in their
IEPs
“Special Additional funding to support the summer school 0.491 $7,683
Education or program need for Level 3 special education
Level 3 ESY students with ESY services indicated in their
IEPs
“Special Additional funding to support the summer school 0.491 $7,683
Education or program need for Level 4 special education
Level 4 ESY students with ESY services indicated in their
IEPs
”.
SUBTITLE B. ADVANCED TECHNICAL CENTERS FUND
Sec. 4011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Advanced Technical Centers Fund Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4012. The State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000, effective October 21,
2000 (D.C. Law 13-176; D.C. Official Code § 38-2601 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 7f-2 to read as follows:
“Sec. 7f-2. Advanced Technical Centers Fund.
77

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Advanced Technical Centers Fund (“ATC
Fund”), which shall be administered by OSSE in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
“(b) There shall be deposited into the ATC Fund money paid to the District by private
entities for the rental, use, or maintenance of space within an Advanced Technical Center
facility.
“(c) Money in the ATC Fund shall be used to pay costs incurred by OSSE in operating
and administering Advanced Technical Centers.
“(d) Any money remaining available in the ATC Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.
“(e) For the purposes of this section, the term “Advanced Technical Center” shall have
the same meaning as provided in section 7f-1(d)(1).”.
SUBTITLE C. DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA PUBLIC SCHOOLS FOOD
SERVICES FUND
Sec. 4021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “District of Columbia Public Schools Food Services
Fund Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4022. Section 5 of the District of Columbia Food Services Act, approved October 8,
1951 (65 Stat. 369: D.C. Official Code § 38-804), is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 5. Food Services Fund.
“(a) There is established as a special fund the District of Columbia Public Schools Food
Services Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Chancellor of the District of
Columbia Public Schools in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
“(b) All revenue derived from the operation of food services, as defined in section 1, of
the District of Columbia Public Schools shall be deposited in the Fund.
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used for the operation or improvement of food services
in the District of Columbia Public Schools.
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any
funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year
limitation.”.
SUBTITLE D. ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL BREAKFAST SERVING MODEL
78

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Alternative School Breakfast Serving Model Subsidy
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4032. Section 102(c)(4A) of the Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27,
2010 (D.C. Law 18-209; D.C. Official Code § 38-821.02(c)(4A)), is repealed.
SUBTITLE E. EDUCATION THROUGH EMPLOYMENT PROGRAM
Sec. 4041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Education Through Employment Data System
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4042. Section 202(b-1) of the Department of Education Establishment Act of 2007,
effective June 12, 2007 (D.C. Law 17-9; D.C. Official Code § 38-191(b-1)), is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “centralized data system to collect,
analyze, and publish” and inserting the phrase “centralized data system in the District
government to collect, analyze, share, and publish” in its place.
(b) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) The centralized data system may incorporate relevant data, including
education data and workforce data, to the maximum extent allowed by federal law and
notwithstanding the provisions of any District law otherwise limiting the sharing of such
information.”.
(c) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “education data for grades” and
inserting the phrase “education data for early childhood and grades” in its place.
(d) New paragraphs (2A) and (2B) are added to read as follows:
“(2A) Each agency of the District government, including independent agencies,
may share health and human services data with the Deputy Mayor for Education to the maximum
extent allowed by federal law and notwithstanding the provisions of any District law otherwise
limiting the sharing of such information.
“(2B) The Deputy Mayor for Education may share or redisclose otherwise
confidential education data, workforce data, and health and human services data within the
centralized data system with federal, state, and local governmental agencies, and the agents and
contractors of such governmental agencies, to the maximum extent allowed by federal law and
notwithstanding the provisions of any District law otherwise limiting the sharing of such data
and information, to:
“(A) Evaluate the effectiveness of education and workforce-related
programs;
79

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Perform financial analysis related to the impact and return on
investment of publicly funded programming;
“(C) Assess and prepare reports on the operation and performance of
education and workforce-related programs; and
“(D) Establish and implement collaborative management and information
systems between federal, state, and local government agencies delivering or supporting
education, social services, or workforce services for a shared population.”.
(e) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language of subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase
“individual and aggregate student performance” and inserting the phrase “individual-level
information that tracks a student’s academic and personal progress from early learning through
postsecondary education and into employment” in its place.
(2) A new paragraph (A-i) is added to read as follows:
“(A-i) “Health and human services data” means:
“(i) Information within the scope of section 101(3)(B) and (C) of
the Data Sharing and Information Coordination Amendment Act of 2010, effective December 4,
2010 (D.C. Law 18-273; D.C. Official Code § 7-241(3)(B) and (C)); and
“(ii) Birth records.”.
(3) Subparagraph (B) is amended as follows:
(A) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended as striking the phrase “; and” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(B) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the period and inserting
the phrase “; and” in its place.
(C) A new sub-subparagraph (iv) is added to read as follows:
“(iv) Confidential UC information, as that term is defined in 20
CFR § 603.2(b).”.
SUBTITLE F. UNIVERSAL PAID LEAVE
Sec. 4051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Universal Paid Leave Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 4052. Title I of the Universal Paid Leave Amendment Act of 2016, effective April 7,
2017 (D.C. Law 21-264; D.C. Official Code § 32-541.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 103(b-1) (D.C. Official Code § 32-541.03(b-1)) is amended by striking the
phrase “section 104a(b)(1), shall” and inserting the phrase “section 104a(b)(1) or revised
certifications pursuant to section 104a(b)(5), shall” in its place.
80

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Section 104 (D.C. Official Code § 32-541.04) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (e-1) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language of paragraph (3) is amended by striking the
phrase “on or after October 1, 2022” and inserting the phrase “on or after October 1, 2022, and
before October 1, 2026” in its place.
(B) New paragraphs (4) and (5) are added to read as follows:
“(4) For claims filed on or after October 1, 2026, and before October 1, 2030, the
maximum duration for each type of paid-leave benefits within a 52-workweek period shall be:
“(A) 12 workweeks of qualifying parental leave;
“(B) 6 workweeks of qualifying family leave, notwithstanding any other
provision of this title;
“(C) 10 workweeks of qualifying medical leave, notwithstanding any other
provision of this title; and
“(D) 2 workweeks of qualifying pre-natal leave.”.
“(5) For claims filed on or after October 1, 2030, the maximum duration for each
type of paid-leave benefits within a 52-week workweek period shall be:
“(A) 12 workweeks of qualifying parental leave;
“(B) 12 workweeks of qualifying family leave;
“(C) 12 workweeks of qualifying medical leave; and
“(D) 2 workweeks of qualifying pre-natal leave.”.
(2) Subsection (g) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (6)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “On October 1,
2021, and on October 1 of each successive year,” and inserting the phrase “On October 1, 2021,
October 1, 2022, October 1, 2023, October 1, 2024, and October 1, 2025,” in its place.
(B) A new paragraph (7) is added to read as follows:
“(7)(A) On October 1, 2026, the maximum weekly benefit amount shall be
$1,100, and on October 1 of each successive year, the maximum weekly benefit amount
provided in this subsection shall increase in proportion to the annual average increase, if any, in
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, Washington-Baltimore Metropolitan area
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the
previous calendar year; provided, that the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia
shall certify that funds are sufficient in the Universal Paid Leave Fund each year before the
maximum weekly benefit amount increases pursuant to this paragraph.
“(B) Any increase under this paragraph shall be adjusted to the nearest
multiple of $1.”.
(c) Section 104a(b) (D.C. Official Code § 32-541.04a(b)) is amended by adding new
paragraphs (4) and (5) to read as follows:
“(4) At the request of the Mayor, the CFO shall provide a preliminary certification,
81

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
consistent with the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection, after March 1, to account for
any statutory amendments the Mayor proposes to submit with her or his annual submission of the
District’s budget and financial plan (“annual budget”) to the Council. The amounts included in
the preliminary certification may be incorporated by the Mayor into the Mayor’s annual budget
submission to the Council if the statutory amendments are transmitted by the Mayor to the
Council with the Mayor’s annual budget submission.
“(5) Before October 1 of each year, the CFO shall issue a revised certification,
consistent with the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection, to account for any statutory
or regulatory changes affecting the revenues or expenditures of the paid-leave program or the
balance of the Universal Paid Leave Fund that took effect after the issuance of the certification
issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection.”.
Sec. 4053. Section 1152(i) of the Universal Paid Leave Implementation Fund Act of
2016, effective October 8, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-160; D.C. Official Code § 32-551.01(i)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(i) The balance in the Fund shall not fall below the equivalent of 6 months of benefits
provided pursuant to the Act, at any time during a fiscal year. If the Chief Financial Officer
determines that the balance in the Fund will fall below the equivalent of 6 months of benefits
during a fiscal year, the Chief Financial Officer shall promptly notify the Mayor and the Council
and present a plan, including recommended legislative changes, if any, to address the shortfall. If
the balance in the Fund falls below the equivalent of 3 months of benefits, the District shall
immediately cease any further payments of benefits. If payment of benefits is ceased in
accordance with this section, payment of benefits shall not resume until the Fund balance is
equal to the equivalent of 9 months of benefits.”.
SUBTITLE G. CERTIFIED NURSE AIDE WORKFORCE SUPPORT
Sec. 4061. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Certified Nurse Aide Workforce Support Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4062. Section 7l(a) of the State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000,
effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; D.C. Official Code § 38-2618(a)), is amended as
follows:
(a) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
(b) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) By August 30, 2027, OSSE shall provide $150,000 in one time funding to the
same local university referenced in paragraph (1) of this subsection to train and supervise at least
25 additional District high school students in the summer to become certified nurse aides,
82

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
pursuant to section 907 of the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985,
effective July 7, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-18; D.C. Official Code § 3-1209.07).”.
SUBTITLE H. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATOR PAY EQUITY FUND
Sec. 4071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4072. The Day Care Policy Act of 1979, effective September 19, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-
16; 23 D.C. Official Code § 4-401 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 11b (D.C. Official Code § 4-410.02) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language of subsection (b-1)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Child development facilities that enter or have entered into a contract or
agreement with the Department to receive monies from the Early Childhood Educator Pay
Equity Fund shall use such monies paid to them between October 1, 2025, through September
30, 2027, to pay, at minimum, the salaries for assistant and lead teachers listed in the following
tables from January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2027:”.
(b) Section 11d(b) (D.C. Official Code § 4-410.04(b)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (6) is added to read as follows:
“(6) In Fiscal Year 2027, $73,500,000 in local funds.”.
SUBTITLE I. COMMUNITY SCHOOLS GRANT PROGRAM
Sec. 4081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Community Schools Grant Program Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4082. Section 403 of the Community Schools Incentive Act of 2012, effective June
19, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-142; D.C. Official Code § 38-754.03), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (d)(6) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
provided, that the Community Schools Advisory Committee shall not convene from the effective
date of the Fiscal Year 2027 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis
on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-724), until after the date on which the Community
Schools Task Force submits the report described in subsection (i) of this section.” in its place.
(b) Subsection (h) is amended to read as follows:
83

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(h) In Fiscal Year 2027, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”)
shall award the Fiscal Year 2022 Community Schools Incentive Initiative Grant recipients a sixth
year of grant funding and the Fiscal Year 2024 Community Schools Incentive Initiative Grant
recipients a fourth year of grant funding totaling, for the 2 cohorts, the amount of $2,400,000,
which shall be disbursed in equal amounts of $160,000 to each of the 15 participating
partnerships in Fiscal Year 2027.”.
(c) A new subsection (i) is added to read as follows:
“(i)(1) There is established a Community Schools Task Force (“Task Force”) to provide
recommendations on how to design, implement, and scale cohesive, strategic, District-wide
community schools programming.
“(2) The Task Force shall be composed of the Chairman of the Council
(“Chairman”), or his or her designee, and 15 District residents, representing the following
entities or groups:
“(A) Three community-based organizations with a history of sustained
partnership with schools in providing wraparound services, designated by the Chairman;
“(B) Two OSSE employees, who are, or who have been, involved in
community school programming or policy, designated by the State Superintendent of Education;
“(C) One person with knowledge of and experience supporting a group of
Connected Schools at District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”), designated by the
Chancellor of DCPS;
“(D) One person with knowledge of and experience supporting a
community schools initiative in public charter schools, designated by the Chairman;
“(E) Two DCPS school leaders, one of whom is or has been involved in
community school efforts and one who has not been the leader of a community school to date,
designated by the Chancellor of DCPS;
“(F) Two public charter school leaders, one of whom is or has been
involved in community school efforts and one who has not been the leader of a community
school to date, designated by the Chairman;
“(G) Three researchers or academics with expertise in education or policy,
designated by the Chairman; and
“(H) One member of the State Board of Education, designated by the
Chairman.
“(3) The Chairman, or his or her designee, shall serve as the Chairperson of the
Task Force.
“(4) The Task Force shall submit a report to the Mayor and the Council by
February 28, 2027, that:
“(A) Provides a common definition for “community school” in the District
of Columbia;
84

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Describes the following:
“(i) The differences between the DCPS Connected Schools
Program and the Incentive Initiative, including existing performance measures for evaluating the
success of District community schools programming and the benefits and challenges of scaling
one or both programs;
“(ii) Different funding and staffing models for community schools
programming;
“(iii) The benefits and challenges for different community schools
programming funding mechanisms;
“(iv) Evidence-based research on community school programming;
“(v) The national landscape for community schools programming,
including adult-to-student ratios and appropriate staffing models at exemplar districts; and
“(vi) The local landscape for community schools programming
including best practices at existing community schools and funding sources at DCPS and public
charter schools not receiving funding from the DCPS Connected Schools Program or the
Incentive Initiative; and
“(C) Makes recommendations for the following:
“(i) How to scale DCPS and public charter school community
schools programming under different funding scenarios;
“(ii) How personnel should be deployed to support community
schools programming;
“(iii) The provision of centralized administrative supports for
professional learning, technical assistance, and the coordination of services for schools that
integrate community schools programming;
“(iv) An equitable rubric for identifying schools that would most
benefit from community school programming;
“(v) Common performance measures to evaluate the success of
community schools programming in improving academic achievement, student attendance,
student health, family engagement; and
“(vi) The role, composition, and purpose of the Community
Schools Advisory Committee.
“(5) For the purposes of this subsection, the term “community school
programming” means programming, curricula, and interventions at a public school or public
charter school that integrate coordinated services, supports, and activities offered at and in
partnership with the school, during or outside the regular school day, that is informed by a
school-community needs and assets assessment, developed and sustained through collaborative
leadership structures, and designed to improve academic achievement, student attendance,
85

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
student health, family engagement, and the skills, capacity, and well-being of the surrounding
community’s residents.”.
Sec. 4083. Section 4082(b) shall apply as of the effective date of the Fiscal Year 2027
Budget Support Emergency Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled
version of Bill 26-724).
SUBTITLE J. DCPS EDUCATOR EVALUATION AND PERFORMANCE
WORKING GROUP
Sec. 4091. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “DCPS Educator Evaluation and Performance
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4092. Title XIII-A of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
Personnel Act of 1978, effective June 10, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-124; D.C. Official Code § 1-
613.51 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 1352a to read as follows:
“Sec. 1352a. DCPS Educator Evaluation and Performance Working Group.
“(a) There is established a DCPS Educator Evaluation and Performance Working Group
(“Working Group”), which shall provide to the Mayor and the Council comprehensive
recommendations for revisions to the District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”)
educator-performance evaluation system.
“(b)(1) The Working Group shall be composed of the Chairman of the Council, or his or
her designee, the Chancellor of DCPS, or his or her designee, and 12 individuals designated by
the Chairman of the Council, representing the following entities or groups:
“(A) Current or former educators, at least one of whom shall be chosen
from a list submitted by the Washington Teachers Union;
“(B) Current or former DCPS employees of the Teamsters, American
Federation of State, County, and Municipal Employees, and Council of School Officers
bargaining units, at least one of whom shall be chosen from a list submitted by those unions;
“(C) Current or former school leaders, at least one of whom shall be
chosen from a list submitted by the Chancellor;
“(D) DCPS central staff chosen from a list submitted by the Chancellor;
“(E) Researchers or academics with expertise in educator evaluation
systems; and
“(F) The State Board of Education.
“(2) The Chairman, or his or her designee, shall serve as the Chairperson of the
Working Group.
86

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) The Working Group shall convene beginning in November 2026 and meet regularly
until the report required in subsection (d) of this section is published.
“(d) By November 1, 2027, the Working Group shall submit a report to the Mayor and
the Council that recommends a new method for evaluating educator performance that considers
the manner, content, and process by which educators are evaluated, the incentives and
consequences associated with the results of the evaluation, training required for both evaluators
and educators, resources required, and future changes to the system. The report shall assess:
“(1) Criteria for evaluating educators, which shall include both objective and
subjective measures;
“(2) Logistical details concerning evaluations, including who participates in
evaluations, the frequency of evaluations, formative evaluations, and processes for adjudicating
disputes in evaluations;
“(3) Incentives and consequences for evaluation scores, including compensation,
additional responsibilities, and professional development;
“(4) Training for educators subject to evaluation, training for evaluators, and
considerations to reduce bias in evaluations;
“(5) Processes for adopting future changes to the educator evaluation; and
“(6) Resources required to implement the recommended personnel evaluation
system within the funds provided to DCPS through the Uniform Per Student Funding Formula.
“(e) For the purposes of this section, the term “educator” means a DCPS staff member
required to undergo evaluation as determined by that staff member’s collective bargaining unit,
and includes teachers, librarians, counselors, school-based social workers and psychologists,
related service providers, speech language pathologists, special education coordinators, program
coordinators and deans, instructional coaches, aides, office staff, custodial staff, and school
administrators.”.
SUBTITLE K. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION MICROCENTERS
Sec. 4101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Early Childhood Education Microcenter Emergency
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4102. Co-location of early childhood education microcenters in public school
buildings.
(a) By May 31, 2027, the District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”), in coordination
with the Department of General Services, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education,
the Department of Buildings, and any other relevant District agencies or stakeholders, shall
conduct a planning and design study to assess the feasibility of establishing early childhood
education microcenters in public school buildings. The study shall:
87

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Assess the facility, licensing, operational, staffing, and funding requirements
for microcenters;
(2) Evaluate how microcenters and existing in-school early childhood centers
could support educator recruitment and retention in the District;
(3) Recommend policy changes necessary to implement microcenters and
prioritize the children of educators and staff in existing in-school early childhood centers;
(4) Include a cost-modeling analysis for the implementation of at least 3
microcenters that includes tiered levels of tuition based on childcare costs, savings from rent and
facilities costs, and school employees’ salary scales; and
(5) Recommend timelines and costs for implementing 3 or more microcenters.
(b)(1) By September 30, 2027, based on the findings in the planning and design study
conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, DCPS, in consultation with the Deputy
Mayor for Education, shall identify not fewer than 3 school buildings to host microcenters for the
purpose of providing infant and toddler child care for children of educators and staff at the host
school and nearby schools. Each selected school building shall include at least one classroom or
comparable space suitable for conversion into a licensed child development center serving
infants, toddlers, or both.
(2) In selecting host sites, DCPS shall consider:
(A) The demonstrated need among educators and staff at the host school
and nearby schools;
(B) Geographic location of the host schools, with an emphasis on whether
the host site is located where educators and staff at multiple schools may reasonably access
childcare;
(C) Whether the host school has underutilized classroom space or other
suitable space that may be converted into a childcare facility without reducing instructional
programming space for enrolled students, taking into consideration the school’s current and
projected enrollment and future plans to modernize the school;
(D) The feasibility and cost of retrofitting the space to comply with
applicable child development facility licensing, building, and safety requirements; and
(E) The availability of age-appropriate outdoor space.
(c)(1) DCPS shall enter into a lease for a minimum of 5 years with one or more child
development facility operators, community-based organizations, or other qualified entities to
operate each microcenter at the host schools selected pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The agreement shall specify:
(A) The responsibilities of DCPS, including facilities maintenance,
utilities, security, custodial services, repairs, and capital improvements;
(B) The responsibilities of the operator to obtain and maintain all required
licenses, certifications, and appropriate staffing levels;
88

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) The tuition structure for educators and staff at the host and nearby
schools, including how any reduced facilities costs will be reflected in reduced tuition;
(D) The use of shared or ancillary spaces;
(E) Enrollment procedures for microcenter children; and
(F) Health, safety, emergency, and host and family communication
procedures.
(d) Enrollment in a microcenter shall be prioritized as follows:
(1) Children of teachers and assistant teachers employed at the host school who
are also District residents;
(2) Children of non-teaching staff, including administrators, support staff, and
non-instructional staff employed at the host school who are also District residents;
(3) Children of teachers and assistant teachers employed at nearby DCPS schools
who are also District residents;
(4) Children of non-teaching staff, including administrators, support staff, and
non-instructional staff employed at nearby DCPS schools who are also District residents;
(5) Children of teachers and assistant teachers employed at the host school who
are not District residents;
(6) Children of non-teaching staff, including administrators, support staff, and
non-instructional staff employed at the host school who are not District residents;
(7) Children of teachers and assistant teachers employed at nearby DCPS schools
who are not District residents;
(8) Children of non-teaching staff, including administrators, support staff, and
non-instructional staff employed at nearby DCPS schools who are not District residents; and
(9) Children of staff at the microcenter.
(e) For the purposes of this section, the term:
(1) “Child development facility” shall have the same meaning as provided in
section 2(2B) of the Day Care Policy Act of 1979, effective September 19, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-16;
D.C. Official Code § 4-401(2B)).
(2) “Community-based organization” shall have the same meaning as provided in
section 2(3A-i) of the Day Care Policy Act of 1979, effective September 19, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-
16; D.C. Official Code § 4-401(3A-i)).
(3) “Infant” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 2(4D) of the Day
Care Policy Act of 1979, effective September 19, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-16; D.C. Official Code § 4-
401(4D)).
(4) “Microcenter” means a licensed child development facility located inside a
DCPS building that provides childcare services to infants, toddlers, or both and has a licensed
capacity of not more than 12 children.
(5) “Nearby” means within a 2-mile radius of the host school.
89

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(6) “Toddler” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 2(7) of the Day
Care Policy Act of 1979, effective September 19, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-16; D.C. Official Code § 4-
401(7)).
SUBTITLE L. PUBLIC SCHOOL EXPERIENTIAL GRANT
Sec. 4111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Experiential Learning Grant Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4112. (a) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year
2027, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”) shall issue a $500,000 grant
to Live It Learn It, for the purpose of supporting a microgrant and support program to enhance
experiential learning at high-need schools.
(b) The grantee may use no more than 20% of the grant funds authorized in subsection (a)
of this section to fund indirect and direct administrative costs associated with administering the
grant.
(c) OSSE shall issue the grant no later than November 2, 2026.
SUBTITLE M. HEALTHY SCHOOLS
Sec. 4121. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Healthy Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4122. Section 102(c) of the Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010
(D.C. Law 18-209; D.C. Official Code § 38-821.02(c)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the word “shall” and inserting the word “may”
in its place.
(b) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the word “shall” and inserting the word “may”
in its place.
(c) Paragraph (12) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “In School Year 2025-
2026,” and inserting the phrase “In School Year 2026-2027,” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the date “November 26, 2025”
and inserting the date “November 25, 2026” in its place.
SUBTITLE N. DC SCORES FUNDING
Sec. 4131. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Poet-Athlete Grant Emergency Act of 2026”.
90

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4132. DC Scores Grant.
(a) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013
(D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2027, the Office of the
State Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”) shall issue a $93,091 grant to DC Scores for the
purpose of increasing enrollment capacity for a program that engages with students through
sports, poetry, and service.
(b) OSSE shall issue the grant described in subsection (a) of this section no later than
November 2, 2026.
SUBTITLE O. SPECIAL NEEDS PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FUNDING
Sec. 4141. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Special Needs Public Charter School Funding
Authorization Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4142. (a)(1) Notwithstanding section 2401(b)(2) of the District of Columbia School
Reform Act of 1995, approved April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321-136; D.C. Official Code § 38-
1804.01(b)(2)), in Fiscal Year 2027, the Public Charter School Board (“PCSB”) shall transmit
$2.7 million to St. Coletta Special Education Public Charter School (“School”), which shall be in
addition to any funds transmitted to the School pursuant to the Uniform Per Student Funding
Formula for Public Schools and Public Charter Schools Act of 1998, effective March 26, 1999
(D.C. Law 12-207; D.C. Official Code § 38-2901 et seq.).
(2) PCSB shall transfer the funds authorized in paragraph (1) of this subsection to
a bank designated by the School no later than November 2, 2026.
(3) Within 5 business days after transferring the funds to the bank designated by
the School pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, PCSB shall submit documentation to the
Council showing that such transfer occurred.
(b)(1) PCSB shall require the School to submit to it a quarterly accounting of all
expenditures made with the additional funds the School received pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section.
(2) PCSB may consider the School's failure to submit the quarterly accounting
required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection as fiscal mismanagement.
SUBTITLE P. CHILDCARE SUBSIDY PROGRAM
Sec. 4151. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Childcare Subsidy Program Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
91

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4152. Section 5a of the Day Care Policy Act of 1979, effective April 13, 1999 (D.C.
Law 12-216; D.C. Official Code § 4-404.01), is amended by adding a new subsection (d) to read
as follows:
“(d) In the event that funds appropriated for the purposes of this section are insufficient to
serve all eligible applicants in Fiscal Year 2027, the Department shall do the following, in order
of priority:
“(1) Limit, through the use of a waitlist, the number of new children for whom the
Mayor is providing supplemental payments pursuant to this section, consistent with federal
requirements; and
“(2) Revise, consistent with the availability of appropriations and any rules
promulgated pursuant to sections 10(h) and 11(a-1) and (b), the rates paid to child development
centers, homes, and in-home caregivers for the remainder of the fiscal year.”.
SUBTITLE Q. IMPLEMENTATION OF THE MATH TASK FORCE
RECOMMENDATIONS
Sec. 4161. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Math Task Force Recommendation Emergency Act of
2026”.
Sec. 4162. Definitions.
For the purposes of this subtitle, the term:
(1) “HQIM” means high-quality instructional materials, which are
comprehensive, rigorous, and evidence-based curricular materials that are aligned with the
District of Columbia content standards.
(2) “LEA” means local education agency, which is the District of Columbia
Public Schools system, any individual public charter school, or any group of public charter
schools operating under a single charter.
(3) “OSSE” means the Office of the State Superintendent of Education.
(4) “School” means a District of Columbia Public Schools school or public
charter school in the District of Columbia serving students in grades kindergarten through 12.
Sec. 4163. Requirements for high-quality instructional materials.
(a) Beginning October 31, 2026, and by October 31 of each year thereafter, each LEA
shall provide OSSE with:
(1) The name of the Tier 1 mathematics curricula in use by each school in the
LEA, disaggregated by school and grade or grade band within each school; and
(2) Other information OSSE requests related to mathematics instruction, data, and
HQIM.
92

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) By no later than December 15, 2026, and by December 15 of each year thereafter,
OSSE shall publish the Tier 1 mathematics curricula in use by each LEA on its website,
disaggregated by school and grade or grade band within each school.
SUBTITLE R. ADULT LITERACY ACCESS GRANT
Sec. 4171. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Adult Literacy Access Grant Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4172. Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2027, the
Office of the State Superintendent for Education (“OSSE”) shall issue a grant of $1,400,000 to
Washington Literacy Center, to provide adult foundational literacy, digital literacy, opportunity
youth programming, employment retention and career advancement support, workforce training
and preparation, and other related educational services.
SUBTITLE S. STUDENT ATTENDANCE INCENTIVE PILOT
Sec. 4181. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Student Attendance Incentive Pilot Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 4182. The State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000, effective October 21,
2000 (D.C. Law 13-176; D.C. Official Code § 38-2601 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 7m to read as follows:
“Sec. 7m. Fifty Dollar a Week Pilot Program.
“(a) By May 1, 2027, OSSE shall contract with an organization that has experience
assessing the effectiveness of a cash transfer program for high school students, including the
impact of direct cash transfers on financial literacy, student wellbeing, school attendance, and
academic achievement, to design and administer a Fifty Dollar a Week Pilot Program (“Pilot
Program”), consistent with the requirements of this section.
“(b) By July 1, 2027, the contract awardee shall:
“(1) Design and publish a methodology for assigning students at participating
schools to control and intervention groups;
“(2) Design and publish a methodology for measuring the impact of the Pilot
Program on financial literacy, student wellbeing, school attendance, and academic achievement;
“(3) Identify an appropriate method to disburse the weekly direct cash stipend;
“(4) Issue a call for applications to all participating schools; and
“(5) Select participating schools at which the Pilot Program will run during
School Year 2027-2028.
93

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) The contract awardee shall:
“(1) Assign students to control and intervention groups in accordance with the
methodology designed pursuant to subsection (b)(1) of this section;
“(2) Disburse the weekly direct cash stipend to participating students in
accordance with the method identified pursuant to subsection (b)(3) of this section;
“(3) Invite students at participating schools to enroll in the Pilot Program;
“(4) Enroll eligible students in the Pilot Program;
“(5) Administer the weekly direct cash stipend for a period of 40 weeks to eligible
students participating in the Pilot Program;
“(6) By March 31, 2028, submit a preliminary report that describes the schools
and students selected for the Pilot Program and the impact of direct cash transfers as measured
by the methodology developed pursuant to subsection (b)(2) of this section through the first half
of the school year;
“(7) By September 30, 2028, publish a final report, that evaluates the efficacy of
the Pilot Program and includes the following:
“(A) A description of how students utilized the cash stipend; and
“(B) A quantitative evaluation of the impact of the direct cash transfers on
financial literacy, student wellbeing, school attendance, and academic achievement; and
“(8) Transmit both the preliminary and final reports required pursuant to paragraphs
(6) and (7) of this subsection to the Office of the State Superintendent of Education and the
Council of the District of Columbia.
“(d) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Direct cash stipend” means recurring cash provided directly to high school
students.
“(2) “Participating school” means a public or public charter high school primarily
serving students ages 14 to 18 with an at-risk student population that exceeds 60% of the school’s
total enrollment that is participating in the Pilot Program.
“(3) “Eligible student” means a student enrolled in a participating school whose
parent or guardian consents, consistent with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of
1974, approved August 21, 1974 (88 Stat. 571; 20 U.S.C. § 1232g), to the student’s participation
in the Pilot Program.”.
SUBTITLE T. LEAD EXPOSURE PREVENTION IN PUBLIC CHARTER
SCHOOLS
Sec. 4191. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Lead Exposure Prevention in Public Charter Schools
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
94

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4192. Section 501a of the Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective September 23,
2017 (D.C. Law 22-21; D.C. Official Code § 38-825.01a), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) By October 1, 2026, DGS shall contract with a third-party entity to provide public
charter schools with services in Fiscal Year 2027 necessary to assist each school in meeting the
requirements of paragraph (2) of this subsection. DGS’s contract shall require the contractor to,
at minimum:
“(A) Maintain an inventory of all drinking water sources at each public
charter school;
“(B) Purchase, install, and replace filters as needed, and at least annually,
for each of the drinking water sources at a public charter school;
“(C) Conduct lead testing after filters have been installed; and
“(D) Provide reports and documentation related to services performed.”.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
“(3)(A) The contractor selected pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
provide DGS and each public charter school with written proof that the services the contractor
performed for the public charter school complied with the requirements of paragraph (2) of this
subsection.”.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the acronym “PCSB” and
inserting the phrase “PCSB and DGS” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
(4) Paragraph (6) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “The Mayor” and
inserting the phrase “The Mayor or the Mayor’s designee” in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (i) is repealed.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended by striking the period and
inserting the phrase “; and” in its place.
(iii) A new sub-subparagraph (iii) is added to read as follows:
“(iii) DGS shall identify the public charter school as noncompliant
with the requirements of this section on the agency’s website and inform PCSB, which shall post
a link on its website to DGS’s list of noncompliant public charter schools.”.
(5) A new paragraph (9) is added to read as follows:
“(9) The performance of services by DGS or its contractor pursuant to this
subsection shall not be interpreted to modify or otherwise amend the terms of any lease
95

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
agreement pursuant to which a public charter school occupies District-owned or controlled real
property except to the extent consistent with this subsection.”.
(b) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “Within 120 days of the effective
date of the Childhood Lead Exposure Prevention Amendment Act of 2017, passed on 2nd
reading on July 11, 2017 (Enrolled version of Bill 22-29), the Mayor” and inserting the phrase
“The Mayor” in its place.
TITLE V. HUMAN SUPPORT SERVICES
SUBTITLE A. RAPID RE-HOUSING
Sec. 5001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Rapid Re-Housing Continuation Clarification
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5002. Section 22a-1(d)(1) of the Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, effective
December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; D.C. Official Code § 4-754.36a-1(d)(1)), is amended to
read as follows:
“(d)(1) As of September 3, 2025, a client who received continuation of services due to
the filing of an appeal of a notice of program exit from a Rapid Re-Housing program before
September 3, 2025, when the exit was due to the end of a time limit for services to the client
under the program, shall be exited from the Rapid Re-Housing program when the client’s time in
the program reaches 24 months or on September 30, 2025, whichever date is later; except, that if,
before the later of the 2 foregoing dates, an administrative review decision is issued upholding
the notice of program exit due to the end of a time limit for services to the client under the
program, the client shall be exited from the Rapid Re-Housing program on the date the
administrative review decision upholding the notice of program exit is issued.”.
SUBTITLE B. AIDS DRUG ASSISTANCE FUND
Sec. 5011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “AIDS Drug Assistance Fund Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5012. Section 4907b of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of
2001, effective February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-155; D.C. Official Code § 7-736.02), is
amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4907b. AIDS Drug Assistance Program Fund.”.
96

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Communicable and Chronic
Disease Prevention and Treatment Fund” and inserting the phrase “AIDS Drug Assistance
Program Fund” in its place.
(c) Subsections (b), (c), and (d) are amended to read as follows:
“(b) Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited into the Fund:
“(1) Rebates provided by pharmaceutical companies to the District pursuant to
section 340B of the Public Health Service Act, approved November 4, 1992 (106 Stat. 4967; 42
U.S.C. § 256b), for medications included in the AIDS Drug Assistance Program (“ADAP”)
formulary; and
“(2) Insurance refunds and excess premium tax credits recovered by the District
from ADAP program participants.
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used to administer ADAP, including the procurement of
HIV/AIDS medications and the provision of HIV care and services for eligible District residents,
and for the fulfillment of federal grant-matching requirements for ADAP.
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Any money in the Communicable and Chronic Disease Prevention and Treatment
Fund as of September 30, 2026 shall be considered part of the Fund.”.
SUBTITLE C. COMMERCIAL PET FACILITIES
Sec. 5021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Commercial Pet Facility Regulation Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5022. The Animal Control Act of 1979, effective October 18, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-30;
D.C. Official Code § 8-1801 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 8-1801) is amended by adding a new paragraph (19)
to read as follows:
“(19) “Veterinarian” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 101(16)
of the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective March 25, 1986
(D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01(16)).”.
(b) Section 5(e-1) (D.C. Official Code § 8-1804(e-1)) is amended by striking the phrase
“$2 of each fee” and inserting the phrase “25% of each fee” in its place.
(c) Section 11 (D.C. Official Code § 8-1810) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 11. Animal population health and education program.
“(a) The Mayor shall implement an animal population health and education program,
which shall include the provision of:
97

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) Animal care services, including:
“(A) Low-cost or no-cost preventive and emergency veterinary services;
and
“(B) Low-cost or no-cost spay and neuter clinic services; and
“(2) Educational services, including with respect to:
“(A) Pet care and safety, including pet care and safety in extreme weather
conditions or emergencies; and
“(B) District laws related to pet ownership.
“(b) The Mayor may establish eligibility standards for animal care services provided
pursuant to subsection (a)(1) of this section.”.
(d) Section 11a (D.C. Official Code § 8-1810.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) Pursuant to section 5(e-1), 25% of the amount collected from the annual license fees
for dogs pursuant to section 5(e) shall be deposited into the Fund.”.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used to implement the animal population health and
education program established by section 11.”.
(3) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
Sec. 5023. Section 202 of the Animal Protection Amendment Act of 2008, effective
December 5, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-281; D.C. Official Code § 8-1821.02), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) No person shall own or operate a commercial pet care facility without first
obtaining:
“(A) A basic business license with an Inspected Sales and Service license
endorsement pursuant to Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code; and
“(B) A health permit from the Mayor.
“(2) The Mayor shall issue rules to establish standards for the care and
management of animals in a commercial pet care facility, which may provide for:
“(A) Initial and periodic inspections of a facility; and
“(B) Disciplinary or other remedial action to be taken against the permit
holder for failure to comply with the standards of care and management established by the rules
or any District or federal law or regulation applicable to the facility, including summary
98

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
suspension of the permit where the failure presents an imminent danger to the health or safety of
a person or animal in the facility.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “an animal facility as defined in
section 3(2) of the Veterinary Practice Act of 1982, effective March 9, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-171;
D.C. Official Code § 3-502), or a licensed pet shop.” and inserting the phrase “a licensed pet
shop or a veterinary hospital, animal hospital, or fixed or mobile establishment where veterinary
medicine is practiced.” in its place.
Sec. 5024. Section 4902(a) of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of
2001, effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 7-731(a)), is amended by
adding a new paragraph (4A) to read as follows:
“(4A) Regulate commercial pet care facilities and commercial animal breeder
facilities, pursuant to Title II of the Animal Protection Amendment Act of 2008, effective
December 5, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-281; D.C. Official Code § 8-1821.01 et seq.);”.
SUBTITLE D. SCHOOL-BASED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM
STABILIZATION AND OVERSIGHT
Sec. 5031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “School-Based Behavioral Health Program Stabilization
and Oversight Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5032. Section 115b of the Department of Mental Health Establishment Amendment
Act of 2001, effective June 7, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-141; D.C. Official Code § 7-1131.17), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (f) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “Fiscal Year 2026” and insert the phrase “Fiscal
Years 2026 and 2027” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “shall be not less than $16,320,000” and insert the
phrase “shall be not less than $16,320,000 in Fiscal Year 2026 and, except as otherwise provided
in paragraph (2B) of this subsection, shall be not less than $13,200,000 in Fiscal Year 2027” in
its place.
(C) Strike the phrase “School Years 2023-2024 or 2024-2025” and insert
the phrase “School Years 2024-2025 or 2025-2026” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by adding new subparagraphs (B-i) and (B-ii) to
read as follows:
99

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B-i) Reduce the number of participating community-based organization
providers except in cases of voluntary withdrawal or substantiated and material performance
deficiencies that:
“(i) Are documented in writing;
“(ii) Relate directly to a provider’s failure to comply with
contractual, licensing, billing, clinical, or programmatic requirements that are clearly established
in written guidance and made publicly available or available upon request;
“(iii) Are not based solely on the Department’s preference for a
different staffing model or increased use of Department-employed clinicians; and
“(iv) Remain uncured after the provider has been given notice and
a reasonable opportunity to remedy the deficiency;
“(B-ii) Award a grant to an entity for the exclusive provision of telehealth
services at a school unless the school agrees to the telehealth model and is also assigned at least
one part-time onsite clinician or the school is an adult public charter school. This subparagraph
does not preclude a community-based organization from using telehealth services to supplement,
but not replace, in-person programmatic services;”.
(3) New paragraphs (2A) and (2B) are added to read as follows:
“(2A) In Fiscal Year 2027, the Department may utilize prevention specialists in
not more than 25 schools.
“(2B)(A) If the Department reduces the number of participating community-based
organization providers consistent with paragraph (2)(B-i) of this subsection, the Department may
reduce the total amount of grant funds awarded in Fiscal Year 2027 only to the extent necessary
to account for the:
“(i) Voluntary withdrawal of a community-based organization
provider from the program; or
“(ii) Removal of a provider for documented performance
deficiencies pursuant to paragraph (2)(B-i) of this subsection, where the Department is unable to
identify a replacement community-based organization provider.
“(B) The Department shall not reduce community-based
organization provider grant funding for the purpose of increasing the number of Department-
employed clinicians or increasing the proportion of services delivered directly by the
Department.”.
(b) A new subsection (f-1) is added to read as follows:
“(f-1) Notwithstanding subsection (f) of this section, in Fiscal Year 2027, the Department
shall permit not more than 4 public charter schools to directly hire behavioral health clinicians
where the school demonstrates the capacity, willingness, and ability to support and implement
behavioral health services; provided, that each clinician shall receive onsite clinical supervision
and shall perform duties exclusively related to the School-Based Behavioral Health program.”.
100

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(c) A new subsection (g-1) is added to read as follows:
“(g-1) By March 1, 2027, the Department shall, in collaboration with at least 2 leaders
from community-based organizations awarded grants under subsection (f) of this section, at least
4 program clinicians, including at least 2 clinicians employed by community-based
organizations, the Strengthening Families Through Behavioral Health Coalition, and The Center
for Health and Health Care in Schools at the Milken Institute School of Public Health at the
George Washington University, develop, and publish on the Department’s website and submit to
the Council:
“(1) Uniform, publicly available standards, protocols, and assignment criteria for
all clinicians participating in the program, including standardized roles, responsibilities,
supervision expectations, performance expectations, and evaluation processes applicable equally
to Department and community-based organization-employed clinicians performing comparable
functions;
“(2) A standardized evaluation framework for program clinicians that includes
objective measures related to service delivery, documentation compliance, timeliness of services,
school engagement, and student and family responsiveness, and requires evaluations on a
consistent schedule using the same criteria, metrics, and review processes; and
“(3) A methodology for tailoring program services to the individual needs of
schools, including consideration of student population, service utilization, community needs,
language access, and existing provider relationships.”.
SUBTITLE E. TOBACCO PERMIT FEES
Sec 5041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Tobacco Permit Fees Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 5042. Chapter 24 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “47-2404. Licenses.” and insert the phrase “47-2404.
Tobacco permits.” in its place.
(2) Add a new section designation to read as follows:
“47-2404.01. Smoking Cessation Fund.”.
(b) Section 47-2401 is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3B) is redesignated as paragraph (3D).
(2) New paragraphs (3B) and (3C) are added to read as follows:
101

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3B) The term “licensed wholesaler” means an individual who has obtained a
basic business license under Chapter 28 of this title and a wholesaler’s permit pursuant to § 47-
2404(b)(1).
“(3C) The term “licensed retailer” means an individual who has obtained a basic
business license under Chapter 28 of this title and a retailer’s permit pursuant to § 47-
2404(b)(2).”.
(c) Section 47-2404 of the District of Columbia Code is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-2404. Tobacco permits.”.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “license or licenses” and
inserting the phrase “permit or permits” in its place.
(3) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language is amended by striking the word “licenses” and
inserting the word “permits” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(i) Strike the word “licenses” and insert the word “permits” in its
place.
(ii) Strike the word “license” wherever it appears and insert the
word “permit” in its place.
(iii) Strike the word “licensee” both times it appears and insert the
word “permittee” in its place.
(iv) Strike the figure “$50” and insert the figure “$125” in its
place.
(C) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(i) Strike the word “licenses” and insert the word “permits” in its
place.
(ii) Strike the word “license” wherever it appears and insert the
word “permit” in its place.
(iii) Strike the word “licensee” both times it appears and insert the
word “permittee” in its place.
(iv) Strike the word “licensees” and insert the word “permittees” in
its place.
(v) Strike the figure “$15” and insert the figure “$75” in its place.
(D) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the word
“licenses” and inserting the word “permits” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the word “license”
and inserting the word “permit” in its place.
102

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(iii) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
(I) Strike the word “license” and insert the word “permit”
in its place.
(II) Strike the figure “$15” and insert the figure “$75” in its
place.
(4) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the word “licenses” and inserting the
word “permits” in its place.
(5) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) The Mayor may, by regulation, increase the permit fees imposed by subsection (b) of
this section and may establish fees for duplicate permits.”.
(6) Subsection (e) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the word “Licenses” and insert the word “Permits” in its place.
(B) Strike the word “licenses” both times it appears and insert the word
“permits” in its place.
(7) Subsection (f) is amended by striking the word “license” and inserting the
word “permit” in its place.
(8) Subsection (g) is amended by striking the phrase “The licenses required” and
inserting the phrase “The permits required” in its place.
(9) Subsection (h) is amended by striking the word “license” both times it appears
and inserting the word “permits” in its place.
(10) Subsection (h-1) is amended by striking the word “license” both times it
appears and inserting the word “permits” in its place.
(11) Subsection (i) is repealed.
(d) A new section 47-2404.01 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-2404.01. Smoking Cessation Fund.
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Smoking Cessation Fund (“Fund”), which
shall be administered by the Department of Health in accordance with this section.
“(b) There shall be deposited into the Fund:
“(1) All permit-related fees and fines collected pursuant to § 47-2404; and
“(2) Other funds as may be appropriated for that purpose.
“(c) The Fund shall be used for:
“(1) Efforts to reduce smoking of tobacco or any other plant product and other
uses of nicotine by District residents; and
“(2) Costs associated with administering tobacco permits pursuant to § 47-2404.
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
103

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
(e) Section 47-2409(a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the word “license” and inserting the
word “permit” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the word “license” and inserting the
word “permit” in its place.
(f) Section 47-2418(a) is amended by striking the word “licensed” and inserting the word
“permitted” in its place.
Sec. 5043. Section 4907e of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of
2001, effective September 18, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-217, D.C. Official Code § 7-736.05), is
amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4907e. JUUL Settlement Fund.”.
(b) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Tobacco Use Cessation Fund” and
inserting the phrase “JUUL Settlement Fund” in its place.
(c) Subsection (b)(1) is repealed.
SUBTITLE F. TRUANCY REDUCTION PILOT PROGRAM
Sec. 5051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Truancy Reduction Pilot Program Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5052. Section 7 of Article II of An Act To provide for compulsory school
attendance, for the taking of a school census in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes,
effective September 19, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-17; D.C. Official Code § 38-208), is amended as
follows:
(a) A new subsection (c-3) is added to read as follows:
“(c-3)(1)(A) By August 7, 2026, the Mayor shall identify no fewer than 10 educational
institutions in the District, with students enrolled in any grade 6 through 12, that had a truancy
rate greater than 30% in School Year 2025-26 to participate in a truancy pilot with the
Department of Human Services (“DHS”) during School Year 2026-27. The identified
educational institutions shall include at least one middle school.
“(B) The Mayor shall notify the identified educational institutions of their
participation in the truancy pilot at least 10 business days before the first day of instruction in
School Year 2026-27. The notice shall include appropriate agency contacts, timelines, and
procedures for complying with paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection.
104

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) The educational institutions identified pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall refer each student who is 14 years of age through 17 years of age to DHS no
later than 2 school days after the accrual of 15 unexcused full-day absences within a school year.
“(3) The educational institutions identified pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall refer each student who is 10 years of age through 13 years of age to DHS no
later than 2 school days after the accrual of 10 unexcused full-day absences within a school year.
“(4) DHS shall refer to the Child and Family Services Agency any student
referred under paragraph (3) of this subsection whose parent has not responded to DHS outreach
within 10 business days after that outreach or has declined services.
“(5) By March 31, 2027, DHS shall publish a preliminary report, and by
September 30, 2027, DHS shall publish a final report that, distinguishing data from each of the 3
academic years in which the truancy pilot has operated pursuant to this subsection and
subsections (c-1) and (c-2) of this section:
“(A) Describes the interventions and services provided through the
truancy pilot;
“(B) Provides the 5 most common reasons for unexcused absences for the
students referred to DHS, such as housing instability, transportation issues, or medical
emergencies;
“(C) Presents aggregate data on the 5 most common truancy intervention
services or programs that students referred to DHS utilized;
“(D) Provides the number of families referred to the Child and Family
Services Agency under paragraph (4) of this subsection and subsection (c-2)(4) of this section;
“(E) Provides an analysis that compares:
“(i) The attendance outcomes, academic performance, and
delinquency status of students referred to DHS to his or her attendance outcomes, academic
performance, and delinquency status during the same time period in the prior school year;
“(ii) The attendance outcomes, academic performance, and
delinquency status of students referred to DHS before and after the DHS referral during the
applicable time period for School Year 2026-27; and
“(iii) The attendance outcomes and academic performance of
educational institutions participating in the truancy pilot with the attendance and academic
performance during School Year 2026-27 of non-participating secondary educational institutions
that are socio-demographically similar to participating educational institutions;
“(F) Provides an analysis comparing the attendance outcomes and
academic performance of students:
“(i) Whose parents or guardians were not reached by DHS
outreach efforts;
“(ii) Whose parents or guardians declined DHS case
105

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
management; and
“(iii) Who completed case management;
“(G) Identifies:
“(i) Whether each educational institution participating in the
truancy pilot is a District of Columbia Public Schools Connected School or is served by a grantee
of the Community Schools Incentive Initiative administered by the Office of the State
Superintendent of Education (“Community Schools”);
“(ii) If a Community Schools participant, the name of the
Community Schools grantee; and
“(iii) The services offered through Community Schools or
Connected Schools at each participating educational institution;
“(H) Compares data and identifies trends across the 3 academic years
during which the truancy pilot has operated; and
“(I) Provides any other information DHS deems useful to the report.
“(6) Educational institutions participating in the truancy pilot shall be exempt
from the requirements of subsection (c) of this section for minor students who are 14 through 17
years of age.”.
(b) Subsection (e)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “subsections (c-1) and (c-2)” and
inserting the phrase “subsections (c-1), (c-2), and (c-3)” in its place.
Sec. 5053. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of August 1, 2026.
SUBTITLE G. TANF BENEFITS
Sec. 5061. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “District of Columbia Public Assistance Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5062. Section 552(c-4) of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982,
effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.52(c-4)), is amended to
read as follows:
“(c-4) The level of District-funded TANF assistance paid to each assistance unit
receiving benefits under section 511a(a-1) shall be as follows:
“(1) For Fiscal Year 2027, 100% of the Fiscal Year 2026 amount; and
“(2) For Fiscal Year 2028 and thereafter, $0.”.
106

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5063. (a) Section 5063 of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Amendment
Act of 2025, effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; 72 DCR 9825), is amended by
striking the date “October 1, 2026” and inserting the date “October 1, 2027” in its place.
(b) Section 5062 shall apply as of October 1, 2027.
SUBTITLE H. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES GRANTS
Sec. 5071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Department of Human Services Grant Emergency Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 5072. Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2027, the
Department of Human Services shall issue the following grants:
(1) $450,000 to Sasha Bruce Youthwork to operate a drop-in center serving
unhoused youth;
(2) $250,000 to Friendship Place to expand the AimHire job placement program
and connect unhoused residents with work; and
(3) $250,000 to A Wider Circle to support its work providing furniture and home
goods to low-income individuals and families.
SUBTITLE I. FOOD POLICY FUNCTIONS
Sec. 5081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Food Policy Functions Emergency Amendment Act of
2026.”
Sec. 5082. The Food Policy Council and Director Establishment Act of 2014, effective
March 10, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-191; D.C. Official Code § 48-311 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 48-314) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 5. Office of Food Policy.”.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) There is established an Office of Food Policy (“Office”) within the Department of
Health for the purpose of promoting equitable and sustainable food policies across the District
that increase food access and build a local food economy.
“(2) The Office shall be led by the Food Policy Director, who shall be hired and
employed by the Department of Health.”.
(3) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the word “Director” and inserting the
word “Office” in its place.
107

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Section 5a (D.C. Official Code § 48-314.01) is amended by striking the phrase
“Director of the Office of Planning” and inserting the phrase “Food Policy Director” in its place.
SUBTITLE J. FARMERS MARKET SUPPORT GRANTS
Sec. 5091. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Farmers Market Support Grants Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5092. The lead-in language of section 4939(d) of the Department of Health
Functions Clarification Act of 2001, effective August 23, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-27; D.C. Official
Code § 7-742.22(d)), is amended by striking the figure “$140,000” and inserting the figure
“$250,000” in its place.
SUBTITLE K. GROCERY ACCESS PILOT PROGRAM EXTENSION
Sec. 5101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Grocery Access Pilot Program Extension Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5102. Section 4907d of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of
2001, effective September 18, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-217; D.C. Official Code § 7-736.04), is
amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4907d. Establishment of the grocery store access pilot grant program.
“(a) The Department of Health shall establish a grocery access pilot grant program for the
purpose of providing at least 1,000 eligible District residents with membership to a grocery
delivery service at no cost in Fiscal Years 2025, 2026, and 2027.
“(b)(1) To be eligible to participate in the pilot program, an applicant shall be a resident
of the District.
“(2) At least 50% of participants in the pilot program shall be enrolled in a federal
or local public assistance program, including the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program,
Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families, National School Lunch Program free or reduced price meals,
Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program, Medicaid, or DC Healthcare Alliance.
“(3) When selecting participants for the pilot program, the Department of Health
shall give preference to applicants who live in “low food access areas,” as that term is defined in
section 4938(7), and enrolled in a public benefit program pursuant to paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
108

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) Upon the conclusion of the pilot program following Fiscal Year 2027, the
Department of Health shall make data collected on the outcomes of the pilot program publicly
available.”.
SUBTITLE L. 988 LIFELINE SUPPORT AND SUSTAINABILITY FUND
ESTABLISHMENT
Sec. 5111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “988 Lifeline Support and Sustainability Fund
Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5112. The Emergency and Non-Emergency Telephone Calling Systems Fund Act of
2000, effective October 19, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-172; D.C. Official Code § 34-1801 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Sections 602 through 608 are designated as Part A.
(b) Section 602(6C) (D.C. Official Code § 34-1801(6C)) is amended to read as follows:
“(6C) “Provider” means a person that provides wireline, wireless, Voice over Internet
Protocol, or prepaid telecommunications services to consumers within the District.”.
(c) A new Part B is added to read as follows:
“PART B.
“Sec. 611. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this part, the term:
“(1) “988 Lifeline” shall have the same meaning as in section 251(e)(4) of the
Communications Act of 1934, approved February 8, 1996 (110 Stat. 61; 47 U.S.C. § 251(e)(4)).
“(2) “988 fee” means the surcharge authorized by section 613.
“(3) “988 Fund” means the 988 Lifeline and Crisis Services Fund established by
section 612.
“(4) “Access line” means a wireline, Voice over Internet Protocol line, as defined
in 47 C.F.R. § 9.3, wireless telephone number, trunk, or other communication path that can
initiate a 988 Lifeline call.
“(5) “Prepaid wireless 988 charge” means the surcharge authorized by section
614.
“(6) “Shared plan” means a telecommunications service plan offered by a
provider that includes 2 or more access lines or mobile numbers.
“Sec. 612. 988 Lifeline and Crisis Services Fund.
“(a) Effective October 1, 2026, there is established as a special fund the 988 Lifeline and
Crisis Services Fund, which shall be administered by the Department of Behavioral Health, in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
“(b) Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited into the 988 Fund:
109

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) The 988 fee authorized by section 613; and
“(2) The prepaid wireless 988 charge authorized under section 614.
“(c)(1) Money in the 988 Fund shall be used to pay personnel and non-personnel costs
incurred by the District to implement, operate, sustain, expand, and improve the District’s 988
Lifeline and behavioral health crisis response continuum services provided in response to the 988
Lifeline; provided, that such costs are not otherwise reimbursable through Medicaid, Medicare,
federal or state-regulated health insurance plans, or disability insurers.
“(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, in Fiscal Year 2027, $2.4
million from the 988 Fund shall be used for the following purposes; provided, that the funds are
for services directly related to the 988 Lifeline:
“(A) $600,000 for community-based crisis stabilization beds that provide a
voluntary, trauma-informed, and non-coercive alternative to emergency psychiatric care
established by section 5117d of the Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013,
passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-724);
“(B) $1.3 million for the Children and Adolescent Mobile Psychiatric
Services program established by section 5117e of the Department of Behavioral Health
Establishment Act of 2013, passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill
26-724); and
“(C) $500,000 for the 988 Lifeline’s operational costs, including staffing,
training, technology infrastructure, coordination with crisis response services, and other costs
necessary to support the District’s behavioral health crisis response continuum.
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the 988 Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund
balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any
other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the 988 Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year
limitation.
“(e) The Mayor shall submit to the Council, as part of the annual budget and financial
plan, a request for an appropriation for expenditures from the 988 Fund.
“(f)(1) All revenue and expenditures of the 988 Fund shall be audited annually by the
Chief Financial Officer, who shall transmit the results of the annual audit to the Mayor and the
Council.
“(2) The audit shall include an itemized list of how funds were spent in the prior
fiscal year, an assessment of whether expenditures from the 988 Fund comply with federal law,
whether there exists adequate internal controls to prevent misuse, and a list of local exchange
carriers required to collect and remit the 988 fee established under section 613.
“Sec. 613. 988 fee assessments.
110

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a)(1) There is imposed upon all local exchange carriers, including wirelines and
wireless carriers and interconnected Voice Over Internet Protocol (“VoIP”) service providers, as
defined by 47 C.F.R § 9.3, that enable end users to initiate a call to the 988 Lifeline, a monthly
fee of $0.15 per access line sold or leased in the District.
“(2) The PBX tax per station shall be converted into a per-trunk tax based on a
ratio of 15 PBX stations to one PBX trunk.
“(b)(1) Each local exchange carrier shall remit the fee imposed under subsection (a) of
this section to the Mayor on a quarterly basis.
“(2) Each local exchange carrier shall state on the invoice to customers a separate
line item stating the amount of 988 fee imposed pursuant to this section.
“(3) 988 fees collected under this section shall not be considered revenue of a
local exchange carrier and shall not be subject to District taxes.
“(c) The Mayor may, on an annual basis, adjust the 988 fee in accordance with changes
in the Consumer Price Index or another generally applicable inflationary index adopted by the
District.
“(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to prepaid wireless telecommunications
service, which shall be subject to the provisions of section 614.
“Sec. 614. Collection and remittance of prepaid wireless 988 charge.
“(a)(1) A prepaid wireless 988 charge of 2% of the sales price per retail transaction
occurring in the District shall be collected by the seller from the consumer and remitted to the
District.
“(2) The amount of the prepaid wireless 988 charge shall be separately stated on
an invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the consumer by the seller.
“(3) For purposes of this subsection, a retail transaction that is effected in person
by a consumer at a business location of the seller shall be treated as occurring in the District if
that business location is in the District and any other retail transaction shall be treated as
occurring in the District if the retail transaction is a sale at retail described in D.C. Official Code
§ 47-2001(n)(1)(T) that is subject to tax pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-2002.
“(b) The prepaid wireless 988 charge shall be the liability of the consumer and not of the
seller or of any provider; except, that the seller shall be liable to remit all prepaid wireless 988
charges that the seller collects from consumers, including all such charges that the seller is
deemed to collect where the amount of the charge has not been separately stated on an invoice,
receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer by the seller.
“(c) If the amount of the prepaid wireless 988 charge that is collected by a seller from a
consumer is separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the
consumer by the seller, the amount shall not be included in the base for measuring any tax, fee,
surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by the District.
111

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(d) When prepaid wireless telecommunications service is sold with one or more other
products or services for a single, non-itemized price, the percentage of the prepaid wireless 988
charge specified in subsection (a)(1) of this section shall apply to the entire non-itemized price,
unless the seller elects to apply the percentage to:
“(1) The amount of the prepaid wireless telecommunications service disclosed to
the consumer as a dollar amount; or
“(2) The portion of the price identified by the seller that is attributable to the
prepaid wireless telecommunications service by reasonable and verifiable standards from the
seller’s books and records that are kept in the regular course of business for other purposes,
including non-tax purposes.
“(e)(1) If a minimal amount of prepaid wireless telecommunications service is sold with a
prepaid wireless device for a single, non-itemized price, the seller may elect not to apply the
percentage specified in subsection (d)(1) of this section to the transaction.
“(2) For purposes of this subsection, the term “minimal amount” means an
amount of service denominated as 10 minutes or less, or $5 or less.
“(f) The Office of Tax and Revenue, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia
Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code §
2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules governing the collection of, remittance of, and other
administrative provisions related to the prepaid wireless 988 charge established by this section
that are consistent with existing provisions governing the collection, remittance, and
administration of the tax imposed by D.C. Official Code § 47-2002.
“Sec. 615. Reporting.
“As part of the annual appropriations request required by section 612(e), the Mayor shall
submit a report to the Council addressing whether the 988 fee should be adjusted above the
change in Consumer Price Index or another generally applicable inflationary index adopted by
the District and providing performance metrics for the 988 Lifeline and the District’s behavioral
health crisis response system, including call volume, answer rates, average time to answer,
staffing levels supported by the Fund, and disposition outcomes, including resolution by phone,
referral to mobile crisis services, or referral to emergency departments.
“Sec. 616. Rules.
“Except as otherwise provided in section 614(f), the Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the
District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204;
D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this part.”.
Sec. 5113. The Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61, D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.01 et seq.), is amended by
adding new sections 5117d and 5117e to read as follows:
“Sec. 5117d. Community-based crisis stabilization residential services.
112

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a)(1) By October 1, 2026, the Department shall award one-year contracts with 2 non-
governmental organizations for the purpose of operating crisis stabilization beds and crisis
stabilization services.
“(2) Crisis stabilization services shall:
“(A) Operate in a manner that is voluntary, non-coercive, trauma-
informed, and culturally competent;
“(B) Provide a home-like environment that supports stabilization and
recovery;
“(C) Serve individuals experiencing acute behavioral health crises,
including individuals with co-occurring substance use disorders or housing instability;
“(D) Operate in coordination with the Department’s crisis response
system, including the 988 Lifeline established under Part B of the Emergency and Non-
Emergency Telephone Calling Systems Fund Act of 2000, passed on emergency basis on July 7,
2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-724), Comprehensive Psychiatric Emergency program, mobile
crisis services, hospitals, and community-based behavioral health providers; and
“(E) Prioritize diversion from emergency departments, inpatient
hospitalization, and involvement with the criminal legal system.
“(b) The non-governmental organizations awarded contracts pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section shall:
“(1) Possess no less than 5 years of experience operating residential psychiatric
crisis stabilization services that provide voluntary therapeutic, community-based, and home-like
treatment for individuals aged 18 or older with psychiatric symptoms and deemed appropriate for
residential services in a structured, closely monitored temporary setting based on an on-site
psychiatric assessment, including demonstrated experience serving adults with co-occurring
substance use disorders;
“(2) Be certified by the Department to provide residential psychiatric crisis
stabilization services; and
“(3) Have at least 5 years of experience conducting behavioral health assessments,
crisis intervention, stabilization planning, and referrals to ongoing behavioral health services and
supports.
“Sec. 5117e. Children and Adolescent Mobile Psychiatric Services program.
“(a)(1) There is established, within the Department, the Children and Adolescent Mobile
Psychiatric Services program (“ChAMPS”) to provide children and youth aged 6 to 24
experiencing behavioral health crises with behavioral health services.
“(2) By October 1, 2026, the Department shall award a one-year contract with a
non-governmental organization to operate the ChAMPS program.
“(b) The non-governmental organization awarded a contract pursuant to subsection (a)(2)
of this section shall:
113

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) Be certified by the Department to provide behavioral health services or youth
mobile crisis intervention services;
“(2) Utilize developmentally appropriate, family-centered, culturally responsive,
and trauma-informed practices;
“(3) Maintain staffing levels sufficient to provide timely mobile crisis response
services in homes, schools, and community settings;
“(4) Be able to coordinate with schools, hospitals, emergency departments,
mobile crisis providers, law enforcement, and community-based health providers, as appropriate;
“(5) Possess no less than 5 years of experience operating a community-based
behavioral health crisis response service for children and youth experiencing behavioral health
crises; and
“(6) Have previously been awarded a contract by a local, state, or federal agency
to operate a community-based mobile behavioral health crises response service for children and
youth.
“(c) The program established pursuant to this section shall:
“(1) Provide developmentally appropriate, evidence-based crisis assessment, and
behavioral health crisis intervention services to children and adolescents;
“(2) Operate in a manner that prioritizes diversion from emergency departments,
inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, and law enforcement involvement;
“(3) Provide services in the least restrictive and most clinically appropriate setting
possible;
“(4) Support families and caregivers in accessing ongoing behavioral health
services and community-based supports; and
“(5) Provide crisis stabilization planning, follow-up support, and referrals to
ongoing behavioral health services, as appropriate.
“(d) By March 1, 2027, the Department shall, in collaboration with the contracted non-
governmental organization, the Strengthening Families Through Behavioral Health Coalition, at
least one District of Columbia Public School principal or their designee, at least one public
charter school principal, and at least 2 school-based behavioral health clinicians, including at
least one Department clinician and one community-based organization-employed clinician,
submit a report to the Council and the Mayor that includes:
“(1) A standardized model protocol to guide schools and community-based
organizations in developing school-level protocols for utilizing mobile behavioral health crisis
response services for children and youth;
“(2) Standardized evaluation and performance metrics for children and youth
mobile behavioral health crisis response services, including objective measures related to call
answering rates, deployment response times, timeliness of follow-up, referrals and connections
114

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
to ongoing services, family engagement, and diversion from emergency departments, inpatient
hospitalization, and law enforcement involvement; and
“(3) Recommendations for improving coordination between schools, behavioral
health providers, mobile crisis response teams, families, and the Department to ensure timely
access to developmentally appropriate behavioral health crisis intervention services for children
and youth.”.
SUBTITLE M. DC HEALTH CARE ALLIANCE
Sec. 5121. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “DC Health Care Alliance Emergency Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 5122. Section 7 of the Health Care Privatization Amendment Act of 2001, effective
July 12, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-18; D.C. Official Code § 7-1405), is amended as follows:
(a) A new subsection (a-2) to read as follows:
“(a-2) Notwithstanding subsection (a-1) of this section, between October 1, 2026, and
September 30, 2027, the Mayor shall resume providing the medical services provided by the DC
Healthcare Alliance program prior to October 1, 2025, to enrollees who are 21 or older, except
for non-emergency medical transportation.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “subsection (a) or (a-1)” and
inserting the phrase “subsections (a), (a-1), or (a-2)” in its place.
Sec. 5123. Chapter 33 of Title 22-B of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations
(22-B DCMR § 3300 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection 3300.5 is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (3)(A) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) Have a household income at or below one hundred and thirty-
three percent (133%) of the Federal Poverty Level (FPL); and”
(B) Subparagraph (4)(B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B) Not be eligible for, or enrolled in, Medicare, CHIP, Medicaid,
excluding eligibility for Medicaid payment for the treatment of an emergency medical condition
pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 440.255, or enrolled in other third-party medical or health coverage that
meets the requirements of minimum essential coverage, as defined under 45 C.F.R. § 156.600;
and”.
(2) Paragraphs (b) and (c) are amended to read as follows:
115

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b) Except for individuals described in § 3300.4, effective October 1, 2027, residents
aged twenty-one (21) or over shall no longer be eligible for application for or continued
enrollment in the Alliance program and shall be exited from the Alliance program.
“(c) Income determinations under this subsection shall be subject to the income
determination requirements set forth in § 3304.”.
(b) Section 3309 is repealed.
SUBTITLE N. OPIOID ABATEMENT DIRECTED FUNDING
Sec. 5131. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Opioid Abatement Directed Funding Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5132. Section 5012 of the Opioid Abatement Fund Establishment Act of 2022,
effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-167; D.C. Official Code § 7-3221), is amended by
adding a new subsection (b-7) to read as follows:
“(b-7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, in Fiscal Year 2027, a total of
$796,000 from the Fund shall be used for the following purposes:
“(1) $400,000 to the Office of the Chief Medical Officer for the purpose of
enabling the testing of illicit drug misuse and the development of novel testing methods for
opioids within the agency’s Forensic Toxicology Lab and Data Fusion Center; and
“(2) $396,000 for a grant to a District-based children’s hospital operating an
evidence-based adolescent substance use disorder treatment program that provides
developmentally appropriate clinical care, peer recovery support, family-centered services, and
community-based treatment for children, adolescents, and young adults with substance use
disorders, particularly in underserved areas of the District.”.
Sec. 5133. In Fiscal Year 2027, the Department shall award a one-year grant in the
amount of $396,000 to a District-based children’s hospital operating an evidence-based
adolescent substance use disorder treatment program that provides developmentally appropriate
clinical care, peer recovery support, family-centered services, and community-based treatment
for children, adolescents, and young adults with substance use disorders, particularly in
underserved areas of the District.
SUBTITLE O. IMPROVING PRESCRIPTION DRUG ACCESS
Sec. 5141. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Improving Prescription Drug Access Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
116

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5142. Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-2885.17b. Discount drug card program.”.
(b) A new section 47-2885.17b is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-2885.17b. Discount drug card program.
“(a) The Mayor shall establish a drug discount card program (“ArrayRx DC”) by entering
into, on behalf of the District of Columbia, a cooperative purchasing agreement with a
prescription drug discount program, which may include a multi-state non-profit prescription drug
purchasing consortium, for the purpose of lowering prescription drug costs for District residents.
“(b) The Department of Health shall implement the ArrayRx DC program to give all
District residents, including those without insurance, access to the lower-cost prescription drugs
at critical access pharmacies.
“(c)(1) The Mayor may designate a licensed pharmacy as a critical access pharmacy for
the purpose of negotiating a higher reimbursement rate with the pharmacy benefit manager as a
condition of participation in Array Rx DC; provided, that the pharmacy is:
“(A) Not owned by a person who owns more than 3 pharmacies physically
located in the District, unless the pharmacy is owned and operated by a Federally Qualified
Health Center or the District government;
“(B) Physically located within a geographic area of the District that has
limited or insufficient community access to pharmacy services; and
“(C) Open to the public and dispenses drugs to consumers on its premises.
“(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Mayor may waive one
or more of the enumerated criteria and designate a pharmacy as a critical access pharmacy after
weighing factors related to pharmacy access in the relevant geographic area.”.
(c) Section 47-2885.18(a)(3) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (J) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (K) is amended by striking the period and adding the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(3) A new subparagraph (L) is added to read as follows:
“(L) The establishment of regulations to implement § 47-2885.17b,
including the designation of pharmacies as critical access pharmacies.”.
SUBTITLE P. HUMAN SERVICES PATHWAYS TO INDEPENDENCE
Sec. 5151. Short title.
117

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Human Services Pathways to Independence Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5152. Title V of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective
April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 576(c) (D.C. Official Code § 4-205.76(c)) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) POWER beneficiaries shall be eligible for supportive services made available to
TANF beneficiaries to the same extent as TANF beneficiaries, without interruption due to
beginning or ending POWER enrollment at the election of the beneficiary, including:
“(1) The TANF Employment and Education Program;
“(2) Child care subsidies otherwise available only to TANF beneficiaries;
“(3) Transportation assistance;
“(4) Behavioral health and substance abuse supports otherwise available only to
TANF beneficiaries; and
“(5) The Tuition Assistance Program Initiative for TANF.”.
(b) Section 582 (D.C. Official Code § 4-205.82) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 582. Provision of information concerning Earned Income Tax Credits.
“(a) At least once per year, the Mayor shall provide written notice (“notice”) regarding
the federal and District Earned Income Tax Credits (“tax credits”) to the individuals identified in
subsection (c) of this section.
“(b) The notice shall include:
“(1) A summary of the eligibility requirements for the tax credits;
“(2) The amount of the maximum allowable tax credits for different family sizes;
“(3) A summary of the process for applying for the tax credits, including the
process for receiving monthly payments of the credits; and
“(4) A telephone number to call to receive additional information about the tax
credits.
“(c) The notice shall be provided to:
“(1) Each TANF, POWER, SNAP, and Family Re-Housing Stabilization Program
head of household; and
“(2) Each adult who receives Medicaid benefits or who is caring for a child who
receives Medicaid benefits.”.
SUBTITLE Q. HUMAN SERVICES RESOURCE UTILIZATION
Sec. 5161. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Human Services Resource Utilization Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
118

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5162. The Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, effective October 22, 2005 (D.C.
Law 16-35; D.C. Official Code § 4-751.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 8f(d)(3) (D.C. Official Code § 4-753.08(d)(3)) is amended as follows:
(1) Designate the existing text as subparagraph (A).
(2) A new subparagraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, in Fiscal Year
2027, the loss of rental assistance through the District of Columbia Housing Authority’s
Emergency Housing Voucher (“EHV”) program due to lack of continued funding for the EHV
program shall constitute an emergency situation.”.
(b) Section 18 (D.C. Official Code § 4-754.32) is amended by adding a new subsection
(d) to read as follows:
“(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department may not require a
provider that receives federal funding to support survivors of domestic violence to adopt
program rules that require the provider or a client of the provider to engage in any action
inconsistent with the terms of the provider’s federal grant award or any term or condition of the
federal grant’s retention or renewal. In developing program rules for or with providers of
services to survivors of domestic violence, the Department shall endeavor to avoid conflicts
between program rules and federal law governing eligibility for domestic violence grants,
including the Family Violence Prevention and Services Act, approved December 20, 2010 (124
Stat. 3484; 42 U.S.C. 10401 et seq.), and the Violence Against Women Act of 1994, approved
January 5, 2006 (119 Stat. 2964; 34 U.S.C. § 12291 et seq.).”.
(c) New sections 31f, 31g, and 31h are added to read as follows:
“Sec. 31f. Deployment of District-funded housing vouchers in Fiscal Year 2027.
“(a)(1) In Fiscal Year 2027, the Department shall refer 26 families participating in the
Family Re-Housing Stabilization Program (“FRSP”) whose annual household incomes are at or
below 30% of the median family income for the Washington DC Metropolitan Area, as
determined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, to the District of
Columbia Housing Authority (“DCHA”) to be given the exclusive opportunity to apply for the
26 new Local Rent Supplement Program (“LRSP”) vouchers funded in the Fiscal Year 2027
Local Budget Act of 2026, passed on 2nd reading on June 23, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-
659).
“(2) The Department shall prioritize which families to refer to DCHA under
paragraph (1) of this subsection by assessing whether the totality of a family’s circumstances
renders a match to a permanent housing subsidy without supportive services appropriate. In
assessing the totality of the circumstances, the Department shall consider:
“(A) The age of minor children; provided, that the presence of younger
children in the family favors a referral;
119

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) The potential of adult members of the family to grow income such
that a permanent housing subsidy would not be necessary; provided, that adult family members’
potential inability to grow income favors a referral; and
“(C) The ability of the family to safely transition to permanent housing
without ongoing case management.
“(b) In Fiscal Year 2027, the Department shall match 190 families to the 45 new
permanent supportive housing vouchers, 100 new targeted affordable housing vouchers, and 45
new Flexible Rent Subsidy Pilot Program subsidies funded in the Fiscal Year 2027 Local Budget
Act of 2026, passed on 2nd reading on June 23, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-659).
“(c) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue
rules to implement the provisions of this section.
“Sec. 31g. Bridge housing resources.
“(a) The Mayor may not limit the capacity of the temporary shelter facility located at
1129 New Hampshire Avenue, NW (the “Aston”), below that required to house 190 individuals.
“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Department may:
“(1) Limit the capacity of an Aston housing unit designed to accommodate 2
individuals to one individual when the Department finds it necessary to meet an individual’s
housing or clinical needs;
“(2) Limit overall occupancy at the Aston to the extent necessary to ensure
individuals who do not share gender identity or expression are not required to share housing
units;
“(3) Limit overall occupancy at the Aston to the extent necessary to allow
individuals to occupy housing units with others with whom a shared placement is appropriate,
including other members of an individual’s family; and
“(4) Decline to place individuals in housing units employed by the operator of the
Aston for uses other than housing individuals as of May 1, 2026, if no alternative space at the
Aston is available for those uses.
“Sec. 31h. Turnover of District-funded housing vouchers.
“(a) No later than 60 days after the permanent departure of an individual or family from
permanent supportive housing or targeted affordable housing, the Department shall match the
voucher vacated by the departing individual or family to a new individual or family.
“(b) For the purposes of this section, an individual or family shall be considered to have
permanently departed permanent supportive housing or targeted affordable housing when the
individual or family has been terminated or otherwise exited from the program and there is no
pending appeal or administrative review of the termination or exit.”.
120

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5163. The District of Columbia Housing Authority Act of 1999, effective May 9,
2000 (D.C. Law 13-105; D.C. Official Code § 6-201 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 26i to read as follows:
“Sec. 26i. Emergency Housing Voucher Interim Assistance Program.
“Subject to the availability of the Fiscal Year 2027 excess local funds referenced in
paragraph (2) under the heading Appropriation of Additional Resources in the Fiscal Year 2027
Local Budget Act of 2026, passed on 2nd reading on June 23, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-
659), the Authority shall establish an Emergency Housing Voucher Interim Assistance Program
(the “Interim Program”) to provide ongoing rental assistance to all District individuals and
families assisted by the Emergency Housing Voucher (“EHV”) program who are at risk of
termination from the EHV program due to lack of continued funding (“EHV households”);
provided, that:
“(1) Upon ascertaining that an EHV household is at risk of termination from the
EHV program due to lack of continued funding, the Authority shall:
“(A) Inform the EHV household in writing that, upon the exhaustion of
continued funding, the Authority will automatically enroll the EHV household in the Interim
Program; and
“(B) Provide a means of opting out of the Interim Program;
“(2) Not later than upon the exhaustion of continued funding for the EHV
program, the Authority shall automatically enroll all EHV households that have not opted out in
the Interim Program and continue to provide a rental subsidy in the same amount as if enrolled
EHV households had continued to participate in the EHV program;
“(3) All EHV households in the Interim Program shall remain contemporaneously
enrolled in the EHV program, such that, should federal funding for the EHV program become
available, the Authority may revert to the use of federal funds to support EHV households’ rental
subsidies;
“(4) Should federal funding for the EHV program become available after the
enrollment of EHV households in the Interim Program, the Authority may terminate EHV
households from the Interim Program on the basis of the availability of federal funding and
revert to the use of federal funds to support EHV households’ rental subsidies;
“(5) The rental subsidy provided by the Interim Program shall continue only
through Fiscal Year 2027;
“(6) For the duration of the Interim Program, the Authority shall apply the
program rules governing the federal Emergency Housing Voucher program to the Interim
Program, including those relating to transfer requests, rent‑increase requests, unit inspections,
and any administrative processes necessary to maintain assistance;
“(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
121

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) Create an entitlement on the part of any EHV household to rental
assistance beyond Fiscal Year 2027; or
“(B) Limit the Authority’s ability to terminate an EHV household from the
Interim Program or the EHV program on grounds under which the EHV household could
previously have been terminated from the EHV program; and
“(8) The Authority, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative
Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.),
shall promulgate rules implementing the provisions of this section.”.
Sec. 5164. Domestic violence services continuation.
(a) During Fiscal Year 2027:
(1) DHS shall continue to provide domestic violence services to all DV-EHV
households throughout DV-EHV households’ participation in the EHV program or any successor
housing subsidy program; and
(2) During Fiscal Year 2027, DHS may not transition DV-EHV households or
their successors in the EHV or any successor housing subsidy program to DHS’s general
permanent supportive housing case management program.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the term:
(1) “Domestic violence services” means counseling, case management, workforce
development, and other supportive services designed to meet the needs of victims of family
violence, domestic violence, or dating violence.
(2) “DV-EHV households” means individuals or families with Emergency
Housing Vouchers who were receiving domestic violence services from the Department of
Human Services as of the effective date of the Human Services Resource Utilization Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill
26-724).
SUBTITLE R. TANF ELIGIBILITY DURING PREGNANCY
Sec. 5171. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Improving Maternal and Prenatal Access to Care and
Timely Supports (IMPACTS) Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5172. Section 543 of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982,
effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.43), is amended as follows:
(a) The section designation is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 543. Eligibility of a pregnant person for TANF.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
122

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b) Beginning October 1, 2026, a pregnant person shall be eligible for TANF benefits if
the pregnancy has been medically certified, the pregnancy is in the second or third trimester, and
other generally applicable TANF eligibility requirements are met. The Mayor shall provide to the
pregnant person written information and referrals regarding the availability of prenatal care
services and nutrition supplements.”.
SUBTITLE S. PUBLIC BENEFITS SECURITY CLARIFICATION
Sec. 5181. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Public Benefits Security Clarification Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5182. Title V of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective
April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 583(a) (D.C. Official Code § 4-205.83(a)) is amended by striking the date
“October 1, 2027” and inserting the date “March 1, 2028” in its place.
(b) Section 584(d) D.C. Official Code § 4-205.84(d)) is amended to read as follows:
“(d)(1) This section shall apply as of March 1, 2028.
“(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the Department to restore
public assistance lost due to theft before March 1, 2028.
“(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the Department’s ability to
restore public assistance lost due to theft before March 1, 2028.”.
Sec. 5183. Section 4 of the Public Benefits Security Amendment Act of 2026, effective
March 24, 2026 (D.C. Law 26-104; 73 DCR 1069), is repealed.
SUBTITLE T. CHILD SUPPORT IMPROVEMENT
Sec. 5191. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Child Support Improvement Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5192. Section 519(c) of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982,
effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.19(c)), is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (4)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a period in
its place.
(c) Paragraph (5) is repealed.
123

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5193. The District of Columbia Child Support Enforcement Amendment Act of
1985, effective February 24, 1987 (D.C. Law 6-166; D.C. Official Code § 46-201 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new section 4a to read as follows:
“Sec. 4a. Pass-through of current support and arrears.
“(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the District shall pay to a family
receiving TANF an amount equal to the first $200 of a current monthly child support
payment made to the District for a family receiving TANF under an assignment of child
support made pursuant to section 519(b) of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of
1982, effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.19(b)).
“(b) Beginning on July 1, 2027 and notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the District shall pay to a family receiving TANF an amount equal to the first $200 of a child
support payment that satisfies an obligation for accrued child support arrears made to the District
under an assignment of child support made pursuant to section 519(b) of the District of
Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official
Code § 4-205.19(b)).
“(c) Beginning on July 1, 2027 and notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the District shall pay to a family that formerly received TANF an amount equal to the first $200
of a child support payment that satisfies an obligation for accrued child support arrears made to
the District under an assignment of child support made pursuant to section 519(b) of the District
of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101;
D.C. Official Code § 4-205.19(b)).”.
Sec. 5194. Section 15-101 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “subsection (b)” and insert the phrase “subsections (a-1) and
(b)” in its place.
(2) Strike the word “twelve” and insert the number “12” in its place.
(b) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) For support orders entered in cases filed 120 days after the effective date
of the Child Support Improvement Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency
basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-724), the 12-year period of limitation on the
enforceability of a final judgment or final decree for the payment of money provided by
subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to judgments or decrees for past-due child
support. Child support judgments entered pursuant to these support orders shall be enforceable
for a period of 5 years after the date of the emancipation of the youngest child subject to the
support order. The time during which the judgment creditor is stayed from enforcing the
124

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
judgment as provided in subsection (a) of this section shall not be computed as a part of the
period within which the judgment is enforceable by execution.”.
(c) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “the twelve-year period provided by
subsection (a)” and inserting the phrase “the periods provided by subsections (a) and (a-1)” in its
place.
SUBTITLE U. FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER GRANT
PROGRAM
Sec. 5201. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Federally Qualified Health Center Grant Program for
Uninsured Patient Care Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5202. Fiscal Year 2027 Federally Qualified Health Center Grant Program.
By October 31, 2026, the Department of Healthcare Finance (“DHCF”) shall award
grants totaling $800,000 to at least 2 entities that have a patient population that is at least 20%
uninsured and that are:
(1) A federally qualified health center (“FQHC”), as defined in section
1861(aa)(4) of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 313; 42 U.S.C. §
1395x(aa)(4)); or
(2) An entity that has been determined by the Health Resources and Services
Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to meet the
definition of a FQHC, but does not receive FQHC program funding.
SUBTITLE V. HEALTH BENEFIT CONFORMING AMENDMENT
Sec. 5211. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Health Benefit Conforming Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5212. Section 5f(b) of the Women’s Health and Cancer Rights Federal Law
Conformity Act of 2000, effective September 6, 2023 (D.C. Law 25-49; D.C. Official Code §
31-3834.06(b)), is amended by adding a new paragraph (3) to read as follows:
“(3) This subsection shall not apply if the defrayal of the costs of the benefits
described in this subsection by the District of Columbia is required for plan years starting on or
after January 1, 2028.”.
SUBTITLE W. RONALD MCDONALD HOUSE SUPPORT GRANT
Sec. 5221. Short title.
125

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Ronald McDonald House Support Grant Emergency
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 5222. Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2027, the
Department of Health shall issue a grant of $100,000 to the Ronald McDonald House Charities
of Greater Washington, DC, Inc. for the Build for Love Impact Fund, which supports a range of
services, including accommodations for families being treated at District of Columbia hospitals.
TITLE VI. OPERATIONS AND INFRASTRUCTURE
SUBTITLE A. ALTERNATIVE FUEL VEHICLE AND VENDING GENERATOR
CONVERSION CREDITS
Sec. 6001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Alternative Fuel Vehicle Conversion Credit Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6002. Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “47-1806.13. Tax on residents and non-residents – Credits –
Alternative fuel vehicle conversion credit.” and insert the phrase “47-1806.13. Tax on residents
and non-residents – Credits – Alternative fuel vehicle conversion credit and mobile food vendor
generator electrification credit.” in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “47-1807.11. Tax on corporations – Credits – Alternative
fuel vehicle conversion credit.” and insert the phrase “47-1807.11. Tax on corporations – Credits
– Alternative fuel vehicle conversion credit and mobile food vendor generator electrification
credit.” in its place.
(3) Strike the phrase “47-1808.11. Tax on unincorporated businesses – Credits –
Alternative fuel vehicle conversion credit.” and insert the phrase “47-1808.11. Tax on
unincorporated businesses – Credits – Alternative fuel vehicle conversion credit and mobile
food-vendor generator electrification credit.” in its place.
(b) Section 47-1806.12(f)(1)(F) is repealed.
(c) Section 47-1806.13 is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “conversion credit.”
and inserting the phrase “conversion credit and mobile food vendor generator electrification
credit.” in its place.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the date “December 31, 2026” and
inserting the date “December 31, 2035” in its place.
126

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) Beginning with the taxable year after December 31, 2025, and ending with the
taxable year ending December 31, 2035, a credit shall be allowed against the tax imposed under
§ 47-1806.03 in the amount of 50% of the equipment and labor costs directly attributable to the
replacement of a fossil-fuel-powered generator or other greenhouse-gas or pollution-creating
generator with a battery-powered or zero-emissions generator used to supply electrical power to
appliances for food preparation and servicing in a mobile vending vehicle operated by a mobile
vendor; provided, that:
“(1) The total credit shall not exceed $15,000 per replaced generator;
“(2) The credit shall be claimed by the taxpayer over a period of 3 tax years, each
year in an amount equal to 1/3 of the total tax credit for the mobile vending vehicle plus an
allowable amount carried forward under paragraph (5) of this subsection, subject to the
limitations in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection;
“(3) The credit may be claimed for a tax year only if, during that tax year, the
mobile vending vehicle was licensed and operated in the District;
“(4) The credit claimed in any one tax year may not exceed the taxpayer’s tax
liability under § 47-1806.03 for that year;
“(5) If the amount of the credit permitted in a tax year exceeds the tax otherwise
due under § 47-1806.03 for that tax year, the amount of the credit not used may be carried
forward for up to 2 tax years;
“(6) The credit shall not be refundable; and
“(7) The credit may not be claimed in a tax year by a taxpayer if the taxpayer in
that tax year operated a trade or business within the District related to the mobile vending vehicle
that had gross income of more than $12,000 for the tax year.”.
(4) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “under this section” and
inserting the phrase “under subsection (a) of this section” in its place.
(5) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
“(d) For the purposes of subsection (a-1) of this section, the term:
“(1) “Battery-powered generator” means a device that uses a rechargeable battery
to store and discharge electrical energy to power appliances or equipment.
“(2) “Mobile vendor” means a person licensed under District law to sell food or
beverages from a mobile vending unit on public space.
“(3) “Replacement” means the removal, deactivation, or disuse of a fossil-fuel-
powered generator such that a battery-powered generator becomes the primary or exclusive
source of portable electrical power.”.
(d) Section 47-1807.11 is amended as follows:
127

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “conversion credit.”
and inserting the phrase “conversion credit and mobile food vendor generator electrification
credit.” in its place.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the date “December 31, 2026” and
inserting the date “December 31, 2035” in its place.
(3) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) Beginning with the taxable year after December 31, 2025, and ending with the
taxable year ending December 31, 2035, a credit shall be allowed against the tax imposed under
§ 47-1807.02 in the amount of 50% of the equipment and labor costs directly attributable to the
replacement of a fossil-fuel-powered generator or other greenhouse-gas or pollution-creating
generator with a battery-powered or zero-emissions generator used to supply electrical power to
appliances for food preparation and servicing in a mobile vending operation operated by a
mobile vendor, not to exceed $15,000 per generator.”.
(4) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “credit claimed under this section” and insert the
phrase “credits claimed under this section” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “credit shall not be” and insert the phrase “credits
shall not be” in its place.
(5) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
“(d) For the purposes of subsection (a-1) of this section, the term:
“(1) “Battery-powered generator” means a device that uses a rechargeable battery
to store and discharge electrical energy to power appliances or equipment.
“(2) “Mobile vendor” means a person licensed under District law to sell food or
beverages from a mobile vending unit on public space.
“(3) “Replacement” means the removal, deactivation, or disuse of a fossil-fuel-
powered generator such that a battery-powered generator becomes the primary or exclusive
source of portable electrical power.”.
(e) Section 47-1808.11 is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “conversion credit.”
and inserting the phrase “conversion credit and mobile food vendor generator electrification
credit.” in its place.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the date “December 31, 2026” and
inserting the date “December 31, 2035” in its place.
(3) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) Beginning with the taxable year after December 31, 2025, and ending with the
taxable year ending December 31, 2035, a credit shall be allowed against the tax imposed under
§ 47-1808.03 in the amount of 50% of the equipment and labor costs directly attributable to the
replacement of a fossil-fuel-powered generator or other greenhouse-gas or pollution-creating
128

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
generator with a battery-powered or zero-emissions generator used to supply electrical power to
appliances for food preparation and servicing in a mobile vending operation operated by a
mobile vendor, not to exceed $15,000 per generator.”.
(4) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “credit claimed under this section” and inserting the
phrase “credits claimed under this section” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “credit shall not be” and insert the phrase “credits
shall not be” in its place.
(5) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
“(d) For the purposes of subsection (a-1) of this section, the term:
“(1) “Battery-powered generator” means a device that uses a rechargeable battery
to store and discharge electrical energy to power appliances or equipment.
“(2) “Mobile vendor” means a person licensed under District law to sell food or
beverages from a mobile vending unit on public space.
“(3) “Replacement” means the removal, deactivation, or disuse of a fossil-fuel-
powered generator such that a battery-powered generator becomes the primary or exclusive
source of portable electrical power.”.
SUBTITLE B. ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING INFRASTRUCTURE TAX
CREDITS
Sec. 6011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure Incentive
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6012. Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended as follows:
(1) The section designation for section 47-1806.12 is amended to read as follows:
“47-1806.12. Tax on residents and non-residents — Credits — Alternative fuel
infrastructure credit —Tax year 2014 through tax year 2026.”.
(2) A new section designation is added to read as follows:
“47-1806.12a. Tax on residents and non-residents — Credits — Alternative fuel
infrastructure credit — Tax year 2027 through tax year 2036.”.
(b) The section heading for section 47-1806.12 is amended by striking the phrase
“Alternative fuel infrastructure credit” and inserting the phrase “Alternative fuel infrastructure
credit – Tax year 2014 through tax year 2026” in its place.
(c) A new section 47-1806.12a is added to read as follows:
129

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“§ 47-1806.12a. Tax on residents and non-residents — Credits — Alternative fuel
infrastructure credit — Tax year 2027 through tax year 2036.
“(a) Beginning with the taxable year after December 31, 2026, through the taxable year
ending December 31, 2036, there shall be allowed against the tax imposed on an eligible
applicant by § 47-1806.03 a credit in the amount of 50% of the equipment and labor costs
directly attributable to the purchase and installation by the taxpayer of alternative fuel storage
and dispensing or charging equipment in a property that is the dwelling of the taxpayer and
located in the District; provided, that the credit shall not exceed $1,000 per vehicle charging
station.
“(b) The equipment and labor costs for which a tax credit may be claimed under this
section shall not include costs associated with the construction or purchase of any real property
or structure.
“(c) The credit claimed under this section in any one tax year may not exceed the
taxpayer’s tax liability under § 47-1806.03 for that year.
“(d) If the amount of the tax credit permitted under this section exceeds the tax otherwise
due under § 47-1806.03, the amount of the credit not used may be carried forward for up to 2 tax
years. The credit shall not be refundable.
“(e) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Alternative fuel” means a fuel used to power a motor vehicle that consists of
one or more of the following:
“(A) Electricity provided by a vehicle-charging station; or
“(B) Hydrogen.
“(2) “Eligible applicant” means a resident who is an owner or lessee of a qualified
private residence.
“(3) “Qualified private residence” means a property that is the dwelling of a
person that has a vehicle-charging station.”.
(d) Section 47-1807.10 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the date “December 31, 2026,” and
inserting the date “December 31, 2036,” in its place.
(2) Subsection (f)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “shall have the same
meaning as provided in § 47-1806.12(f)(1)” and inserting the phrase “shall, through December
31, 2026, have the same meaning as provided in § 47-1806.12(f)(1), and shall, after December
31, 2026, have the same meaning as provided in § 47-1806.12a(e)(1)” in its place.
(e) Section 47-1808.10 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the date “December 31, 2026,” and
inserting the date “December 31, 2036” in its place.
(2) Subsection (f)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “shall have the same
meaning as provided in § 47-1806.12(f)(1)” and inserting the phrase “shall, through December
130

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
31, 2026, have the same meaning as provided in § 47-1806.12(f)(1) and shall, after December
31, 2026, have the same meaning as provided in § 47-1806.12a(e)(1)” in its place.
SUBTITLE C. ELECTRIC VEHICLE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE CHARGING
STATIONS PERSONAL PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION
Sec. 6021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Electric Vehicle Publicly Accessible Charging Stations
Personal Property Tax Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6022. Section 47-1508(a) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
adding a new paragraph (14) to read as follows:
“(14) For personal property tax years beginning after May 30, 2027, electric
vehicle chargers, including 240 volt outlets installed near parking spaces and supporting
equipment and associated software, that:
“(A) Provide electricity for the recharging of battery electric motor
vehicles or plug-in hybrid motor vehicles; and
“(B) Are and will be operational and available for use by the public during
the tax year, or portion of the tax year, for which the exemption is claimed.”.
SUBTITLE D. ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING RESPONSIBILITY
Sec. 6031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Administrative Hearing Responsibility Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6032. Title I of the District of Columbia Traffic Adjudication Act of 1978, effective
September 12, 1978 (D.C. Law 2-104; D.C. Official Code § 50-2301.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 105(a) (D.C. Official Code § 50-2301.05(a)) is amended by adding a new
paragraph (3) to read as follows:
“(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to infractions issued by the
Department of For Hire Vehicles pursuant to the District of Columbia Taxicab Commission
Establishment Act of 1985, effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-97; D.C. Official Code § 50-
301.01 et seq.).”.
(b) A new section 113 is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 113. Adjudication of Department of For-Hire Vehicles enforcement actions.
“(a) The Department shall have jurisdiction to adjudicate all notices of infraction issued
by the Department of For-Hire Vehicles (“DFHV”) under the District of Columbia Taxicab
Commission Establishment Act of 1985, effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-97; D.C. Official
131

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Code § 50-301.01 et. seq.), and Title 31 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (31
DCMR § 100 et seq.).
“(b)(1) The administrative adjudication of notices of infraction issued by the DFHV
pursuant to the District of Columbia Taxicab Commission Establishment Act of 1985, effective
March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-97; D.C. Official Code § 50-301.01 et. seq.), and referred to the
Department shall be conducted according to the requirements set forth in section 704 of Title 31
of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (31 DCMR § 704) (“31 DCMR § 704”) and
the rules of procedure issued by the Department pursuant to this act, and the implementing rules
and regulations located in Chapter 10 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (18 DCMR § 1000 et seq.).
“(2) DFHV shall promulgate revised rules to implement the provisions of the
Administrative Hearing Responsibility Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on
July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-724), including revisions to 31 DCMR § 704 necessary
to replace references to the Office of Administrative Hearings (“OAH”) with references to the
Department.
“(3) In the event any conflict arises between the Department traffic adjudication
procedures required by this act and its implementing rules and regulations set forth in Chapter 10
of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (18 DCMR § 1000. et seq.), and
the DFHV adjudication procedures required by 31 DCMR § 704, the DFHV rules and
regulations set forth at 31 DCMR § 704 shall control. For all matters not specifically addressed
by 31 DCMR § 704, the Department rules and regulations located in Chapter 10 of Title 18 of
the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (18 DCMR § 1000 et seq.) shall control.
“(4) A person aggrieved by a final order of a Department hearing examiner in a
DFHV notice of infraction proceeding brought pursuant to this section may obtain review of the
final order by the Traffic Adjudication Appeals Board, which shall be filed as provided in section
402.
“(c) Any adjudicated case or appeal arising from a DFHV notice of infraction that is
pending at OAH as of the effective date of the Administrative Hearing Responsibility
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled
version of Bill 26-724), shall be transferred to the Department to be re-docketed and adjudicated
in accordance with the controlling procedures identified above. The only exceptions to this
transfer requirement shall be adjudicated cases or appeals pending at OAH in which an
evidentiary hearing has already been conducted and the case is awaiting entry of a Final Order or
dispositive motion.
“(d) Upon receipt and re-docketing of a case received from OAH, the Department,
DFHV, and OAH shall coordinate to provide notice to the parties advising them of the transfer of
their case. The notice shall include the newly issued Department case number, if any, as well as
instructions about how to contest or appeal the DFHV enforcement action, file motions, provide
132

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
new contact information, or otherwise participate in adjudication of the case through
theDepartment.”.
SUBTITLE E. [RESERVED]
SUBTITLE F. FLEET ELECTRIFICATION
Sec. 6051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Fleet Electrification Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 6052. Section 502 of the CleanEnergy DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2018,
effective March 22, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-257; D.C. Official Code § 50-741), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “by year 2045” and inserting the
phrase “by 2048” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “By 2030” and insert the phrase “By 2033” in its
place.
(B) Strike the phrase “commercial motor carriers, limousine-service
vehicles, and taxis” and insert the phrase “and commercial motor carriers” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “By 2035” and insert the phrase “By 2038” in its
place.
(B) Strike the phrase “commercial motor carriers, limousine-service
vehicles, and taxis” and insert the phrase “and commercial motor carriers” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “By 2040” and insert the phrase “By 2043” in its
place.
(B) Strike the phrase “commercial motor carriers, limousine-service
vehicles, and taxis” and insert the phrase “and commercial motor carriers” in its place.
(4) Paragraph (4) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “By 2045” and insert the phrase “By 2048” in its
place.
(B) Strike the phrase “commercial motor carriers, limousine-service
vehicles, and taxis” and insert the phrase “and commercial motor carriers” in its place.
SUBTITLE G. STORMWATER FUND
Sec. 6061. Short title.
133

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Stormwater Fund Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 6062. Section 152 of the District Department of the Environment Establishment Act
of 2005, effective March 25, 2009 (D.C. Law 17-371; D.C. Official Code § 8-152.02), is
amended by adding a new subsection (h) to read as follows:
“(h) Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (e) of this section, in Fiscal Year 2027,
$4,426,197 shall be allocated directly from the Enterprise Fund to the Department of Public
Works for stormwater management activities, including street sweeping in areas that support
compliance with the District’s MS4 permit, regardless of when the stormwater management
activities were first carried out and regardless of whether such activities are otherwise required
by law or regulation.”.
Sec. 6063. Subsection 556.5 of Title 21 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (21 DCMR § 556.5) is amended by striking the phrase “The charge for one
Equivalent Residential Unit (ERU) shall be two dollars and sixty-seven cents ($2.67) per month.
This charge shall become effective November 1, 2010” and inserting the phrase “The charge for
one Equivalent Residential Unit (ERU) shall be four dollars and three cents ($4.03) per month”
in its place.
SUBTITLE H. ANACOSTIA RIVER CLEAN UP AND PROTECTION
Sec. 6071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Anacostia River Clean Up and Protection Technical
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6072. Section 2(3) of the Anacostia River Clean Up and Protection Act of 2009,
effective September 23, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-55; D.C. Official Code § 8-102.01(3)), is amended
to read as follows:
“(3) “Retail establishment” means any licensee:
“(A) Under an off-premises retailer’s license, class A or B, issued pursuant
to D.C. Official Code § 25-112;
“(B) Under a Public Health: Food Establishment Retail endorsement to a
basic business license issued pursuant to Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia
Official Code, for licenses issued before October 1, 2025; or
“(C) Under a basic business license issued under the Food Services
category, pursuant to Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code, unless the
licensee does not meet the definition of a “food establishment” under subsection 9901.1 of Title
134

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
25-A of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (25-A DCMR § 9901.1), for licenses
issued on or after October 1, 2025.”.
Sec. 6073. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2025.
SUBTITLE I. HAZARDOUS WASTE AND TOXIC CHEMICAL SOURCE
REDUCTION FUND
Sec. 6081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Hazardous Waste and Toxic Chemical Source
Reduction Fund Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6082. Section 21a(d) of the District of Columbia Hazardous Waste Management Act
of 1977, effective December 3, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-149; D.C. Official Code § 8-1319.01(d)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(d) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not revert
to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a
fiscal year, or at any other time.”.
SUBTITLE J. PESTICIDE REGISTRATION FUND
Sec. 6091. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Pesticide Registration Fund Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6092. The Pesticide Education and Control Amendment Act of 2012, effective
October 23, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-191; D.C. Official Code § 8-431 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 9 (D.C. Official Code § 8-438) is amended by striking the figure “$200” and
inserting the figure “$300” in its place.
(b) Section 9a(d) (D.C. Official Code § 8-438.01(d)) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not revert
to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a
fiscal year, or at any other time.”.
Sec. 6093. Subection 2518.2 of Title 20 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (20 DCMR § 2518.2), is amended to read as follows:
“2518.2 The annual registration fee for each pesticide shall be three hundred dollars
($300), payable to the Department.”.
135

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE K. SUSTAINABLE MATERIALS AND BUILDINGS FUND
Sec. 6101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Sustainable Materials and Building Fund Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6102. Section 8 of the Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C.
Law 16-234; D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.07), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is repealed.
(2) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) 50% of the monies deposited into the Fund each fiscal year shall be
transferred to the Sustainable Materials and Building Fund established by section 127 of the
Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act of 2014, effective December 13, 2017
(D.C. Law 22-33; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.381);”.
(b) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not revert
to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a
fiscal year, or at any other time.”.
Sec. 6103. The Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act of 2014, effective
February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-154; D.C. Official Code § 8-1031.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 118(d) (D.C. Official Code § 8-1041.04(d)) is amended by striking the phrase
“Product Stewardship Fund” and inserting the phrase “Sustainable Materials and Building Fund”
in its place.
(b) Section 126(b) (D.C. Official Code § 8-1041.12(b)) is amended by striking the phrase
“Product Stewardship Fund” and inserting the phrase “Sustainable Materials and Building Fund”
in its place.
(c) Section 127 (D.C. Official Code § 1-325.381) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “Product Stewardship
Fund” and inserting the phrase “Sustainable Materials and Building Fund” in its place.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Product Stewardship Fund”
and inserting the phrase “Sustainable Materials and Building Fund” in its place.
(3) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
136

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) A new paragraph (6) is added to read as follows:
“(6) Monies transferred from the Green Building Fund pursuant to section
8(c)(1A) of the Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-234; D.C.
Official Code § 6-1451.07(c)(1A)).”.
(4) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used as follows:
“(1) Money deposited pursuant to subsection (b)(1) through (5) of this section
shall be used for the purposes of supporting and administering Subtitle B, Subtitle D, and the
Paint Stewardship Act of 2014, effective March 11, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-205; D.C. Official Code
§ 8-233.01 et seq.); and
“(2) Money deposited pursuant to subsection (b)(6) of this section shall be used
for activities permitted under section 8(c)(2) through (7) of the Green Building Act of 2006,
effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-234; D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.07(c)(2) through (7)).”.
(5) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
(d) Section 137 (D.C. Official Code § 8-771.09) is redesignated as section 136.
(e) Section 138 (D.C. Official Code § 8-771.10) is amended as follows:
(1) The section is redesignated as section 137.
(2) Subsection (b)(3) is amended by striking the phrase “Product Stewardship
Fund” and inserting the phrase “Sustainable Materials and Building Fund” in its place.
Sec. 6104. Section 210 of the Clean and Affordable Energy Act of 2008, effective
October 22, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-250; D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.10), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a-1) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a period
in its place.
(3) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
(b) Subsection (c)(18) is repealed.
Sec. 6105. The Paint Stewardship Act of 2014, effective March 11, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-
205; D.C. Official Code § 8-233.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
137

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Section 5(f) (D.C. Official Code § 8-233.04(f)) is amended by striking the phrase
“Product Stewardship Fund” and inserting the phrase “Sustainable Materials and Building Fund”
in its place.
(b) Section 7(b)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 8-233.06(b)(2)) is amended by striking the
phrase “Product Stewardship Fund” and inserting the phrase “Sustainable Materials and Building
Fund” in its place.
SUBTITLE L. UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK REGULATION FUND
Sec. 6111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Underground Storage Tank Regulation Fund
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6112. Section 6a(d) of the District of Columbia Underground Storage Tank
Management Act of 1990, effective December 3, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-149; D.C. Official Code §
8-113.05a(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
SUBTITLE M. USER FEES FOR EVENTS ON DOEE MANAGED LANDS
Sec. 6121. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “User Fees for Events on Lands Managed by the
Department of Energy and Environment Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6122. Section 6(a-1) of the Anacostia River Clean Up and Protection Act of 2009,
effective September 23, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-55; D.C. Official Code § 8-102.05(a-1)), is amended
as follows:
(a) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in its
place.
(c) A new paragraph (5) is added to read as follows:
“(5) Revenue collected from fees imposed by DOEE for permitted events and
other user activities on property under the administrative jurisdiction of DOEE.”.
138

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 6123. Section 110(a)(2) of the District Department of the Environment
Establishment Act of 2005, effective February 15, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-51; D.C. Official Code §
8-151.10(a)(2)), is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Fees, including fees for the use of property under the administrative
jurisdiction of DOEE for permitted events and other user activities;”.
SUBTITLE N. RAILROAD CARRIER FEE PAUSE
Sec. 6131. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Railroad Carrier Fee Pause Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6132. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Energy and
Environment shall suspend implementation and enforcement of sections 5001 through 5006 of
Title 20 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (20 DCMR §§ 5001 through 5006)
until September 30, 2027.
Sec. 6133. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of November 28, 2025.
SUBTITLE O. PUBLIC INCONVENIENCE FEE
Sec. 6141. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Public Inconvenience Fee Emergency Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 6142. Subsection 225.1(c) of Title 24 of the District of Municipal Regulations (24
DCMR § 225.1(c)), is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Public Inconvenience Fee
“In addition to those fees in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a public inconvenience fee
for the temporary occupancy of public space shall be applied to all public space permits as
follows:
“(1)(A) For a permit issued to a utility operator, as that term is defined in section
2(8) of the Underground Facilities Protection Act of 1980, effective March 4, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-
129, D.C. Official Code § 34-2701(8)), no public inconvenience fee shall be applied for the first
sixty (60) calendar days of the permit.
“(B) For a permit issued to all other permittees, no public inconvenience
fee shall be applied for the first thirty (30) calendar days of the permit.
“(C) For each day thereafter, the fees set forth in subparagraphs (2) and (3)
shall apply.
139

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(D) Notwithstanding sub-subparagraph (C) of this subparagraph,
beginning on October 1, 2030, the fees set forth in sub-sub-subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this sub-
subparagraph shall apply to public space permits issued to the District of Columbia Water and
Sewer Authority:
“(i) Within the Central Fee/Sq.Ft./Day
Business District, as defined in 18 DCMR § 9901:
“Parking Lane (where no parking meters exist) Fee established for prohibiting
parking in 18 DCMR §§ 2407.20
and 2407.21
“1st Travel Lane (to include lanes dedicated for use by $0.040
bicycles) ($2,250 maximum fee per block per 30 days)
“2nd Travel Lane and Each Additional ($2,250 $0.060
maximum fee for each lane per block per 30 days)
“Alley ($2,250 maximum fee per block per 30 days) $0.020
“Sidewalk ($3,000 maximum fee per block per 30 $0.030
days)
“Pedestrian Walkway Credit (for 100% of sidewalk -$0.030
area where the pedestrian pathway is maintained per
DDOT Pedestrian Safety and Work Zone Standards:
Covered and Open Walkway)
“(ii) Outside the Central Fee/Sq.Ft./Day
Business District, as defined in 18 DCMR § 9901:
“Parking Lane (where no parking meters exist) Fee established for prohibiting
parking in 18 DCMR §§ 2407.20
and 2407.21
“1st Travel Lane (to include lanes dedicated for use by $0.030
bicycles) ($2,250 maximum fee per block per 30 days)
140

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“2nd Travel Lane and Each Additional ($2,250 $0.045
maximum fee for each lane per block per 30 days)
“Alley ($2,250 maximum fee per block per 30 days) $0.015
“Sidewalk ($3,000 maximum fee per block per 30 $0.020
days)
“Pedestrian Walkway Credit (for 100% of sidewalk -$0.020
area where the pedestrian pathway is maintained per
DDOT Pedestrian Safety and Work Zone Standards:
Covered and Open Walkway)
“(2) Within the Central Business District, Fee/Sq.Ft./Day
as defined in 18 DCMR § 9901:
“Parking Lane (where no parking meters exist) Fee established for prohibiting
parking in 18 DCMR §§ 2407.20
and 2407.21
“1st Travel Lane (to include lanes dedicated for use by $0.07
bicycles) ($2,250 maximum fee per block per 30 days)
“2nd Travel Lane and Each Additional ($2,250 $0.11
maximum fee for each lane per block per 30 days)
“Alley ($2,250 maximum fee per block per 30 days) $0.04
“Sidewalk ($3,000 maximum fee per block per 30 days) $0.06
“Pedestrian Walkway Credit (for 100% of sidewalk area -$0.06
where the pedestrian pathway is maintained per DDOT
Pedestrian Safety and Work Zone Standards: Covered
and Open Walkway)
“(3) Outside the Central Business District, Fee/Sq.Ft./Day
as defined in 18 DCMR § 9901:
141

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Parking Lane (where no parking meters exist) Fee established for prohibiting
parking in 18 DCMR §§ 2407.20
and 2407.21
“1st Travel Lane (to include lanes dedicated for use by $0.06
bicycles) ($2,250 maximum fee per block per 30 days)
“2nd Travel Lane and Each Additional ($2,250 $0.09
maximum fee for each lane per block per 30 days)
“Alley ($2,250 maximum fee per block per 30 days) $0.03
“Sidewalk ($3,000 maximum fee per block per 30 days) $0.04
“Pedestrian Walkway Credit (for 100% of sidewalk area -$0.04”.
where the pedestrian pathway is maintained per DDOT
Pedestrian Safety and Work Zone Standards: Covered
and Open Walkway)
Sec. 6143. Section 9e(b)(4) of the Department of Transportation Establishment Act of
2002, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-370; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.13(b)(4)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(4) Public inconvenience fees, described in 24 DCMR § 225.1(c), after the first
$4,086,000 in revenue from such fees per fiscal year;”.
SUBTITLE P. BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS
Sec. 6151. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Building Energy Performance Standards Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6152. Section 301 of the CleanEnergy DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2018,
effective March 22, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-257; D.C. Official Code § 8-1772.21), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “Beginning January 1, 2028”
and inserting the phrase “Beginning January 1, 2029” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “Beginning January 1, 2034”
and inserting the phrase “Beginning January 1, 2035” in its place.
142

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Subsection (b)(1)(A) is amended by striking the date “January 1, 2028” and inserting
the date “January 1, 2029” in its place.
(c) Subsection (d)(2A) is amended by striking the date “January 1, 2028” and inserting
the date “January 1, 2029” in its place.
SUBTITLE Q. SPORT UTILITY VEHICLES
Sec. 6161. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Zero-Emission Sport Utility Vehicle Purchases
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6162. Section 3402 of the EPA Miles Per Gallon Requirement for Passenger
Automobiles Purchased by the District Act of 2000, effective October 19, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-
172; D.C. Official Code § 50-203), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “per gallon, and shall not be a sports
utility vehicle” and inserting the phrase “per gallon” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) The District of Columbia government shall not purchase a sport utility vehicle for
government use unless the sport utility vehicle is:
“(1) A security, emergency, rescue, snow-removal, or armored vehicle; or
“(2) A zero-emission vehicle that:
“(A) Is capable of detecting objects or persons 3 feet or taller starting from
at least 2 feet from the front, sides, and back of the vehicle;
“(B) Is equipped with an automatic emergency braking system that is
engaged when the system detects an imminent collision with a vehicle, object, or pedestrian in
the path of the vehicle;
“(C) Is equipped with a blind spot monitor that is engaged when an object
or person is detected in the blind spot of the vehicle;
“(D) Weighs no more than 5,500 pounds;
“(E) Has a hood height of no more than 36 inches; and
“(F) Has a front end with a downward slope of no less than 65 degrees.”.
SUBTITLE R. ELECTRIC VEHICLE PURCHASES
Sec. 6171. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Electric Vehicle Purchases Emergency Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 6172. Section 109e(b) of the District Department of the Environment Establishment
Act of 2005, effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-176; D.C. Official Code § 8-
143

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
151.09e(b)), is amended by striking the phrase “Beginning January 1, 2026” and inserting the
phrase “Beginning January 1, 2031” in its place.
SUBTITLE S. CARRIER-FOR-HIRE AND FOOD ACCESS SUPPORT
Sec. 6181. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Carrier-for-Hire and Food Access Support Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6182. The District of Columbia Taxicab Commission Establishment Act of 1985,
effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-97; D.C. Official Code § 50-301.01 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 11a(b)(3)(A) (D.C. Official Code § 50-301.10a(b)(3)(A)) is amended to read
as follows:
“(3)(A) Thirteen community representatives, who do not work for the District
government, appointed by the Mayor as follows:
“(i) Two District residents who operate a public or private vehicle-
for-hire in the District;
“(ii) Two representatives of companies providing vehicle-for-hire
industry services in the District;
“(iii) Two District residents with experience as a carrier-for-hire
operator;
“(iv) Two representatives of companies providing carrier-for-hire
industry services in the District;
“(v) Two representatives of the hospitality, food service, or
tourism industry in the District; and
“(vi) Three District residents unaffiliated with the for-hire industry,
who regularly use vehicle- or carrier-for-hire services in the District.”.
(b) Section 20a (D.C. Official Code § 50-301.20) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by adding a new paragraph (1A) to read as follows:
“(1A) Funds collected annually from a carrier-for-hire support surcharge pursuant
to section 20j-8(e)(3);”.
(2) Subsection (b)(1) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(C) A new subparagraph (E) is added to read as follows:
“(E) May be used to establish programs or provide grants, loans,
144

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
incentives, and other financial assistance to support the carrier-for-hire industry, including for the
following purposes:
“(i) Carrier-for-hire operator safety;
“(ii) Carrier-for-hire operator benefits and economic wellbeing;
“(iii) Delivery mode shift, as set forth in section 20j-13;
“(iv) Food access for residents in underserved residents of the
District; and
“(v) Support of food service and retail businesses in the District.”.
(c) Section 20j-8 (D.C. Official Code § 50-301.29h) is amended by adding a new
subsection (e) to read as follows:
“(e)(1) Every 3 months, a carrier-for-hire company shall transmit to the Office of the
Chief Financial Officer a carrier-for-hire support surcharge, assessed to each carrier-for-hire trip
that physically terminates in the District of Columbia, of an amount not less than 20 cents.
“(2) Of the first $7,000,000 collected annually pursuant to this subsection,
$300,000 shall be deposited in the Public Vehicles-for-Hire Consumer Service Fund established
by section 20a, with the remainder being deposited in the local funds of the District of Columbia.
“(3) Of any amount collected annually pursuant to this section in excess of
$7,000,000, 10 percent shall be deposited in the Public Vehicles-for-Hire Consumer Service
Fund established by section 20a, with the remainder being deposited in the local funds of the
District of Columbia.”.
SUBTITLE T. PUBLIC RESTROOMS PROGRAM
Sec. 6191. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Public Restrooms Program Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6192. The Public Restroom Facilities Installation and Promotion Act of 2018,
effective April 11, 2019, (D.C. Law 22-280; D.C. Official Code § 10-1051 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 4a(c) (D.C. Official Code § 10-1053.01(c)) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Subject to available funding, the Director shall designate the initial placement of
public restroom facilities as follows:
“(1) Three in Ward 1;
“(2) Two in Ward 2;
“(3) Two in Ward 5;
“(4) Two in Ward 6;
“(5) One in Ward 7; and
“(6) One in Ward 8.”.
145

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Section 4b (D.C. Official Code § 10-1053.02) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(2) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b)(1) Within one year of the effective date of the Public Restrooms Program
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled
version of Bill 26-724), the Director shall submit proposed guidelines for installation of public
restroom facilities to the Public Space Committee, as established by Mayor’s Order 2009-114,
dated June 18, 2009 (56 DCR 6862). The guidelines shall be considered in accordance with
existing laws and regulations by the Public Space Committee, which shall endeavor to
standardize the site selection and approval process for public restroom facilities.
“(2) The guidelines proposed pursuant to this subsection shall consider rules to
enable the installation of public restroom facilities in curb lanes.”.
(c) Section 4c (D.C. Official Code § 10-1053.03) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated subsection (a).
(2) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b) The contract authorized by section 4a(b) shall allow for third-party sponsorships, to
be displayed on the exterior of a public restroom facility.”.
Sec. 6193. Section 603a of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Act of 1996, effective
December 2, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-48; D.C. Official Code § 10-1141.03a), is amended by adding a
new subsection (c) to read as follows:
“(c) The Mayor shall waive any permit fee, including the application fee and any public
space rental fee to occupy or otherwise use public space, public rights of way, or public
structures for any application related to the public restroom facility program established by
section 4a of the Public Restroom Facilities Installation and Promotion Act of 2018, effective
September 6, 2023 (D.C. Law 25-50; D.C. Official Code § 10-1053.01).”.
SUBTITLE U. ZERO WASTE ACCELERATION
Sec. 6201. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Zero Waste Acceleration Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6202. (a) The Department of Public Works is authorized to make direct purchases of
waste receptacles from vendors. Such purchases:
(1) Shall be for the purposes of piloting containerization solutions and their
impact on:
(A) Vector control and rodent abatement;
(B) Illegal dumping;
(C) Pet waste management;
146

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(D) Neighborhood cleanliness;
(E) User experience; and
(F) Operational efficiency.
(2) Shall be exempt from the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010,
effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.);
(3) Shall be limited in quantity to no more than 24 total units of any model of
container; and
(4) May include receptacles placed in the public right-of-way for the purpose of
consolidating nearby household solid waste collections to a single location.
(b) This section shall expire on October 1, 2028.
SUBTITLE V. GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS STUDY
Sec. 6211. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Greenhouse Gas Emissions Study Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6212. The District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of 2005,
effective February 15, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-51; D.C. Official Code § 8-151.01 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new section 109i to read as follows:
“Sec. 109i. Greenhouse gas emissions study.
“(a) No later than April 15, 2027, DOEE shall solicit proposals for the purpose of issuing
a grant in the amount of $200,000 to an organization with expertise in attribution science to
conduct a study on the total costs of greenhouse gas emissions in the District between the years
of 1995 and 2024 and to compile the report described in subsection (c) of this section.
“(b) No later than June 15, 2027, DOEE shall select the grant recipient to conduct the
study.
“(c) The grant recipient, alongside DOEE, shall compile a report detailing the findings of
the study that shall include:
“(1) A summary of the various cost-driving effects of greenhouse gas emissions
from the relevant time period on the District, including effects on public health, natural
resources, biodiversity, agriculture, economic development, flood preparedness and safety,
housing, and any other effect that the grantee and DOEE determine to be relevant;
“(2) A categorized calculation of the costs that have been incurred and costs that
are projected to be incurred by the District and its residents for each effect identified under
paragraph (1) of this subsection;
“(3) A categorized calculation of the costs that have been incurred and costs that
are projected to be incurred by the District and its residents to adapt to the effects of covered
greenhouse gas emissions during the covered period; and
147

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) An economic analysis to determine whether there would be a cost passed on
to taxpayers as a result of requiring each fossil fuel company that has a sufficient nexus to the
District and emitted more than 1 billion tons of greenhouse gas emissions globally between 1995
and 2024 to compensate the District for costs related to necessary adaptation to and disaster
recovery from intensifying extreme weather.
“(d) The report shall be submitted by the grant recipient to the Mayor and the Council
committee with jurisdiction over DOEE no later than June 15, 2028.
“(e) If requested, the grant recipient shall appear before the Council committee with
jurisdiction over DOEE to report on the total assessed cost of greenhouse gas emissions in the
District based on the findings of the study.”.
SUBTITLE W. ADVANCING COMMUNITY NEEDS AT WARD 5
RECREATION CENTERS
Sec. 6221. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Advancing Community Needs at Ward 5 Recreation
Centers Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6222. Ward 5 recreation centers.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the District may not expend any funds to
construct or demolish any structure or recreational facility or to issue a permit for the
construction, demolition, or occupancy of public space at the Langdon Park and Community
Center, located at Lot 820 in Square 4215 and Lot 828 in Square 4216, unless the design for the
modernization of the Langdon Park and Community Center includes a:
(1) Gymnasium that is equipped for multi-sport use, including basketball; and
(2) Skate park with a 360-degree bowl.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the District may not expend any funds to
construct or demolish any structure or recreational facility or to issue a permit for the
construction, demolition, or occupancy of public space at the Harry Thomas Recreation Center,
located at Lots 891 and 894 in Square 3530 and Lot 808 in Square 3527, unless the design for the
modernization of Harry Thomas Recreation Center and its adjacent fields, courts, and gardens:
(1) Includes improvements to pedestrian accessibility throughout the entire
campus, including at adjacent properties operated by the District of Columbia Public Schools and
the Department of Human Services;
(2) Includes public restrooms that open directly to the park and can be used by
residents even when the recreation center is closed; and
(3) Ensures that the interior of the building can function as a vibrant community
space suitable for public uses, including community meetings, classes, and the longstanding
kickboxing program.
148

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE X. ADULT LEARNER TRANSIT SUBSIDY
Sec. 6231. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Adult Learner Transit Subsidy Increase Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6232. Section 6047(c) of the Student, Foster Youth, Summer Youth Employee, and
Adult Learner Transit Subsidies Act of 2019, effective September 11, 2019 (D.C. Law 23-16;
D.C. Official Code § 35-246(c)), is amended by striking the phrase “least $70 per” and inserting
the phrase “least $100 per” in its place.
SUBTITLE Y. CRIAC CLARIFICATION
Sec. 6241. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “CRIAC Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 6242. The District of Columbia Public Works Act of 1954, approved May 18, 1954
(68 Stat. 104; D.C. Official Code § 34-2101 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 207 (D.C. Official Code § 34-2107) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) A billing methodology that takes into account both the water consumption of,
and water service to, a property where water is supplied from the District water supply system.”.
(2) Subsection (c) is repealed.
(b) Section 208 (D.C. Official Code § 34-2108) is amended by adding a new subsection
(d) to read as follows:
“(d) The owner or occupant of each property in the District shall pay any impervious area
charge that the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority establishes pursuant to section
216(c-1) of the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and Department of Public Works
Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-111; D.C. Official Code §
34-2202.16(c-1)).”.
Sec. 6243. Section 216 of the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and Department
of Public Works Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-111; D.C.
Official Code § 34-2202.16), is amended as follows:
(a) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
“(c-1)(1)(A) The Authority shall assess an impervious area charge on any property in the
District based on a billing methodology that takes into account the amount of impervious surface
on a property that either prevents or retards the entry of water into the ground as occurring under
149

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
natural conditions, or that causes water to run off the surface in greater quantities or at an
increased rate of flow, relative to the flow present under natural conditions.
“(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “surface” includes
rooftops, footprints of patios, driveways, private streets, other paved areas, athletic courts and
swimming pools, and any path or walkway that is covered by impervious material.
“(2) The impervious area charge shall be the obligation of the property owner.
Failure to pay the impervious area charge shall result in a lien being placed upon the property
without further notice to the owner. The Mayor may enforce the lien in the same manner as in
section 104 of the District of Columbia Public Works Act of 1954, approved May 18, 1954 (68
Stat. 102; D.C. Official Code § 34-2407.02).
“(3) Any owner or occupant of a property that is assessed an impervious area
charge may contest an impervious area charge bill according to the same procedures provided to
owners or occupants of properties that receive water and sewer service, under section 1805 of the
District of Columbia Public Works Act of 1954, effective June 13, 1990 (D.C. Law 8-136; D.C.
Official Code § 34-2305).”.
(b) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “including the” and inserting the
phrase “including the impervious area charge and the” in its place.
Sec. 6244. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of March 25, 2009.
SUBTITLE Z. DC WATER LATE FEE CLARIFICATION
Sec. 6251. This subtitle may be cited as the “DC Water and Sewer Authority Late
Fee Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6252. Section 216(d) of the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and
Department of Public Works Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996 (D.C. Law
11-111; D.C. Official Code § 34-2202.16(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d) The Authority may impose additional charges and penalties for late payment of bills
not exceeding a charge of 10% for any charges or bills remaining unpaid for more than 30 days,
and a penalty at the rate of 1% per month compounded monthly for any charges or bills that
remain unpaid for more than 60 days.”.
Sec. 6253. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of April 18, 1996.
SUBTITLE AA. DISTRICT WATERWAYS MANAGEMENT CLARIFICATION
Sec. 6261. Short title.
150

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “District Waterways Management Clarification
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6262. The Office of District Waterways Management Establishment Act of 2022,
effective March 22, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-336; D.C. Official Code § 8-191.01 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 8-191.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b)(1)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “pursuant to section
2(e) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-141; D.C. Official
Code § 1-523.01(e)),” and inserting the phrase “pursuant to section 2(f) of the Confirmation Act
of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-141; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(f)),” in its
place.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the period and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(C) New paragraphs (11) and (12) are added to read as follows:
“(11) The Department of Parks and Recreation; and
“(12) The Office of Planning.”.
(3) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) The Mayor shall request that each of the following federal agencies or entities
appoint a representative as an ex officio non-voting member of the Commission:
“(1) The National Park Service;
“(2) The United States Coast Guard;
“(3) The United States Army Corps of Engineers;
“(4) The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority;
“(5) The National Capital Planning Commission;
“(6) Fort Lesley J. McNair;
“(7) Joint Base Anacostia-Bolling; and
“(8) The Washington Navy Yard.”.
(4) Subsection (f) is amended by striking the phrase “once every month” and
inserting the phrase “once every 2 months” in its place.
(b) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 8-191.03) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language of subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “one year” and insert the phrase “2 years” in its
place.
151

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(B) Strike the phrase “develop and adopt” and insert the word “develop”
in its place.
(2) Subsection (b)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “At least 60 days prior to
adoption of an Advisory Plan, the” and inserting the word “The” in its place.
(3) Subsections (c) and (d) are amended to read as follows:
“(c)(1) After conclusion of the public comment period, and within 60 days after
completing revisions, if any, the voting members of the Commission shall, by majority vote of
members present and voting, adopt the Advisory Plan. Thereupon, the Advisory Plan shall be
submitted to the Office of District Waterways Management for publication.
“(2) Minority views of Commission members shall be included in an appendix to
the Advisory Plan.
“(d) If considered necessary by the Commission, the Advisory Plan shall be updated at
least once every 3 years, following the same process required for the initial Advisory Plan
pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.”.
Sec. 6263. Section 2(f) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C.
Law 2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(f)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (72) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (73) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
(c) A new paragraph (74) is added to read as follows:
“(74) The District Waterways Advisory Commission, established by section 3(a)
of the Office of District Waterways Management Establishment Act of 2022, effective March 22,
2023 (D.C. Law 24-336; D.C. Official Code § 8-191.02(a)); and”.
Sec. 6264. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of August 13, 2026.
SUBTITLE BB. ENERGY EFFICIENCY FINANCING BOND CAP
Sec. 6271. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Energy Efficiency Bond Cap Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6272. Section 202(a) of the Energy Efficiency Financing Act of 2010, effective May
27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-183; D.C. Official Code § 8-1778.22(a)), is amended by striking the
phrase “of bonds in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $250 million” and inserting the
phrase “of bonds” in its place.
152

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE CC. ENFORCING TRUCK-RESTRICTED ROUTES
Sec. 6281. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Enforcing Truck-Restricted Routes Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6282. Section 103 of the Safety-Based Traffic Enforcement Amendment Act of
2012, effective May 1, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-307; D.C. Official Code § 50-2209.11), is amended
by adding a new subsection (c) to read as follows:
“(c) By September 30, 2027, the Mayor shall:
“(1) Purchase at least 3 new truck-restricted route automated enforcement
cameras; and
“(2) Have operating in Ward 5 the cameras purchased pursuant to paragraph (1)
of this subsection.”.
SUBTITLE DD. DDOT GRANT AUTHORITY
Sec. 6291. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “District Department of Transportation Budget
Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6292. Section 3(c) of the Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002,
effective May 21, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-137; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.02(c)), is amended by
adding a new paragraph (6) to read as follows:
“(6) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Director shall issue
grants, including grants in excess of $1 million, for the purpose of supporting the DC Trail
Rangers Program.”.
Sec. 6293. Section 8062(a) of the 11th Street Bridge Park Funding Limitations Act of
2015, effective October 22, 2015 (D.C. Law 21-36; 62 DCR 10905), is amended by striking the
phrase “at least $35 million in construction costs has been raised from private donors” and
inserting the phrase “at least 43.5% of the total projected construction costs of the project have
been raised from non-District funds” in its place.
Sec. 6294. The District Department of Transportation may enter into agreements to allow
for the private sponsorship of recreational facilities or other improvements related to the Garfield
Park Connector, including:
(1) Sports fields and courts;
(2) Facilities or containers for storage;
153

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) Facilities or venues for vending; and
(4) Art installations.
SUBTITLE EE. PERFORMANCE PARKING ZONE FUND MODIFICATION
Sec. 6301. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Performance Parking Zone Fund Modification
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 6302. Section 2a of the Performance Parking Pilot Zone Act of 2008, effective
September 14, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-21; D.C. Official Code § 50-2531.01), is amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 2a. Greater U Street Parking Benefit Fund.”.
(b) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Greater U Street Parking Benefit Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered in accordance with subsections (b) and (c) of this
section.”.
(c) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Up to 5% may be used to pay for maintenance of parking meters, signage and
other costs related to operation of the Greater U Street Performance Parking Zone;”.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) In Fiscal Years 2026 and 2027, up to $2,550,000 may be used support the
Automated Curbside Management Program as established in section 3a of the Commercial
Curbside Loading Zone Implementation Act of 2009, passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026
(Enrolled version of Bill 26-724); provided, that any funds used pursuant to this paragraph shall
be replenished by excess loading zone management program revenue as set forth in section 9e(b-
2) of the Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C.
Law 18-370; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.13(b-2)).
(3) New paragraphs (4) and (5) are added to read as follows:
“(4)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this subsection, in Fiscal Year 2027,
the Department of Small and Local Business Development is authorized to award a grant in
the amount of $1 million from the Fund to support a place management organization in the
area covered by the Greater U Street Performance Parking Zone, as established in section
8a(a).
“(B) Starting in Fiscal Year 2028, up to $800,000 of revenue from the
Fund shall be distributed annually to support place management activities in the area covered
by the Greater U Street Performance Parking Zone in the form of a matching grant to the
organization performing those activities for every dollar raised from other sources, including
154

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
BID taxes as defined in section 3(8) of the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996,
effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.02(8)).
“(5) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), beginning in
Fiscal Year 2028, up to $250,000 annually may be awarded as a grant to support the
operations of the African American Civil War Museum, located at 1925 Vermont Avenue,
NW.”.
Sec. 6303. The Commercial Curbside Loading Zone Implementation Act of 2009,
effective October 22, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-66; D.C. Official Code § 50-2651 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 50-2651) is repealed.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 50-2652) is repealed.
(c) A new section 3a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. Automated Curbside Management Program.
“(a) The District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) shall establish an
Automated Curbside Management Program (“Program”) that manages the use of curbside
space through:
“(1) Cameras, sensors, or other technology that obtain and transmit real-time
information regarding the use of curbside space;
“(2) An automated payment system that can charge, invoice, or otherwise
collect payment from individuals for the lawful use of curbside space, including through an
account-based or subscription system available through a browser-based or mobile
application; and
“(3) The issuance of fines or the assessment of points against individuals or
their motor vehicles for the unlawful use of curbside space, including parking and other non-
moving violations.
“(b) The Program:
“(1) May use dynamic pricing that adjusts fees for the use of curbside space
based on duration, location, time of day, and current demand; and
“(2) Shall manage curbside space reserved for picking up and dropping off
passengers or loading and unloading goods through an automated payment system as described
in subsection (a)(2) of this section.
“(c)(1) No later than 6 months after the applicability date of this section, DDOT shall
begin operating the Program.
“(2) The Mayor may, for the first month during which the Program is in effect,
issue warning citations that do not impose a monetary penalty.
“(d)(1) DDOT may contract with, enter into a franchise agreement with, or enter into a
155

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
revenue-sharing agreement with a third-party vendor to implement the requirements of this
section.
“(2) For any request for proposal or any other solicitation of a contract related
to the implementation of the requirements of this section as authorized under paragraph (1) of
this subsection, DDOT shall prioritize applicants whose technology provides, or can provide,
additional functionality, such as:
“(A) Automated lane enforcement;
“(B) Automated traffic enforcement for moving violations; and
“(C) Dynamic pricing.
“(e) For the purposes of this section, the term “curbside space” means the space within
a street or road adjacent to the curb designated for parking, picking up and dropping off
passengers, or loading and unloading goods.”.
Sec. 6304. Section 9e of the Department of Transportation Establishment Act of
2002, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-370; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.13), is
amended by adding a new subsection (b-2) to read as follows:
“(b-2) Notwithstanding subsection (b)(6) of this section, loading zone management
program revenue that exceeds projected revenues incorporated in the Fiscal Year 2027
budget and financial plan shall be deposited in the Greater U Street Parking Benefit Fund
established by section 2a of the Performance Parking Pilot Zone Act of 2008, effective
September 14, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-21; D.C. Official Code § 50-2531.01), in an amount equal
to any amount utilized from that the Greater U Street Parking Benefit Fund to initiate and
operate the Automated Curbside Management Program, established pursuant to section 3a of
the Commercial Curbside Loading Zone Implementation Act of 2009, passed on emergency
basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-724).”.
Sec. 6305. Applicability.
Section 6302 shall apply as of the effective date of the Fiscal Year 2026 Revised
Local Budget Adjustment Emergency Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on June 23,
2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-662).
TITLE VII. FINANCE AND REVENUE
SUBTITLE A. SALES TAX INCREASE DELAY
Sec. 7001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Sales Tax Increase Delay Emergency Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 7002. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
156

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) The lead-in language of section 47-2002(a) is amended by striking the phrase “shall
be 6.0% before October 1, 2026, and 7.0% beginning on October 1, 2026,” and inserting the
phrase “shall be 6.0% before October 1, 2027, and 7.0% beginning on October 1, 2027,” in its
place.
(b) The lead-in language of section 47-2202(a) is amended by striking the phrase “shall
be 6.0% before October 1, 2026, and 7.0% beginning on October 1, 2026,” and inserting the
phrase “shall be 6.0% before October 1, 2027, and 7.0% beginning on October 1, 2027,” in its
place.
SUBTITLE B. HOTEL AND RENTAL CAR TAX
Sec. 7011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Hotel and Rental Car Taxes Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7012. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Chapter 20 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-2002(a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (3)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “or (g);” and
inserting the phrase “or (g); and” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (4B) is amended to read as follows:
“(4B)(A) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
“(i) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30,
2026; and
“(ii) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing thereafter;
and
“(B) The tax rates established pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph shall apply to the sale or charges from any transactions for the sharing of a vehicle or
utility trailer made through a marketplace as defined in § 47-2001(g-4), including a peer-to-peer
sharing program, regardless of whether the rental vehicle or utility trailer is owned by a rental
operator as defined in § 50-1505.01(6) or part of a rental fleet as defined in § 50-1505.01(5).”.
(2) Section 47-2002.03a is amended as follows:
(A) Subsection (a)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “on or after April
1, 2023, and on or before September 30, 2027” and inserting the phrase “on or after April 1,
2023” in its place.
(B) Subsection (c)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Beginning October 1, 2025, the tax revenue received pursuant to subsection
(a)(2) of this section shall be deposited and dedicated as follows:
157

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) In Fiscal Year 2026, $10,466,000 shall be deposited in the Economic
Development Special Account established by § 2-1225.21 and the remainder shall be deposited
in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.
“(B) In Fiscal Year 2027, $6,140,000 shall be deposited in the Economic
Development Special Account established by § 2-1225.21 and the remainder shall be deposited
in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.
“(C) In Fiscal Year 2028 and each subsequent fiscal year:
“(i) Two-thirds shall be dedicated to the Washington Convention
and Sports Authority, for transfer to Destination DC, pursuant to a memorandum of
understanding, for the purposes of marketing and promoting the District as a destination, and
such amounts shall be in addition to the funds dedicated to Destination DC pursuant to § 10-
1202.08a; and
“(ii) One-third shall be dedicated to the Washington Convention
and Sports Authority, for transfer to the Washington DC Economic Partnership, pursuant to a
memorandum of understanding, to be used for the purposes outlined in § 10-1202.08a(e)(4).”.
(b) Section 47-2202(a)(3B) is amended to read as follows:
“(3B)(A) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
“(i) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30,
2026; and
“(ii) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing thereafter;
and
“(B) The tax rates established pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph shall apply to the sale or charges from any transactions for the sharing of a vehicle or
utility trailer made through a marketplace as defined in § 47-2001(g-4), including a peer-to-peer
sharing program, regardless of whether the rental vehicle or utility trailer is owned by a rental
operator as defined in § 50-1505.01(6) or part of a rental fleet as defined in § 50-1505.01(5);”.
Sec. 7013. Section 301(d-4) of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation and
Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Act of 2008, effective March 26, 2008 (D.C.
Law 17-138; D.C. Official Code § 2-1225.21(d-4)), is repealed.
SUBTITLE C. BENEFIT FUND CONTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 7021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Frequency Standardization for Contributions to District
Government Employee Benefit Funds Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
158

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7022. The District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of
1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-601.01 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 2109 (D.C. Official Code § 1-621.09) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) On the 15th and 30th day of each month (or, in a month with fewer than 30 days, on
the 15th and last day of the month), the Chief Financial Officer shall deposit into the Fund the
pro rata portion of the amount that has been appropriated for the purpose of funding the District
contribution for the health and life insurance premiums of annuitants. The Chief Financial
Officer may also deposit into the Fund any balances in rate stabilization fund reserves that are
refunded to the District by a health insurance carrier.”.
(2) Subsection (d-3) is amended by striking the phrase “, subject to
appropriation.” and inserting a period in its place.
(b) Section 2609 (D.C. Official Code § 1-626.09) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “not less frequently than
quarterly” and inserting the phrase “on the 15th and 30th day of each month (or, in a month with
fewer than 30 days, on the 15th and last day of the month)” in its place.
(2) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “not less frequently than
quarterly” and inserting the phrase “on the 15th and 30th day of each month (or, in a month with
fewer than 30 days, on the 15th and last day of the month)” in its place.
Sec. 7023. Section 132(b) of the Police Officers, Fire Fighters, and Teachers Retirement
Benefit Replacement Plan Act of 1998, effective September 19, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-152; D.C.
Official Code § 1-907.02(b)), is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) The amount appropriated as the District of Columbia payment shall be deposited
by the Office of the Chief Financial Officer in the appropriate separate fund comprising the
Funds on the 15th and 30th day of every month (or, in a month with fewer than 30 days, on the
15th and last day of the month). Each such payment shall be equal to 1/24th of the full
contribution amount due for the fiscal year, calculated as provided in section 133(a).
“(2) In the next District of Columbia Retirement Board experience study, which
shall be conducted no later than October 1, 2032, the Retirement Board shall examine whether
the bi-weekly payment schedule established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection has had
an adverse impact on the Retirement Board’s cash flow or funding levels of the Funds.”.
SUBTITLE D. NAVY YARD BID REDESIGNATION
Sec. 7031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Navy Yard BID Redesignation Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
159

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7032. The Business Improvement District Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996
(D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) The lead-in language of section 3(24)(B) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.02(24)(B)) is
amended by striking the phrase “NoMa, Capitol Riverfront, Downtown” and inserting the phrase
“NoMa, Navy Yard, Downtown” in its place.
(b) Section 208 (D.C. Official Code 2-1215.58) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “Capitol Riverfront”
and inserting the phrase “Navy Yard” in its place.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “the formation of the Capitol
Riverfront BID” and inserting the phrase “the formation of the Navy Yard BID” in its place.
(3) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “The Capitol Riverfront BID
shall” and inserting the phrase “The Navy Yard BID shall” in its place.
(4) The lead-in language of subsection (c)(1) is amended by striking the phrase
“Capitol Riverfront BID shall be” and inserting the phrase “Navy Yard BID shall be” in its
place.
Sec. 7033. Section 47-857.11(2) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
striking the phrase “described as the Capitol Riverfront BID” and inserting the phrase “described
as the Navy Yard BID” in its place.
SUBTITLE E. NORTHEAST HEIGHTS TIF
Sec. 7041. Short title
This subtitle may be cited as the “Northeast Heights Tax Increment Financing Emergency
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7042. Definitions.
For the purposes of this subtitle, the term:
(1) “Authorized Delegate” means the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development, the Chief Financial Officer, the Treasurer, or any officer or employee of the
executive office of the Mayor to whom the Mayor has delegated any of the Mayor’s functions
under this subtitle pursuant to section 422(6) of the Home Rule Act.
(2) “Available Real Property Tax Revenues” means the revenues resulting from
the imposition of the tax provided for in Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia
Official Code, inclusive of any penalties and interest charges, exclusive of the special tax
provided for in section 481 of the Home Rule Act pledged to payment of general obligation
indebtedness of the District.
160

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) “Available Sales Tax Revenues” means the revenues resulting from the
imposition of the tax under Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code,
including penalty and interest charges, exclusive of the portion thereof required to be deposited
in the Washington Convention Center Fund established pursuant to section 208 of the
Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994, effective September 28, 1994 (D.C. Law
10-188; D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.08), and any amounts to be made available to the
Washington Metropolitan Transit Authority pursuant to section 7101 of the Revised Revenue
Contingency List Act of 2017, effective December 13, 2017 (D.C. Law 22-33; 64 DCMR 7652),
and section 2(b)(2)(A) of the Stable and Reliable Source of WMATA Revenues Act of 1982,
effective April 30, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-103; D.C. Official Code § 9-1111.15(b)(2)(A)).
(4) “Available Tax Increment,” means the sum of the Available Sales Tax
Revenues and Available Real Property Tax Revenues generated in the Northeast Heights TIF
Area in any fiscal year of the District minus the sum of Available Sales Tax Revenues and
Available Real Property Tax Revenues generated in the Northeast Heights TIF Area in the
applicable base year.
(5) “Bond Counsel” means a firm or firms of attorneys designated as bond
counsel from time to time by the Mayor.
(6) “Bonds” means the District of Columbia revenue bonds, notes, or other
obligations (including refunding bonds, notes, and other obligations), in one or more series,
authorized to be issued pursuant to this subtitle.
(7) “Chief Financial Officer” means the Chief Financial Officer established by
section 424(a)(1) of the Home Rule Act.
(8) “Closing Documents” means all documents and agreements, other than
Financing Documents, that may be necessary and appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the
Bonds, and includes agreements, certificates, letters, opinions, forms, receipts, and other similar
instruments.
(9) “Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.
(10) “Debt Service” means principal, premium, if any, and interest on the Bonds.
(11) “Development Costs” has the same meaning as in section 2(13) of the Tax
Increment Financing Authorization Act of 1998, effective September 11, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-
143; D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.01(13)).
(12) “Development Sponsor” means Standard Real Estate Development, a District
of Columbia limited liability company qualified to do business in the District of Columbia, or
any other entity that undertakes the development of the project with the approval of the Mayor.
(13) “District” means the District of Columbia.
(14) “Financing Documents” means the documents, other than Closing
Documents, that relate to the financing or refinancing of transactions to be effected through the
161

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
issuance, sale, and delivery of the Bonds, including any offering document, and any required
supplements to any such documents.
(15) “Home Rule Act” means the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 774; D.C. Official Code § 1-201.01 et seq.).
(16) “Project” means the financing, refinancing, or reimbursing of Development
Costs incurred within the Northeast Heights TIF Area and adjoining parcels.
(17) “Refunding Bonds” means the District of Columbia bonds, notes, or other
obligations, in one or more series, authorized to be issued pursuant to this subtitle to refund the
Bonds.
(18) “TIF” means tax increment financing.
Sec. 7043. Creation of the Northeast Heights TIF Fund.
(a) There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Northeast Heights TIF Fund. The Chief
Financial Officer shall deposit into the Northeast Heights TIF Fund the Available Tax Increment
and any other taxes or fees specifically designated by law for deposit in the Northeast Heights
TIF Fund.
(b) The Mayor may pledge and create a security interest in the funds in the Northeast
Heights TIF Fund, or any sub-account within the Northeast Heights TIF Fund, for the payment
of debt service on the Bonds without further action by the Council as permitted by section 490(f)
of the Home Rule Act. The payment of debt service shall be made in accordance with the
provisions of the Financing Documents entered into by the District in connection with the
issuance of the Bonds.
(c) If, at the end of any fiscal year of the District, the balance of cash and investments in
the Northeast Heights TIF Fund exceeds the amount of debt service (including prepayment of
principal and interest), reserves on any Bonds, and any approved Bond-related administrative
expenses during the upcoming fiscal year, 50% of the excess shall be used to prepay the
principal of the Bonds or for future reserves or administrative expenses on the Bonds and the
remaining 50% of the excess shall be transferred to the unrestricted balance of the General Fund
of the District of Columbia.
Sec. 7044. Creation of the Northeast Heights TIF Area.
(a) There is created a TIF area designated as the Northeast Heights TIF Area, which shall
consist of Square 5051N, Lot 19; Square 5051, Lots 28, 29, 811; and Square 5044, Lot 814, as
shown on the tax rolls of the District as maintained by the Office of Tax and Revenue.
(b) As provided in section 7043, the Available Tax Increment from the Northeast Heights
TIF Area shall be deposited in the Northeast Heights TIF Fund and may be used for the purposes
set forth in section 7043.
162

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(c)(1) The base year for determination of Available Sales Tax Revenues from locations
within the Northeast Heights TIF Area shall be the tax year preceding the year in which this
subtitle becomes effective.
(2) The base year for determination of Available Real Property Tax Revenues
from properties within the Northeast Heights TIF Area shall be the tax year preceding the year in
which this subtitle becomes effective, and the initial assessed value to be used in making the
determination of Available Real Property Tax Revenues shall be the assessed value of each lot of
taxable real property in the Northeast Heights TIF Area for the tax year preceding the tax year in
which this subtitle becomes effective.
(d) The Northeast Heights TIF Area shall terminate on the earliest of:
(1) December 31, 2056;
(2) The date on which the Bonds are paid in full or are defeased and are no longer
outstanding; or
(3) Five years after the effective date of this subtitle if no Bonds are issued.
Sec. 7045. Bond authorization.
(a) The Council approves and authorizes the issuance of one or more series of Bonds in
an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $47 million to fund the Project. The Bonds, which
may be issued from time to time, in one or more series, shall be tax-exempt or taxable as the
Mayor shall determine and shall be payable and secured as provided in section 7046.
(b) The proceeds of the Bonds shall be used to pay Development Costs of the Project,
financing costs incurred by the District and to fund capitalized interest and required reserves.
(c) The Mayor may pay from the proceeds of the Bonds the financing costs and expenses
of issuing and delivering the Bonds, including underwriting, legal, accounting, financial
advisory, credit enhancement, marketing, sale, and printing costs and expenses.
Sec. 7046. Payment and security.
(a) Except as may be otherwise provided in this subtitle, the principal of, premium on, if
any, and interest on, the Bonds, and the payment of ongoing administrative expenses related to
the Bond financing shall be payable solely from proceeds received from the sale of the Bonds,
income realized from the temporary investment of those proceeds, Available Tax Increment and
other taxes and fees specifically designated by law for deposit into the Northeast Heights TIF
Fund, income realized from the temporary investment of those receipts and revenues prior to
payment to the Bond owners, and other funds that, as provided in the Financing Documents, may
be made available to the District for payment of the Bonds from sources other than the District,
all as provided for in the Financing Documents.
(b) Payment of the Bonds shall be secured as provided in the Financing Documents and
by an assignment by the District for the benefit of the Bond owners of certain of its rights under
163

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
the Financing Documents and Closing Documents to the trustee for the Bonds pursuant to the
Financing Documents.
(c) The trustee or paying agent is authorized to deposit, invest, and disburse the proceeds
received from the sale of the Bonds pursuant to the Financing Documents.
Sec. 7047. Bond details.
(a) The Mayor is authorized to take any action reasonably necessary or appropriate in
accordance with this subtitle in connection with the preparation, execution, issuance, sale,
delivery, security for, and payment of the Bonds of each class and series, including
determinations of:
(1) The final form, content, designation, and terms of the Bonds, including a
determination that the Bonds may be issued in certificated or book-entry form;
(2) The principal amount of the Bonds to be issued and denominations of the
Bonds;
(3) The rate or rates of interest or the method for determining the rate or rates of
interest on the Bonds;
(4) The date or dates of issuance, sale, and delivery of, and the payment of interest
on, the Bonds, and the maturity date or dates of the Bonds;
(5) The terms under which the Bonds may be paid, optionally or mandatorily
redeemed, accelerated, tendered, called, or put for redemption, repurchase, or remarketing before
their respective stated maturities;
(6) Provisions for the registration, transfer, and exchange of the Bonds and the
replacement of mutilated, lost, stolen, or destroyed Bonds;
(7) The creation of any reserve fund, sinking fund, or other fund with respect to
the Bonds;
(8) The time and place of payment of the Bonds;
(9) Procedures for monitoring the use of the proceeds received from the sale of
the Bonds to ensure that the proceeds are properly applied and used to accomplish the purposes
of the Home Rule Act and this subtitle;
(10) Actions necessary to qualify the Bonds under blue sky laws of any
jurisdiction where the Bonds are marketed; and
(11) The terms and types of any credit enhancement under which the Bonds may
be secured.
(b) The Bonds shall contain a legend which shall provide that the Bonds are special
obligations of the District, are without recourse to the District, are not a pledge of, and do not
involve, the faith and credit or the taxing power of the District (other than the Available Tax
Increment, and any other taxes and fees allocated to the Northeast Heights TIF Fund), do not
164

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
constitute a debt of the District, and do not constitute lending of the public credit for private
undertakings as prohibited in section 602(a)(2) of the Home Rule Act.
(c) The Bonds shall be executed in the name of the District and on its behalf by the
manual or facsimile signature of the Mayor, and attested by the Secretary of the District of
Columbia by the Secretary’s manual or facsimile signature.
(d) The official seal of the District, or a facsimile of it, shall be impressed, printed, or
otherwise reproduced on the Bonds.
(e) The Bonds of any series may be issued in accordance with the terms of a trust
instrument to be entered into by the District and a trustee or paying agent to be selected by the
Mayor, and may be subject to the terms of one or more agreements entered into by the Mayor
pursuant to section 490(a)(4) of the Home Rule Act.
(f) The Bonds may be issued at any time or from time to time in one or more issues and
in one or more series.
(g) The Bonds are declared to be issued for essential public and governmental purposes.
The Bonds, the interest thereon, and the income therefrom, and all funds pledged or available to
pay or secure the payment of the Bonds, shall at all times be exempt from taxation by the
District, except for estate, inheritance, and gift taxes.
(h) The District pledges, covenants, and agrees with the holders of the Bonds that, subject
to the provisions of the Financing Documents, the District will not limit or alter the revenues
pledged to secure the Bonds or the basis on which such revenues are collected or allocated, will
not impair the contractual obligations of the District to fulfill the terms of any agreement made
with the holders of the Bonds, will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of
the Bonds, and will not modify, in any way, the exemptions from taxation provided for in this
subtitle, until the Bonds, together with interest thereon, and all costs and expenses in connection
with any suit, action, or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders of the Bonds, are fully met and
discharged. This pledge and agreement for the District may be included as part of the contract
with the holders of the Bonds. This subsection constitutes a contract between the District and the
holders of the Bonds. To the extent that any acts or resolutions of the Council may be in conflict
with this subtitle, this subtitle shall be controlling.
(i) Consistent with section 490(a)(4)(B) of the Home Rule Act and notwithstanding
Article 9 of Subtitle I of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code:
(1) A pledge made and security interest created in respect of the Bonds or
pursuant to any related Financing Document shall be valid, binding, and perfected from the time
the security interest is created, with or without physical delivery of any funds or any property
and with or without any further action;
(2) The lien of the pledge shall be valid, binding, and perfected as against all
parties having any claim of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the District, whether
or not such party has notice; and
165

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) The security interest shall be valid, binding, and perfected whether or not any
statement, document, or instrument relating to the security interest is recorded or filed.
Sec. 7048. Issuance of the Bonds.
(a) The Bonds of any series may be sold at negotiated or competitive sale at, above, or
below par, to one or more persons or entities, and upon terms that the Mayor considers to be in
the best interests of the District.
(b) The Mayor or an Authorized Delegate may execute, in connection with each sale of
the Bonds, offering documents on behalf of the District, may deem final any such offering
document on behalf of the District for purposes of compliance with federal laws and regulations
governing such matters, and may authorize the distribution of the documents in connection with
the Bonds.
(c) The Mayor is authorized to deliver executed and sealed Bonds, on behalf of the
District, for authentication, and, after the Bonds have been authenticated, to deliver the Bonds to
the original purchasers of the Bonds upon payment of the purchase price.
(d) The Bonds shall not be issued until the Mayor receives an approving opinion from
Bond Counsel as to the validity of the Bonds of such series and, if the interest on the Bonds is
expected to be exempt from federal income taxation, the treatment of the interest on the Bonds
for purposes of federal income taxation.
(e) The Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law
18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.), and subchapter III-A of Chapter 3 of Title 47 of
the District of Columbia Official Code shall not apply to any contract the Mayor may from time
to time enter into, or the Mayor may determine to be necessary or appropriate, for the purposes
of this subtitle.
Sec. 7049. Financing and Closing Documents.
(a) The Mayor is authorized to prescribe the final form and content of all Financing
Documents and all Closing Documents to which the District is a party that may be necessary or
appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the Bonds.
(b) The Mayor is authorized to execute, in the name of the District and on its behalf, the
Financing Documents and any Closing Documents to which the District is a party by the
Mayor’s manual or facsimile signature.
(c) If required, the official seal of the District, or a facsimile of it, shall be impressed,
printed, or otherwise reproduced on the Bonds, the other Financing Documents, and the Closing
Documents to which the District is a party.
(d) The Mayor’s execution and delivery of the Financing Documents and the Closing
Documents to which the District is a party shall constitute conclusive evidence of the Mayor’s
166

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
approval, on behalf of the District, of the final form and content of the executed Financing
Documents and the executed Closing Documents.
(e) The Mayor is authorized to deliver the executed and sealed Financing Documents and
Closing Documents, on behalf of the District, prior to or simultaneously with the issuance, sale,
and delivery of the Bonds, and to ensure the due performance of the obligations of the District
contained in the executed, sealed, and delivered Financing Documents and Closing Documents.
Sec. 7050. Limited liability.
(a) The Bonds shall be special obligations of the District. The Bonds shall be without
recourse to the District. The Bonds shall not be general obligations of the District, shall not be a
pledge of, or involve, the faith and credit or the taxing power of the District (other than the
Available Tax Increment and any other taxes or fees allocated to the Northeast Heights TIF
Fund), shall not constitute a debt of the District, and shall not constitute lending of the public
credit for private undertakings as prohibited in section 602(a)(2) of the Home Rule Act.
(b) The Bonds shall not give rise to any pecuniary liability of the District and the District
shall have no obligation with respect to the purchase of the Bonds.
(c) No person, including any Bond owner, shall have any claims against the District or
any of its elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents for monetary damages
suffered as a result of the failure of the District to perform any covenant, undertaking, or
obligation under this subtitle, the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents,
or as a result of the incorrectness of any representation in or omission from the Financing
Documents or the Closing Documents, unless the District or its elected or appointed officials,
officers, employees, or agents have acted in a willful and fraudulent manner.
Sec. 7051. District officials.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 7050(c), the elected or appointed officials,
officers, employees, or agents of the District shall not be liable personally for the payment of the
Bonds or be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance of the Bonds, or for any
representations, warranties, covenants, obligations, or agreements of the District contained in this
subtitle, the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.
(b) The signature, countersignature, facsimile signature, or facsimile countersignature of
any official appearing on the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents shall
be valid and sufficient for all purposes notwithstanding the fact that the individual signatory
ceases to hold that office before delivery of the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing
Documents.
Sec. 7052. Maintenance of documents.
167

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Copies of the specimen Bonds and of the final Financing Documents and Closing
Documents shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of the District of Columbia.
Sec. 7053. Information reporting.
Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the
issuance of the Bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the
Council.
SUBTITLE F. BRYANT STREET PHASE 2 TIF
Sec. 7061. Short title
This subtitle may be cited as the “Bryant Street Phase 2 Tax Increment Financing
Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7062. Definitions.
For the purposes of this subtitle, the term:
(1) “Authorized Delegate” means the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development, the Chief Financial Officer, the Treasurer, or any officer or employee of the
executive office of the Mayor to whom the Mayor has delegated any of the Mayor’s functions
under this subtitle pursuant to section 422(6) of the Home Rule Act.
(2) “Available Real Property Tax Revenues” means the revenues resulting from
the imposition of the tax provided for in Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia
Official Code, inclusive of any penalties and interest charges, exclusive of the special tax
provided for in section 481 of the Home Rule Act pledged to payment of general obligation
indebtedness of the District.
(3) “Available Sales Tax Revenues” means the revenues resulting from the
imposition of the tax under Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code,
including penalty and interest charges, exclusive of the portion thereof required to be deposited
in the Washington Convention Center Fund established pursuant to section 208 of the
Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994, effective September 28, 1994 (D.C. Law
10-188; D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.08), and any amounts to be made available to the
Washington Metropolitan Transit Authority pursuant to section 7101 of the Revised Revenue
Contingency List Act of 2017, effective December 13, 2017 (D.C. Law 22-33; 64 DCMR 7652),
and section 2(b)(2)(A) of the Stable and Reliable Source of WMATA Revenues Act of 1982,
effective April 30, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-103; D.C. Official Code § 9-1111.15(b)(2)(A)).
(4) “Available Tax Increment” means the sum of the Available Sales Tax
Revenues and Available Real Property Tax Revenues generated in the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF
Area in any fiscal year of the District minus the sum of Available Sales Tax Revenues and
168

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Available Real Property Tax Revenues generated in the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Area in the
applicable base year.
(5) “Bond Counsel” means a firm or firms of attorneys designated as bond
counsel from time to time by the Mayor.
(6) “Bonds” means the District of Columbia revenue bonds, notes, or other
obligations (including refunding bonds, notes, and other obligations), in one or more series,
authorized to be issued pursuant to this subtitle.
(7) “Chief Financial Officer” means the Chief Financial Officer established by
section 424(a)(1) of the Home Rule Act.
(8) “Closing Documents” means all documents and agreements, other than
Financing Documents, that may be necessary and appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the
Bonds, and includes agreements, certificates, letters, opinions, forms, receipts, and other similar
instruments.
(9) “Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.
(10) “Debt Service” means principal, premium, if any, and interest on the Bonds.
(11) “Development Costs” has the same meaning as in section 2(13) of the Tax
Increment Financing Authorization Act of 1998, effective September 11, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-
143; D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.01(13)).
(12) “Development Sponsor” means MBR Venture Phase 2, LLC, a Delaware
limited liability company qualified to do business in the District of Columbia, or any other entity
that undertakes the development of the project with the approval of the Mayor.
(13) “District” means the District of Columbia.
(14) “Financing Documents” means the documents, other than Closing
Documents, that relate to the financing or refinancing of transactions to be affected through the
issuance, sale, and delivery of the Bonds, including any offering document, and any required
supplements to any such documents.
(15) “Home Rule Act” means the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 774; D.C. Official Code § 1-201.01 et seq.).
(16) “Project” means the financing, refinancing, or reimbursing of Development
Costs incurred within the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Area and adjoining parcels.
(17) “Refunding Bonds” means the District of Columbia bonds, notes, or other
obligations, in one or more series, authorized to be issued pursuant to this subtitle to refund the
Bonds.
(18) “TIF” means tax increment financing.
Sec. 7063. Creation of the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Fund.
(a) There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Fund. The
Chief Financial Officer shall deposit into the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Fund the Available Tax
169

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Increment and any other taxes or fees specifically designated by law for deposit in the Bryant
Street Phase 2 TIF Fund.
(b) The Mayor may pledge and create a security interest in the funds in the Bryant Street
Phase 2 TIF Fund, or any sub-account within the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Fund, for the
payment of debt service on the Bonds without further action by the Council as permitted by
section 490(f) of the Home Rule Act. The payment of debt service shall be made in accordance
with the provisions of the Financing Documents entered into by the District in connection with
the issuance of the Bonds.
(c) If, at the end of any fiscal year of the District, the balance of cash and investments in
the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Fund exceeds the amount of debt service (including prepayment of
principal and interest), reserves on any Bonds, and any approved Bond-related administrative
expenses during the upcoming fiscal year, 50% of the excess shall be used to prepay the
principal of the Bonds or for future reserves or administrative expenses on the Bonds and the
remaining 50% of the excess shall be transferred to the unrestricted balance of the General Fund
of the District of Columbia.
Sec. 7064. Creation of the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Area.
(a) There is created a TIF area designated as the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Area, which is
defined as the area beginning at a point at the east line of 4th Street, NE, being at the northwest
corner of Lot 13 in Square 3629 as the same is set forth on that certain Plat of Subdivision dated
July 11, 2018, by MRP 600 RI LLC and MBR Investment Partners, LLC and recorded
September 14, 2018, in Subdivision Book 214 at Page 116 among the Records of the Office of
the Surveyor of the District of Columbia, then, running the following 13 courses and distances:
(1) Due east a distance of 671.20 feet to a point; then
(2) Due south a distance of 205.28 feet to a point; then
(3) North 66°20’20” east a distance of 2.52 feet to a point; then
(4) Due south a distance of 66.64 feet to a point; then
(5) South 31°19’30” east a distance of 47.44 feet to a point; then
(6) South 58°40’30” west a distance of 219.12 feet to a point; then
(7) North 31°19'30" west a distance of 27.90 feet to a point; then
(8) South 58°37’36” west a distance of 172.88 feet to a point; then
(9) South 23°48’52” east a distance of 27.99 feet to a point; then
(10) South 58°40’30” west a distance of 33.84 feet to a point; then
(11) North 24°03’30” west a distance of 19.39 feet to a point; then
(12) Due west a distance of 323.37 feet to a point; and then
(13) Due north, a distance of 517.01 feet to the point of beginning,
such area being all of Assessment and Taxation Lot 822 as the same is set forth on that certain
Plat of Subdivision, dated October 30, 2018, as prepared by the Office of Tax and Revenue and
170

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
recorded at A&T Book 3880 at Page H among the Records of the Office of the Surveyor of the
District of Columbia and parts of Assessment and Taxation Lots 823, 824, and 825 as the same
are set forth on that certain Plat of Subdivision, dated January 28, 2022, as prepared by the
Office of Tax and Revenue and recorded at A&T Book 3895 at Page G among the Records of the
Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia.
(b) As provided in section 7063, the Available Tax Increment from the Bryant Street
Phase 2 TIF Area shall be deposited in the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Fund and may be used for
the purposes set forth in section 7063.
(c)(1) The base year for determination of Available Sales Tax Revenues from properties
within the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Area shall be the tax year preceding the year in which this
subtitle becomes effective.
(2) The base year for determination of Available Real Property Tax Revenues
from the properties within the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Area shall be the tax year of the District
preceding the year in which this subtitle becomes effective and the initial assessed value to be
used in making the determination of Available Real Property Tax Revenues shall be the assessed
value of each lot of taxable real property in the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Area for the tax year
preceding the tax year in which this subtitle becomes effective.
(d) The Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Area shall terminate on the earliest of:
(1) December 31, 2056;
(2) The date on which the Bonds are paid in full or are defeased and are no longer
outstanding; or
(3) Five years after the effective date of this subtitle, if no Bonds are issued.
Sec. 7065. Bond authorization.
(a) The Council approves and authorizes the issuance of one or more series of Bonds in
an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $26 million to fund the Project. The Bonds, which
may be issued from time to time, in one or more series, shall be tax-exempt or taxable as the
Mayor shall determine and shall be payable and secured as provided in section 7066.
(b) The proceeds of the Bonds shall be used as follows:
(1) An amount not to exceed $25 million shall be used to pay Development Costs
of the Project; and
(2) The balance of the proceeds may be used to pay the financing costs incurred
by the District, and to fund capitalized interest and required reserves.
(c) The Mayor may pay from the proceeds of the Bonds the financing costs and expenses
of issuing and delivering the Bonds, including underwriting, legal, accounting, financial
advisory, credit enhancement, marketing, sale, and printing costs and expenses.
Sec. 7066. Payment and security.
171

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Except as may be otherwise provided in this subtitle, the principal of, premium on, if
any, and interest on, the Bonds, and the payment of ongoing administrative expenses related to
the Bond financing shall be payable solely from proceeds received from the sale of the Bonds,
income realized from the temporary investment of those proceeds, Available Tax Increment and
other taxes and fees specifically designated by law for deposit into the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF
Fund, income realized from the temporary investment of those receipts and revenues prior to
payment to the Bond owners, and other funds that, as provided in the Financing Documents, may
be made available to the District for payment of the Bonds from sources other than the District,
all as provided for in the Financing Documents.
(b) Payment of the Bonds shall be secured as provided in the Financing Documents and
by an assignment by the District for the benefit of the Bond owners of certain of its rights under
the Financing Documents and Closing Documents to the trustee for the Bonds pursuant to the
Financing Documents.
(c) The trustee or paying agent is authorized to deposit, invest, and disburse the proceeds
received from the sale of the Bonds pursuant to the Financing Documents.
Sec. 7067. Bond details.
(a) The Mayor is authorized to take any action reasonably necessary or appropriate in
accordance with this subtitle in connection with the preparation, execution, issuance, sale,
delivery, security for, and payment of the Bonds of each class and series, including
determinations of:
(1) The final form, content, designation, and terms of the Bonds, including a
determination that the Bonds may be issued in certificated or book-entry form;
(2) The principal amount of the Bonds to be issued and denominations of the
Bonds;
(3) The rate or rates of interest or the method for determining the rate or rates of
interest on the Bonds;
(4) The date or dates of issuance, sale, and delivery of, and the payment of interest
on, the Bonds, and the maturity date or dates of the Bonds;
(5) The terms under which the Bonds may be paid, optionally or mandatorily
redeemed, accelerated, tendered, called, or put for redemption, repurchase, or remarketing before
their respective stated maturities;
(6) Provisions for the registration, transfer, and exchange of the Bonds and the
replacement of mutilated, lost, stolen, or destroyed Bonds;
(7) The creation of any reserve fund, sinking fund, or other fund with respect to
the Bonds;
(8) The time and place of payment of the Bonds;
172

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(9) Procedures for monitoring the use of the proceeds received from the sale of
the Bonds to ensure that the proceeds are properly applied and used to accomplish the purposes
of the Home Rule Act and this subtitle;
(10) Actions necessary to qualify the Bonds under blue sky laws of any
jurisdiction where the Bonds are marketed; and
(11) The terms and types of any credit enhancement under which the Bonds may
be secured.
(b) The Bonds shall contain a legend which shall provide that the Bonds are special
obligations of the District, are without recourse to the District, are not a pledge of, and do not
involve, the faith and credit or the taxing power of the District (other than the Available Tax
Increment and any other taxes and fees allocated to the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF Fund), do not
constitute a debt of the District, and do not constitute lending of the public credit for private
undertakings as prohibited in section 602(a)(2) of the Home Rule Act.
(c) The Bonds shall be executed in the name of the District and on its behalf by the
manual or facsimile signature of the Mayor, and attested by the Secretary of the District of
Columbia by the Secretary’s manual or facsimile signature.
(d) The official seal of the District, or a facsimile of it, shall be impressed, printed, or
otherwise reproduced on the Bonds.
(e) The Bonds of any series may be issued in accordance with the terms of a trust
instrument to be entered into by the District and a trustee or paying agent to be selected by the
Mayor, and may be subject to the terms of one or more agreements entered into by the Mayor
pursuant to section 490(a)(4) of the Home Rule Act.
(f) The Bonds may be issued at any time or from time to time in one or more issues and
in one or more series.
(g) The Bonds are declared to be issued for essential public and governmental purposes.
The Bonds, the interest thereon, and the income therefrom, and all funds pledged or available to
pay or secure the payment of the Bonds, shall at all times be exempt from taxation by the
District, except for estate, inheritance, and gift taxes.
(h) The District pledges, covenants, and agrees with the holders of the Bonds that, subject
to the provisions of the Financing Documents, the District will not limit or alter the revenues
pledged to secure the Bonds or the basis on which such revenues are collected or allocated, will
not impair the contractual obligations of the District to fulfill the terms of any agreement made
with the holders of the Bonds, will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of
the Bonds, and will not modify, in any way, the exemptions from taxation provided for in this
subtitle, until the Bonds, together with interest thereon, and all costs and expenses in connection
with any suit, action, or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders of the Bonds, are fully met and
discharged. This pledge and agreement for the District may be included as part of the contract
with the holders of the Bonds. This subsection constitutes a contract between the District and the
173

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
holders of the Bonds. To the extent that any acts or resolutions of the Council may be in conflict
with this subtitle, this subtitle shall be controlling.
(i) Consistent with section 490(a)(4)(B) of the Home Rule Act and notwithstanding
Article 9 of Subtitle I of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code:
(1) A pledge made and security interest created in respect of the Bonds or
pursuant to any related Financing Document shall be valid, binding, and perfected from the time
the security interest is created, with or without physical delivery of any funds or any property
and with or without any further action;
(2) The lien of the pledge shall be valid, binding, and perfected as against all
parties having any claim of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the District, whether
or not such party has notice; and
(3) The security interest shall be valid, binding, and perfected whether or not any
statement, document, or instrument relating to the security interest is recorded or filed.
Sec. 7068. Issuance of the Bonds.
(a) The Bonds of any series may be sold at negotiated or competitive sale at, above, or
below par, to one or more persons or entities, and upon terms that the Mayor considers to be in
the best interests of the District.
(b) The Mayor or an Authorized Delegate may execute, in connection with each sale of
the Bonds, offering documents on behalf of the District, may deem final any such offering
document on behalf of the District for purposes of compliance with federal laws and regulations
governing such matters, and may authorize the distribution of the documents in connection with
the Bonds.
(c) The Mayor is authorized to deliver executed and sealed Bonds, on behalf of the
District, for authentication, and, after the Bonds have been authenticated, to deliver the Bonds to
the original purchasers of the Bonds upon payment of the purchase price.
(d) The Bonds shall not be issued until the Mayor receives an approving opinion from
Bond Counsel as to the validity of the Bonds of such series and, if the interest on the Bonds is
expected to be exempt from federal income taxation, the treatment of the interest on the Bonds
for purposes of federal income taxation.
(e) The Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law
18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.), and subchapter III-A of Chapter 3 of Title 47 of
the District of Columbia Official Code shall not apply to any contract the Mayor may from time
to time enter into, or the Mayor may determine to be necessary or appropriate, for the purposes
of this subtitle.
Sec. 7069. Financing and Closing Documents.
174

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) The Mayor is authorized to prescribe the final form and content of all Financing
Documents and all Closing Documents to which the District is a party that may be necessary or
appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the Bonds.
(b) The Mayor is authorized to execute, in the name of the District and on its behalf, the
Financing Documents and any Closing Documents to which the District is a party by the
Mayor’s manual or facsimile signature.
(c) If required, the official seal of the District, or a facsimile of it, shall be impressed,
printed, or otherwise reproduced on the Bonds, the other Financing Documents, and the Closing
Documents to which the District is a party.
(d) The Mayor’s execution and delivery of the Financing Documents and the Closing
Documents to which the District is a party shall constitute conclusive evidence of the Mayor’s
approval, on behalf of the District, of the final form and content of the executed Financing
Documents and the executed Closing Documents.
(e) The Mayor is authorized to deliver the executed and sealed Financing Documents and
Closing Documents, on behalf of the District, prior to or simultaneously with the issuance, sale,
and delivery of the Bonds, and to ensure the due performance of the obligations of the District
contained in the executed, sealed, and delivered Financing Documents and Closing Documents.
Sec.7070. Limited liability.
(a) The Bonds shall be special obligations of the District. The Bonds shall be without
recourse to the District. The Bonds shall not be general obligations of the District, shall not be a
pledge of, or involve, the faith and credit or the taxing power of the District (other than the
Available Tax Increment and any other taxes or fees allocated to the Bryant Street Phase 2 TIF
Fund), shall not constitute a debt of the District, and shall not constitute lending of the public
credit for private undertakings as prohibited in section 602(a)(2) of the Home Rule Act.
(b) The Bonds shall not give rise to any pecuniary liability of the District and the District
shall have no obligation with respect to the purchase of the Bonds.
(c) No person, including any Bond owner, shall have any claims against the District or
any of its elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents for monetary damages
suffered as a result of the failure of the District to perform any covenant, undertaking, or
obligation under this subtitle, the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents,
or as a result of the incorrectness of any representation in or omission from the Financing
Documents or the Closing Documents, unless the District or its elected or appointed officials,
officers, employees, or agents have acted in a willful and fraudulent manner.
Sec. 7071. District officials.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 7070(c), the elected or appointed officials,
officers, employees, or agents of the District shall not be liable personally for the payment of the
175

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Bonds or be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance of the Bonds, or for any
representations, warranties, covenants, obligations, or agreements of the District contained in this
subtitle, the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.
(b) The signature, countersignature, facsimile signature, or facsimile countersignature of
any official appearing on the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents shall
be valid and sufficient for all purposes notwithstanding the fact that the individual signatory
ceases to hold that office before delivery of the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing
Documents.
Sec. 7072. Maintenance of documents.
Copies of the specimen Bonds and of the final Financing Documents and Closing
Documents shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of the District of Columbia.
Sec. 7073. Information reporting.
Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the
issuance of the Bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the
Council.
SUBTITLE G. REEVES TIF
Sec. 7081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center Tax Increment
Financing Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7082. Definitions.
For the purposes of this subtitle, the term:
(1) “Authorized Delegate” means the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development, the Chief Financial Officer, the Treasurer, or any officer or employee of the
executive office of the Mayor to whom the Mayor has delegated any of the Mayor’s functions
under this subtitle pursuant to section 422(6) of the Home Rule Act.
(2) “Available Real Property Tax Revenues” means the revenues resulting from
the imposition of the tax provided for in Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia
Official Code, inclusive of any penalties and interest charges, exclusive of the special tax
provided for in section 481 of the Home Rule Act pledged to payment of general obligation
indebtedness of the District.
(3) “Available Sales Tax Revenues” means the revenues resulting from the
imposition of the tax under Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code,
including penalty and interest charges, exclusive of the portion thereof required to be deposited
in the Washington Convention Center Fund established pursuant to section 208 of the
176

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994, effective September 28, 1994 (D.C. Law
10-188; D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.08), and any amounts to be made available to the
Washington Metropolitan Transit Authority pursuant to section 7101 of the Revised Revenue
Contingency List Act of 2017, effective December 13, 2017 (D.C. Law 22-33; 64 DCMR 7652),
and section 2(b)(2)(A) of the Stable and Reliable Source of WMATA Revenues Act of 1982,
effective April 30, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-103; D.C. Official Code § 9-1111.15(b)(2)(A)).
(4) “Available Tax Increment,” means the sum of the Available Sales Tax
Revenues and Available Real Property Tax Revenues generated in the Frank D. Reeves
Municipal Center TIF Area in any fiscal year of the District minus the sum of Available Sales
Tax Revenues and Available Real Property Tax Revenues generated in the Frank D. Reeves
Municipal Center TIF Area in the applicable base year.
(5) “Bond Counsel” means a firm or firms of attorneys designated as bond
counsel from time to time by the Mayor.
(6) “Bonds” means the District of Columbia revenue bonds, notes, or other
obligations (including refunding bonds, notes, and other obligations), in one or more series,
authorized to be issued pursuant to this subtitle.
(7) “Chief Financial Officer” means the Chief Financial Officer established by
section 424(a)(1) of the Home Rule Act.
(8) “Closing Documents” means all documents and agreements, other than
Financing Documents, that may be necessary and appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the
Bonds, and includes agreements, certificates, letters, opinions, forms, receipts, and other similar
instruments.
(9) “Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.
(10) “Debt Service” means principal, premium, if any, and interest on the Bonds.
(11) “Development Costs” has the same meaning as in section 2(13) of the Tax
Increment Financing Authorization Act of 1998, effective September 11, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-
143; D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.01(13)).
(12) “Development Sponsor” means Reeves CMC Venture, LLC, a District of
Columbia limited liability company qualified to do business in the District of Columbia, or any
other entity that undertakes the development of the project with the approval of the Mayor.
(13) “District” means the District of Columbia.
(14) “Financing Documents” means the documents, other than Closing
Documents, that relate to the financing or refinancing of transactions to be affected through the
issuance, sale, and delivery of the Bonds, including any offering document, and any required
supplements to any such documents.
(15) “Home Rule Act” means the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 774; D.C. Official Code § 1-201.01 et seq.).
177

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(16) “Project” means the financing, refinancing, or reimbursing of Development
Costs incurred within the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF Area and adjoining parcels.
(17) “Refunding Bonds” means the District of Columbia Bonds, notes, or other
obligations, in one or more series, authorized to be issued pursuant to this subtitle to refund the
Bonds.
(18) “TIF” means tax increment financing.
Sec. 7083. Creation of the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF Fund.
(a) There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF
Fund. The Chief Financial Officer shall deposit into the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF
Fund the Available Tax Increment and any other taxes or fees specifically designated by law for
deposit in the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF Fund.
(b) The Mayor may pledge and create a security interest in the funds in the Frank D.
Reeves Municipal Center TIF Fund, or any sub-account within the Frank D. Reeves Municipal
Center TIF Fund, for the payment of debt service on the Bonds without further action by the
Council as permitted by section 490(f) of the Home Rule Act. The payment of debt service shall
be made in accordance with the provisions of the Financing Documents entered into by the
District in connection with the issuance of the Bonds.
(c) If, at the end of any fiscal year of the District, the balance of cash and investments in
the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF Fund exceeds the amount of debt service (including
prepayment of principal and interest), reserves on any Bonds, and any approved Bond-related
administrative expenses during the upcoming fiscal year, 50% of the excess shall be used to
prepay the principal of the Bonds or for future reserves or administrative expenses on the Bonds
and the remaining 50% of the excess shall be transferred to the unrestricted balance of the
General Fund of the District of Columbia.
Sec. 7084. Creation of the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF Area.
(a) There is created a TIF area designated as the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF
Area, which shall consist of Lot 0844 in Square 0204 and Air Rights Lot 7000 in Square 0204 as
shown on the tax rolls of the District as maintained by the Office of Tax and Revenue.
(b) As provided in section 7083, the Available Tax Increment from the Frank D. Reeves
Municipal Center TIF Area shall be deposited in the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF
Fund and may be used for the purposes set forth in section 7083.
(c)(1) The base year for determination of Available Sales Tax Revenues from locations
within the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF Area shall be the tax year preceding the year
in which this subtitle becomes effective.
(2) The base year for determination of Available Real Property Tax Revenues
from properties within the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF Area shall be the tax year
178

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
preceding the year in which this subtitle becomes effective and the initial assessed value to be
used in making the determination of Available Real Property Tax Revenues shall be the assessed
value of each lot of taxable real property in the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF Area for
the tax year preceding the tax year in which this subtitle becomes effective.
(d) The Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF Area shall terminate on the earliest of:
(1) December 31, 2057;
(2) The date on which the Bonds are paid in full or are defeased and are no longer
outstanding; or
(3) Five years after the effective date of this subtitle, if no Bonds are issued.
Sec. 7085. Bond authorization.
(a) The Council approves and authorizes the issuance of one or more series of Bonds in
an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $32 million to fund the Project. The Bonds, which
may be issued from time to time, in one or more series, shall be tax-exempt or taxable as the
Mayor shall determine and shall be payable and secured as provided in section 7086.
(b) The proceeds of the Bonds shall be used to pay Development Costs of the Project,
financing costs incurred by the District, and to fund capitalized interest and required reserves.
(c) The Mayor may pay from the proceeds of the Bonds the financing costs and expenses
of issuing and delivering the Bonds, including underwriting, legal, accounting, financial
advisory, credit enhancement, marketing, sale, and printing costs and expenses.
Sec. 7086. Payment and security.
(a) Except as may be otherwise provided in this subtitle, the principal of, premium on, if
any, and interest on, the Bonds, and the payment of ongoing administrative expenses related to
the bond financing shall be payable solely from proceeds received from the sale of the Bonds,
income realized from the temporary investment of those proceeds, Available Tax Increment and
other taxes and fees specifically designated by law for deposit into the Frank D. Reeves
Municipal Center TIF Fund, income realized from the temporary investment of those receipts
and revenues prior to payment to the Bond owners, and other funds that, as provided in the
Financing Documents, may be made available to the District for payment of the Bonds from
sources other than the District, all as provided for in the Financing Documents.
(b) Payment of the Bonds shall be secured as provided in the Financing Documents and
by an assignment by the District for the benefit of the Bond owners of certain of its rights under
the Financing Documents and Closing Documents to the trustee for the Bonds pursuant to the
Financing Documents.
(c) The trustee or paying agent is authorized to deposit, invest, and disburse the proceeds
received from the sale of the Bonds pursuant to the Financing Documents.
179

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7087. Bond details.
(a) The Mayor is authorized to take any action reasonably necessary or appropriate in
accordance with this subtitle in connection with the preparation, execution, issuance, sale,
delivery, security for, and payment of the Bonds of each class and series, including
determinations of:
(1) The final form, content, designation, and terms of the Bonds, including a
determination that the Bonds may be issued in certificated or book-entry form;
(2) The principal amount of the Bonds to be issued and denominations of the
Bonds;
(3) The rate or rates of interest or the method for determining the rate or rates of
interest on the Bonds;
(4) The date or dates of issuance, sale, and delivery of, and the payment of interest
on, the Bonds, and the maturity date or dates of the Bonds;
(5) The terms under which the Bonds may be paid, optionally or mandatorily
redeemed, accelerated, tendered, called, or put for redemption, repurchase, or remarketing before
their respective stated maturities;
(6) Provisions for the registration, transfer, and exchange of the Bonds and the
replacement of mutilated, lost, stolen, or destroyed Bonds;
(7) The creation of any reserve fund, sinking fund, or other fund with respect to
the Bonds;
(8) The time and place of payment of the Bonds;
(9) Procedures for monitoring the use of the proceeds received from the sale of
the Bonds to ensure that the proceeds are properly applied and used to accomplish the purposes
of the Home Rule Act and this subtitle;
(10) Actions necessary to qualify the Bonds under blue sky laws of any
jurisdiction where the Bonds are marketed; and
(11) The terms and types of any credit enhancement under which the Bonds may
be secured.
(b) The Bonds shall contain a legend which shall provide that the Bonds are special
obligations of the District, are without recourse to the District, are not a pledge of, and do not
involve, the faith and credit or the taxing power of the District (other than the Available Tax
Increment, and any other taxes and fees allocated to the Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center TIF
Fund), do not constitute a debt of the District, and do not constitute lending of the public credit
for private undertakings as prohibited in section 602(a)(2) of the Home Rule Act.
(c) The Bonds shall be executed in the name of the District and on its behalf by the
manual or facsimile signature of the Mayor, and attested by the Secretary of the District of
Columbia by the Secretary’s manual or facsimile signature.
180

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(d) The official seal of the District, or a facsimile of it, shall be impressed, printed, or
otherwise reproduced on the Bonds.
(e) The Bonds of any series may be issued in accordance with the terms of a trust
instrument to be entered into by the District and a trustee or paying agent to be selected by the
Mayor, and may be subject to the terms of one or more agreements entered into by the Mayor
pursuant to section 490(a)(4) of the Home Rule Act.
(f) The Bonds may be issued at any time or from time to time in one or more issues and
in one or more series.
(g) The Bonds are declared to be issued for essential public and governmental purposes.
The Bonds, the interest thereon, and the income therefrom, and all funds pledged or available to
pay or secure the payment of the Bonds, shall at all times be exempt from taxation by the
District, except for estate, inheritance, and gift taxes.
(h) The District pledges, covenants, and agrees with the holders of the Bonds that, subject
to the provisions of the Financing Documents, the District will not limit or alter the revenues
pledged to secure the Bonds or the basis on which such revenues are collected or allocated, will
not impair the contractual obligations of the District to fulfill the terms of any agreement made
with the holders of the Bonds, will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of
the Bonds, and will not modify, in any way, the exemptions from taxation provided for in this
subtitle, until the Bonds, together with interest thereon, and all costs and expenses in connection
with any suit, action, or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders of the Bonds, are fully met and
discharged. This pledge and agreement for the District may be included as part of the contract
with the holders of the Bonds. This subsection constitutes a contract between the District and the
holders of the Bonds. To the extent that any acts or resolutions of the Council may be in conflict
with this subtitle, this subtitle shall be controlling.
(i) Consistent with section 490(a)(4)(B) of the Home Rule and notwithstanding Article 9
of Subtitle I of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code:
(1) A pledge made and security interest created in respect of the Bonds or
pursuant to any related Financing Document shall be valid, binding, and perfected from the time
the security interest is created, with or without physical delivery of any funds or any property
and with or without any further action;
(2) The lien of the pledge shall be valid, binding, and perfected as against all
parties having any claim of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the District, whether
or not such party has notice; and
(3) The security interest shall be valid, binding, and perfected whether or not any
statement, document, or instrument relating to the security interest is recorded or filed.
Sec.7088. Issuance of the Bonds.
181

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) The Bonds of any series may be sold at negotiated or competitive sale at, above, or
below par, to one or more persons or entities, and upon terms that the Mayor considers to be in
the best interests of the District.
(b) The Mayor or an Authorized Delegate may execute, in connection with each sale of
the Bonds, offering documents on behalf of the District, may deem final any such offering
document on behalf of the District for purposes of compliance with federal laws and regulations
governing such matters, and may authorize the distribution of the documents in connection with
the Bonds.
(c) The Mayor is authorized to deliver executed and sealed Bonds, on behalf of the
District, for authentication, and, after the Bonds have been authenticated, to deliver the Bonds to
the original purchasers of the Bonds upon payment of the purchase price.
(d) The Bonds shall not be issued until the Mayor receives an approving opinion from
Bond Counsel as to the validity of the Bonds of such series and, if the interest on the Bonds is
expected to be exempt from federal income taxation, the treatment of the interest on the Bonds
for purposes of federal income taxation.
(e) The Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law
18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.), and subchapter III-A of Chapter 3 of Title 47 of
the District of Columbia Official Code shall not apply to any contract the Mayor may from time
to time enter into, or the Mayor may determine to be necessary or appropriate, for the purposes
of this subtitle.
Sec. 7089. Financing and Closing Documents.
(a) The Mayor is authorized to prescribe the final form and content of all Financing
Documents and all Closing Documents to which the District is a party that may be necessary or
appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the Bonds.
(b) The Mayor is authorized to execute, in the name of the District and on its behalf, the
Financing Documents and any Closing Documents to which the District is a party by the
Mayor’s manual or facsimile signature.
(c) If required, the official seal of the District, or a facsimile of it, shall be impressed,
printed, or otherwise reproduced on the Bonds, the other Financing Documents, and the Closing
Documents to which the District is a party.
(d) The Mayor’s execution and delivery of the Financing Documents and the Closing
Documents to which the District is a party shall constitute conclusive evidence of the Mayor’s
approval, on behalf of the District, of the final form and content of the executed Financing
Documents and the executed Closing Documents.
(e) The Mayor is authorized to deliver the executed and sealed Financing Documents and
Closing Documents, on behalf of the District, prior to or simultaneously with the issuance, sale,
182

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
and delivery of the Bonds, and to ensure the due performance of the obligations of the District
contained in the executed, sealed, and delivered Financing Documents and Closing Documents.
Sec.7090. Limited liability.
(a) The Bonds shall be special obligations of the District. The Bonds shall be without
recourse to the District. The Bonds shall not be general obligations of the District, shall not be a
pledge of, or involve, the faith and credit or the taxing power of the District (other than the
Available Tax Increment, and any other taxes or fees allocated to the Frank D. Reeves Municipal
Center TIF Fund), shall not constitute a debt of the District, and shall not constitute lending of
the public credit for private undertakings as prohibited in section 602(a)(2) of the Home Rule
Act.
(b) The Bonds shall not give rise to any pecuniary liability of the District and the District
shall have no obligation with respect to the purchase of the Bonds.
(c) No person, including any Bond owner, shall have any claims against the District or
any of its elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents for monetary damages
suffered as a result of the failure of the District to perform any covenant, undertaking, or
obligation under this subtitle, the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents,
or as a result of the incorrectness of any representation in or omission from the Financing
Documents or the Closing Documents, unless the District or its elected or appointed officials,
officers, employees, or agents have acted in a willful and fraudulent manner.
Sec. 7091. District officials.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 7090(c), the elected or appointed officials,
officers, employees, or agents of the District shall not be liable personally for the payment of the
Bonds or be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance of the Bonds, or for any
representations, warranties, covenants, obligations, or agreements of the District contained in this
subtitle, the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.
(b) The signature, countersignature, facsimile signature, or facsimile countersignature of
any official appearing on the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents shall
be valid and sufficient for all purposes notwithstanding the fact that the individual signatory
ceases to hold that office before delivery of the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing
Documents.
Sec. 7092. Maintenance of documents.
Copies of the specimen Bonds and of the final Financing Documents and Closing
Documents shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of the District of Columbia.
Sec. 7093. Information reporting.
183

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the
issuance of the Bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the
Council.
SUBTITLE H. NATIONAL COUNCIL OF NEGRO WOMEN, INC. REAL
PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION
Sec. 7101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “National Council of Negro Women, Inc., Real Property
Tax Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7102. Chapter 10 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-1099.17. National Council of Negro Women, Inc.; Square 460, Lot 810.”.
(b) A new section 47-1099.17 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1099.17. National Council of Negro Women, Inc.; Square 460, Lot 810.
“(a) The real property described for assessment and taxation purposes as Square 460, Lot
810 (“subject real property”) shall be exempt from real property taxation so long as the real
property is, and to the extent the real property is:
“(1) Owned by the National Council of Negro Women, Inc.; and
“(2) Used as the headquarters of the National Council of Negro Women, Inc. or
used by another nonprofit organization for charitable or educational purposes; provided, that no
portion of the subject real property shall be exempt from real property taxes under this section if
the subject real property is not used as the headquarters of the National Council of Negro
Women, Inc.
“(b) Sections 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009 shall apply to the subject real property in
the same manner as if the subject real property were exempt from taxation, or denied an
exemption from taxation, under § 47-1002(8).”.
SUBTITLE I. TAX CODE CONFORMITY AND CLARIFICATION
Sec. 7111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Tax Code Conformity and Clarification Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7112. Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended as follows:
184

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) The section designation for section 47-1803.03 is amended to read as follows:
“47-1803.03. Gross income — Corporation, financial institution, unincorporated
business, and partnership deductions.”.
(2) A new section designation is added to read as follows:
“47-1803.04. Gross income — Individual, estate, and trust deductions.”.
(3) The section designation for section 47-1806.02 is amended to read as follows:
“47-1806.02. “Tax on residents and nonresidents — Personal exemptions. [Repealed].”.
(b) Section 47-1801.04 is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
“(3A)(A) “Basic standard deduction” means:
“(i) For the taxable year ending December 31, 2025:
“(I) In the case of a return filed by a single individual or
married individual filing a separate return, $15,000;
“(II) In the case of a return filed by a head of household,
$22,500; and
“(III) In the case of a return filed by married individuals
filing a joint return, separate on a combined return, or a surviving spouse, $30,000; and
“(ii) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, but
before January 1, 2030:
“(I) In the case of a return filed by a single individual or
married individual filing a separate return, $15,000, increased annually pursuant to the cost-of
living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple of $50, rounded down to the
next multiple of $50);
“(II) In the case of a return filed by a head of household,
$22,500, increased annually pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not
result in a multiple of $50, rounded down to the next multiple of $50); and
“(III) In the case of a return filed by married individuals
filing a joint return, separate on a combined return, or a surviving spouse, $30,000 increased
annually pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple
of $50, rounded down to the next multiple of $50).
“(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “cost-of-living
adjustment” shall have the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (11) of this section; except,
that, the term “base year” shall mean the calendar year beginning January 1, 2025, or the
calendar year beginning one calendar year before the calendar year in which the new dollar
amount of the basic standard deduction shall become effective, whichever is later.”.
(2) Paragraph (11)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “of this section or §§ 47-
1806.02(f)(1)(A) and (i)” and inserting the phrase “of this section” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (44) is amended as follows:
185

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the phrase “; or”
and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended to read as follows:
“(iv) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, but
before January 1, 2025, the standard deduction as prescribed in section 63(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986; or”.
(iii) New sub-subparagraphs (v) and (vi) are added to read as
follows:
“(v) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, but
before January 1, 2030, the term “standard deduction” means the sum of:
“(I) The basic standard deduction as defined in paragraph
(3A) of this section; and
“(II) The additional standard deduction as prescribed in
section 63(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; or
“(vi) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2029, the
standard deduction as prescribed in section 63(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.”.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the phrase “; or”
and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended to read as follows:
“(iv) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, but
before January 1, 2025, the standard deduction as prescribed in section 63(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986; or”.
(iii) New sub-subparagraphs (v) and (vi) are added to read as
follows:
“(v) For the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2024, but
before January 1, 2030, the term “standard deduction” means the sum of:
“(I) The basic standard deduction as defined in paragraph
(3A) of this section; and
“(II) The additional standard deduction as prescribed in
section 63(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; or
“(vi) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2029, the
standard deduction as prescribed in section 63(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.”.
(C) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase
“married individuals” and inserting the phrase “married individuals or registered domestic
partners” in its place.
186

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the phrase “; or”
and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(iii) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended to read as follows:
“(iv) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, but
before January 1, 2025, the standard deduction as prescribed in section 63(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986; or”
(iv) New sub-subparagraphs (v) and (vi) are added to read as
follows:
“(v) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, but
before January 1, 2030, the term “standard deduction” means the sum of:
“(I) The basic standard deduction as defined in paragraph
(3A) of this section; and
“(II) The additional standard deduction as prescribed in
section 63(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; or
“(vi) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2029, the
standard deduction as prescribed in section 63(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.”.
(c) Section 47-1803.02(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs (1B) and (1C) to read as
follows:
“(1B) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, but before January 1,
2030, individuals, estates, and trusts who did not elect to itemize shall include any income
deducted or otherwise excluded pursuant to § 170(p) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for
that taxable year.”.
“(1C) For the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2024, and ending before
January 1, 2026, individuals, estates, and trusts shall include any income or gain excluded from
their federal gross income pursuant to § 1202(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for that
taxable year; provided, that the sale or exchange of qualified small business stock occurred on or
after December 3, 2025.”.
(d) Section 47-1803.03 is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-1803.03. Gross income — Corporation, financial institution, unincorporated
business, and partnership deductions.”.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Expenses. — All the ordinary and necessary expenses paid or incurred during
the taxable year in carrying on any trade or business which are deductible under the provisions of
§ 162(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; except, that:
187

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2021, but before January
1, 2028, the deduction allowed for domestic research or experimental expenditures, as defined
under § 174A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall be:
“(i) Charged to the capital account; and
“(ii) Allowed as an amortization deduction of such expenditures
ratably over the 5-year period beginning with the midpoint of the taxable year in which such
expenditures are paid or incurred;
“(B) No taxpayer shall be allowed the election to amend a tax return
pursuant to the transition rules under section 70302(f)(1) of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act,
approved July 4, 2025 (139 Stat. 194: 26 U.S.C. § 174A, note); and
“(C) No taxpayer shall be allowed the election pursuant to the transition
rules under section 70302(f)(2) of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act, approved July 4, 2025 (139
Stat. 194: 26 U.S.C. § 174A, note).”.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Interest. — All interest paid or accrued within the taxable year on
indebtedness which is deductible under the provisions of § 163 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986; except, that for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, but before January 1,
2030:
“(A) In computing the limitation on business interest, as allowed under §
163 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, “adjusted taxable income” means the adjusted taxable
income determined under § 163(j)(8)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; except, that §
163(j)(8)(A)(v) shall not apply; and
“(B) “Floor plan financing interest”, as defined under § 163(j)(9) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall not apply.”.
(C) The lead-in language of paragraph (4)(A) is amended by striking the
phrase “Losses sustained during the taxable year and not compensated for by insurance or
otherwise:” and inserting the phrase “Losses sustained during the taxable year and not
compensated for by insurance or otherwise which are deductible under the provisions of § 165 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986:” in its place.
(D) Paragraph (7) is amended to read as follows:
“(7)(A) Depreciation. — A reasonable allowance for exhaustion, wear, and tear of
property used in the trade or business, including a reasonable allowance for obsolescence, and
including in the case of natural resources, allowances for depletion as permitted by reasonable
rules that the Chief Financial Officer may promulgate. The basis upon which such allowances
are to be computed shall be the basis provided for in § 47-1811.04.
“(B) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph:
188

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i) No deduction shall be allowed for the special depreciation
allowance under § 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;
“(ii) There shall be allowed as a deduction for the cost of property
elected to be treated as not chargeable to capital account under § 179 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 an amount of equal to the lesser of $25,000 or the actual cost of the property for
the year the property is placed in service;
“(iii) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, but
before January 1, 2030, no deduction shall be allowed for the special depreciation allowance
under § 168(n) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
“(iv) A depreciation deduction may be allowed for an investor in a
shared equity financing agreement as provided in § 47-3507.”.
(E) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the phrase “For purposes of this
section, the term “actually paid”, when used with reference to the District of Columbia, includes
compensation waived under § 1-611.15.” and inserting the phrase “For the purposes of this
section, the term “actually paid”, when used with reference to the District of Columbia, includes
compensation waived under § 1-611.15, and no charitable contributions may be carried forward
under this paragraph.” in its place.
(F) Paragraph (18)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “section 179 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986” and inserting the phrase “§ 179 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986” in its place.
(G) Paragraph (20) is amended follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “Capital
Gains” and inserting the phrase “Qualified Opportunity Fund Capital Gains” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the semicolon and
inserting a period in its place.
(iii) Subparagraph (B) is amended as follows:
(I) The existing text is designated as sub-subparagraph (i).
(II) A new sub-subparagraph (ii) is added to read as
follows:
“(ii) For amounts invested in a QOF after December 31, 2026, the
reduction of capital gains tax liability through a 10% step-up basis, if invested in a QOF for 5
years, pursuant to § 1400Z-2(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall be realized only if
the taxpayer invests in a QOF that meets the criteria set forth in subparagraph (D) of this
paragraph.”.
(iv) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
(I) The existing text is designated as sub-subparagraph (i).
(II) A new sub-subparagraph (ii) is added to read as
follows:
189

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(ii) In the case of the abatement of capital gains tax on an
investment of capital gains held in a QOF for at least 10 years, pursuant to § 1400Z-2(c) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, the abatement shall be realized only if the taxpayer invests in a
QOF that meets the criteria set forth in subparagraph (D) of this paragraph.”.
(3) Subsections (b), (b-1), (b-2), (b-3), and (b-4) are repealed.
(4) Subsection (d)(6)(A) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) Expenses incurred to produce income which is either exempt or not
subject to taxation under this chapter.”.
(5) Subsection (e) is repealed.
(e) A new section 47-1803.04 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1803.04. Gross income — Individual, estate, and trust deductions.
“(a) Deductions allowed — Generally.
“(1) Individuals. An individual is allowed either the standard deduction or
itemized deductions (including the additional deductions set forth in subsection (e) of this
section, if applicable) as set forth in this section.
“(2) Estates and Trusts. An estate or trust is allowed the itemized deductions
(including the additional deductions set forth in subsection (e) of this section, if applicable) and
any deductions allowed under § 47-1809.05.
“(b) Standard deduction. If an individual elects to claim the standard deduction on the
individual’s federal income tax return, the individual must claim the standard deduction as
defined in § 47-1801.04(44), and no itemized deductions and other additions to the standard
deduction are allowed, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. If an individual elects to
claim any itemized deductions on the individual’s federal return, the individual must claim the
itemized deductions as allowed under this section and the standard deduction is not allowed. For
married individuals or domestic partners, if the net income of one of the spouses or registered
domestic partners is determined by itemizing deductions on a separate return, neither of the
spouses or registered domestic partners is allowed the standard deduction.
“(c) Itemized deductions.
“(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, in computing net income, an
individual, estate, or trust is allowed any deduction allowed under the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, and to the same extent, on a federal individual or fiduciary income tax return; except, that
a deduction for state or local taxes under § 164 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (except as
otherwise provided in subsection (d)(1) and (2) of this section) is allowed without regard to the
applicable limitation amounts set forth in § 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(2)(A) In the case of an individual whose District of Columbia adjusted gross
income exceeds the applicable amount, the amount of the itemized deductions otherwise
allowable for the taxable year shall be reduced by 5% of the excess of the District of Columbia
adjusted gross income over the applicable amount.
190

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term:
“(i) “Applicable amount” means $200,000 ($100,000, married
filing separately); and
“(ii) “Itemized deductions” does not include the deduction:
“(I) Under § 213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986
relating to expenses such as, for example, medical or dental;
“(II) For investment interest, as defined in § 163(d) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
“(III) Under § 165(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, for casualty or theft losses described in § 165(c)(2) and (3) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, or for losses described in § 165(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(C) This subsection shall be applied after the application of any other
limitation on the allowance of any itemized deduction.
“(D) This subsection shall not apply to any estate or trust.
“(d) Deductions not allowed. No deductions shall be allowed for the following:
“(1) Income taxes;
“(2) Franchise taxes imposed by this chapter;
“(3) S corporation income. Any deduction passing to a stockholder in a small
business corporation as defined in § 1371 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, making an
election under § 1372(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, or an S Corporation as defined in
§ 1361(a) and (b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, making an election under § 1362(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, that is otherwise deductible under the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section and that was allowable in determining the taxable income of the
small business corporation or S Corporation subject to tax under the provisions of subchapter VII
of this chapter;
“(4) Qualified business income. A deduction allowed under § 63(b)(3) or § 199A
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;
“(5) Business deductions. Any deduction not allowed under § 47-1803.03 or in
excess of a deduction allowed but limited under § 47-1803.03;
“(6) Qualified tips. Any deduction allowed for qualified tips under § 224 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2026;
“(7) Qualified overtime compensation. A deduction allowed for qualified
overtime compensation under § 225 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for taxable years
beginning before January 1, 2026;
“(8) Personal car loan interest. Any deduction for personal car loan interest
allowed under § 163(h)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for taxable years beginning
before January 1, 2026; and
191

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(9) Senior deduction. Any deduction for an enhanced senior deduction allowed
under § 151(d)(5)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for taxable years beginning before
January 1, 2026.
“(e) Additional deductions allowed. The following additional deductions are allowed as
deductions from gross income in computing net income of any individual, estate, or trust, as the
case may be:
“(1) Classroom teacher expenses.
“(A) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2006, an individual
who has been a classroom teacher in a public school or public charter school in the District of
Columbia for the entire year for which the individual is filing or for the entire year prior to the
year for which the individual is filing and is approved for teaching by the District of Columbia
Public Schools may deduct from gross income:
“(i) The amount the individual paid during the year for basic
classroom materials and supplies necessary for teaching; provided, that the deduction shall not
exceed $500 per year, per individual, whether the individual files individually or jointly; and
“(ii) The amount the individual paid during the year as tuition and
fees for post-graduate education, professional development, or state licensing examination and
testing required for, or related to, improving teacher credentials or maintaining professional
certification; provided, that the deduction shall not exceed $1,500 per year, per individual,
whether the individual files individually or jointly.
“(B) The deductions under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not be
allowed to the extent the same expenses were claimed by the individual in computing federal
adjusted gross income for the same taxable year under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;
“(2) Capital Gains from a Qualified Opportunity Fund. The capital gains
deduction for investing in a qualified opportunity fund in the same manner as set forth in § 47-
1803.03(a)(20);
“(3) Qualified tips. Any deduction allowed for qualified tips under § 224 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025;
“(4) Qualified overtime compensation. A deduction allowed for qualified
overtime compensation under § 225 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2025;
“(5) Personal car loan interest. Any deduction for personal car loan interest
allowed under § 163(h)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for taxable years beginning
after December 31, 2025; and
“(6) Senior deduction. Any deduction for an enhanced senior deduction allowed
under § 151(d)(5)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2025.”.
(f) Section 47-1805.02 is amended as follows:
192

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Residents and nonresidents. —
“(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, every
individual required to file a federal return under the provisions of § 6012 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986; and
“(B) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and ending
before January 1, 2030, every individual having, for the taxable year, gross income that equals or
exceeds the applicable basic standard deduction as defined under § 47-1801.04(3A).”
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) Every fiduciary of a trust that has gross income of $100 or more for
the taxable year; and
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B) Every fiduciary of an estate that has gross income of $1 or more for
the taxable year.”.
(C) Subparagraph (C) is repealed.
(D) Subparagraph (D) is repealed.
(g) Section 47-1806.01 is amended by striking the phrase “in excess of the personal
exemptions and credits for dependents allowed by § 47-1806.02 and” and inserting the phrase
“in excess of” in its place.
(h) Section 47-1806.02 is repealed.
(i) Section 47-1806.04(f)(1)(B-2) is amended to read as follows:
“(B-2)(i) If a return is filed for the full calendar or fiscal year ending on
December 31, 2025, an individual with a qualifying child who is allowed an earned income tax
credit under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be allowed a credit against the tax
imposed by this chapter for the taxable year in an amount equal to 100% of the earned income
tax credit allowed under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(ii) If a return is filed for a full calendar or fiscal year beginning
after December 31, 2025, but before January 1, 2029, an individual with a qualifying child who
is allowed an earned income tax credit under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be
allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter for the taxable year in an amount equal
to 85% of the earned income tax credit allowed under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986.”.
Sec. 7113. Applicability.
Except as otherwise provided, this subtitle shall apply as of January 1, 2025; except, that
section 7112(d)(2)(A) shall apply as of January 1, 2022.
193

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE J. PAY-AS-YOU GO CAPITAL REQUIREMENT
Sec. 7121. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Pay-as-You-Go Capital Requirement Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7122. Section 47-392.02(f) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (1)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “In each fiscal year” and inserting
the phrase “Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, in each fiscal year” in its
place.
(b) New paragraphs (3) and (4) are added to read as follows:
“(3) This subsection shall not apply to the capital improvement plan proposed or
approved as part of the Fiscal Year 2027 budget and financial plan.
“(4) The Chief Financial Officer shall analyze the operating fund needs of the
capital improvement plan, exclusive of any amounts for the Washington Metropolitan Area
Transit Authority (“WMATA”) and submit a report to the Mayor and Council, no later than
January 15, 2027, detailing this analysis and recommending a sustainable amount of annual
operating funds for the capital improvement plan, exclusive of any amounts for WMATA.”.
SUBTITLE K. PASS-THROUGH ENTITY TAXATION
Sec. 7131. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Pass-Through Entity Tax D.C. Gross Income
Adjustment Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7132. Section 47-1803.02(a) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended
by adding a new paragraph (1D) to read as follows:
“(1D) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, in computing District
gross income, a taxpayer who claims a credit under § 47-1806.04(a) for taxes paid to another
state, territory or possession of the United States, or political subdivision thereof, shall add back
the taxpayer’s distributive or pro rata share of any tax imposed on and paid by a pass-through
entity to such jurisdiction to the extent such tax was deducted from the pass-through entity’s
gross income in determining the pass-through entity’s federally-taxable income for the taxable
year under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.”.
SUBTITLE L. UNITED MEDICAL CENTER CLOSEOUT FUND
Sec. 7141. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “United Medical Center Closeout Fund Establishment
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
194

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7142. The Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation Establishment Amendment Act of
2011, effective September 14, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-21; D.C. Official Code § 44-951.01 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 5130(c) (D.C. Official Code § 44-951.19(c)) is amended by striking the
phrase “the District” and inserting the phrase “the District, as provided in section 5131” in its
place.
(b) A new section 5131 is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 5131. United Medical Center Closeout Fund.
“(a) There is established as a special fund the United Medical Center Closeout Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Chief Financial Officer in accordance with
subsection (c) of this section.
“(b) The following revenue shall be deposited into the Fund:
“(1) Funds of the Corporation;
“(2) Funds of the hospital;
“(3) Payments of accounts receivable to the Corporation or hospital;
“(4) Payments to the Corporation or hospital from third-party payers; and
“(5) All other funds received by or on behalf of the Corporation or the hospital.
“(c)(1) Money in the Fund may be used for:
“(A) All purposes related to the closeout of the hospital, including
collections or payments resulting from audits or other third-party reconciliations; and
“(B) Any required expenses of the Corporation or hospital, including
records management.
“(2) Additionally, $10.918 million from the Fund shall be transferred to the local
fund of the District of Columbia in Fiscal Year 2027.
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time, except as provided in subsections (c)(2) and (e) of this
section.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.
“(e) Any money remaining available in the Fund after all obligations of the Corporation
and the hospital have been settled or paid, as determined by the Chief Financial Officer, shall be
transferred to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as
part of the fiscal year-end close for the year in which such determination is made by the Chief
Financial Officer.”.
Sec. 7143. Applicability.
195

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2025.
SUBTITLE M. SPECIAL FUND TRANSFERS
Sec. 7151. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Special Fund Transfers Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7152. (a) Notwithstanding any provisions of law directing the deposit of revenue
into, or limiting the use of funds in, the accounts listed in the following chart, the Chief Financial
Officer shall transfer, in the fiscal years indicated, the following amounts from the certified fund
balances and other revenue in the identified accounts to the General Fund of the District of
Columbia:
FY27 FY28 FY29 FY 30
Fund
Agency Fund Name Amount Amount Amount Amount
Number
(in $) (in $) (in $) (in $)
AG0 1060013 Accountability Fund (19,440)
AG0 1060029 Lobbyist Fund (28,979) (28,979) (28,979) (78,967)
Utility Payments for
AM0 1060193 (70,000) (70,000) (70,000) (70,000)
Non-DC Agencies
Eastern Market
AM0 1060206 (162,551) (162,551) (162,551) (163,858)
Enterprise Fund
AT0 1060048 Dishonored Check Fees (114,893) (114,893) (114,893) (114,893)
OFT Central Collection
AT0 1060299 (283,975) (283,975) (283,975) (283,975)
Unit (CCU) O Type
BA0 1060197 Distribution Fees (7,093)
Reimbursable From
BE0 1060208 (1,402)
Other Governments
Child Support -
CB0 1060035 TANF/AFDC (100,000) (4,964)
Collections
Special Purpose Revenue
CI0 1060009 (121,965) (121,965) (121,965) (121,965)
Fund
CQ0 1060261 Rental Unit Fee Fund (75,000) (75,000) (75,000) (76,584)
Real Estate Guaranty and
CR0 1060265 (175,000)
Education Fund
Real Estate Appraisal
CR0 1060266 (155,000) (25,000) (165,000) (165,000)
Fee
CR0 1060267 OPLA - Special Account (700,000) (700,000) (700,000) (2,668,404)
196

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Basic Business License
CR0 1060272 (839,563)
Fund
DC Combat Sports
CR0 1060277 (10,000)
Commission Fund
Corporate Recordation
CR0 1060283 (1,135,245)
Fund
Vending Regulation
CR0 1060284 (10,000) (25,000) (25,000) (164,575)
Fund
Industrial Revenue Bond
EB0 1060063 (2,732)
Program
Economic Development
EB0 1060131 (2,732)
Special Account
Corrections Trustee
FL0 1060006 (342,898)
Reimbursement
HT0 1011007 Healthy DC Fund (515,441)
Individual Insurance
HT0 1060386 Market Affordability and (5,082,000)
Stability
Underground Storage
KG0 1060058 (580)
Tank Fines and Fees
KG0 1060154 Storm Water Fees (94,363) (94,363) (94,363) (96,875)
Sustainable Energy Trust
KG0 1060327 (17,974) (53,974)
Fund
Energy Assistance Trust
KG0 1060330 (1,352)
Fund
KT0 1060323 Clean City Fund (88,168) (88,168) (88,168) (88,168)
Motor Vehicle
KV0 1060310 (63,703) (63,703) (63,703) (63,703)
Inspection Station
Transfer Dedicated
KZ0 1060313 (2,500,000) (5,000,000) (5,000,000) (5,000,000)
Capital Revenues
ABC - Import and Class
LQ0 1060374 (55,697)
License Fees
Medical Cannabis
LQ0 1060389 (11,705) (11,705) (11,705) (20,402)
Administration Fund
DC Surplus Personal
PO0 1060258 (3,200) (3,200) (3,200) (3,200)
Property Sales Oper.
RJ0 1060146 Subrogation Fund (4,411)
DBH Federal
RM0 1060070 Beneficiary (10,000) (10,000) (10,000) (810,000)
Reimbursement
197

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
DBH Medicare and
RM0 1060145 Third Party (1,792,925) (1,792,925) (1,792,925) (1,792,925)
Reimbursement
Public Vehicles for Hire
TC0 1060381 (116,336) (116,336) (116,336) (116,336)
Consumer Service
DC NET Services
TO0 1060025 (512,186) (512,186) (512,186) (512,186)
Support
TO0 1060195 SERV US Program (191) (191) (191) (285)
(b) The amounts identified in subsection (a) of this section:
(1) Are in addition to any amounts that were transferred or are to be transferred
from an account identified in subsection (a) of this section to the General Fund of the District of
Columbia pursuant to section 7142 of the Non-Lapsing Fund Transfers Act of 2025, effective
December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; 72 DCR 9825); and
(2) Shall be made available as set forth in the approved Fiscal Year 2027 Budget
and Financial Plan.
SUBTITLE N. SPECIAL FUND SWEEP REVERSALS
Sec. 7161. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Special Fund Sweeps Repeal and Reversal Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7162. (a) The tabular array in section 7(a) of the Fiscal Year 2025 Revised Local
Budget Temporary Act of 2025, effective December 11, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-56; 72 DCR 12372),
is amended by striking the following row:
KG0 1060036 Fishing License (74,176.06)
(b) The transfer of $74,176.06 from the Fishing License Fund to the unassigned fund
balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia, provided for in section 7(a) of the
Fiscal Year 2025 Revised Local Budget Temporary Act of 2025, effective December 11, 2025
(D.C. Law 26-56; 72 DCR 12372), is reversed and, to the extent such transfer or any portion of
such transfer has occurred, the dollar amount of such transfer, or portion of such transfer, shall
be transferred from the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia
to the Fishing License Fund on October 1, 2027.
Sec. 7163. The tabular array in section 7142(a) of the Non-Lapsing Fund Transfers Act of
2025, effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; 72 DCR 9825), is amended as follows:
(a) Strike the following rows:
198

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
AM0 1011014 West End Library/ (272,430.00) (287,202.00) (210,226.00) (223,134.00)
Firehouse Maintenance
KG0 1060036 Fishing License (1,200.00) (1,200.00) (1,200.00) (1,200.00)
KG0 1060181 Lead Poisoning (150,000.00) (150,000.00) (150,000.00) (150,000.00)
Prevention Fund
KG0 1060368 Economy II Fund (12,892.00) (12,892.00) (12,892.00) (12,892.00)
KG0 1060369 Residential Aid (6,063.67) (6,063.67) (6,063.67) (6,063.67)
Discount
KG0 1060370 Residential Essential (42,110.78) (42,110.78) (42,110.78) (42,110.78)
Services
(b) Strike the following row:
BX0 1011002 Dedicated Taxes (28,634.78) (699,718.78) (1,608,799.78) (2,536,062.78)
and insert the following row in its place:
BX0 1011002 Dedicated Taxes 0 0 (1,608,799.78) (2,536,062.78)
(c) Strike the following row:
Outpatient Hospital
HT0 1011019 Directed Payments (5,031,741.46) (4,738,703.00) (4,833,477.00) (5,322,705.00)
Provider Fee Fund
and insert the following row in its place:
Outpatient Hospital
HT0 1011019 Directed Payments (5,031,741.46) (4,489,260.05) (4,489,260.05) (4,040,334.05)
Provider Fee Fund
Sec. 7164. Applicability.
Section 7163 shall apply as of October 1, 2025.
SUBTITLE O. SOUTHWEST BID FEDERAL BUILDING DISPOSALS
PREPARATION
Sec. 7171. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Preparing Southwest for Federal Building Disposals
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
199

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7172. Section 210(c) of the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective
September 9, 2014 (D.C. Law 20-136; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.60(c)), is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (1)(A)(iii) is amended by striking the phrase “Notwithstanding sub-
subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph” and inserting the phrase “Notwithstanding sub-
subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph, for properties subject to the BID taxes imposed
pursuant to this subparagraph prior to the effective date of the Fiscal Year 2027 Budget Support
Emergency Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-
724)” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
SUBTITLE P. UNINCORPORATED BUSINESS TAX
Sec. 7181. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Unincorporated Business Franchise Tax Clarification
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7182. Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended as follows:
(1) A new section designation is added to read as follows:
“47-1806.18. Credit for franchise taxes paid.”.
(2) A new section designation is added to read as follows:
“47-1809.11. Credit for franchise taxes paid.”.
(b) Section 47-1803.02(a)(2) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language of subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase
“in an income or franchise tax return filed” and inserting the phrase “in an income tax return
filed” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the phrase “In the case of any person
entitled” and inserting the phrase “For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2026, in the
case of any person entitled” in its place.
(3) Subparagraph (P) is amended by striking the phrase “In the case of any person
entitled to a share” and inserting the phrase “For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2026,
in the case of any person entitled to a share” in its place.
(c) A new section 47-1806.18 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1806.18. Credit for franchise taxes paid.
“(a) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, there shall be allowed a non-
refundable credit against the tax imposed by this subchapter as follows:
200

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) In the case of any person whose adjusted gross income includes a distributive
share of net income from an unincorporated business, an amount calculated pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section; and
“(2) In the case of any person whose adjusted gross income includes a share in the
income of any corporation that is an S corporation, as defined in § 1361(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, an amount calculated pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
“(b) The credit allowed under this section shall be limited to the lesser of:
“(1) The person’s pro rata share of the franchise taxes actually paid pursuant to
subchapter VIII or VII of this chapter, as the case may be, or
“(2) The tax imposed on the person pursuant to this subchapter.
“(c) This section shall not apply unless the unincorporated business or corporation, as the
case may be, filed a franchise tax return for the taxable year for which the credit is claimed and
paid all taxes due.”.
(d) A new section 47-1809.11 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1809.11. Credit for franchise taxes paid.
“(a) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, there shall be allowed a non-
refundable credit against the tax imposed by this subchapter as follows:
“(1) In the case of any resident estate or resident trust for which the adjusted gross
income includes a distributive share of trade or business net income that is from an
unincorporated business, as defined in § 47-1808.01, an amount equal to that resident estate’s or
resident trust’s pro rata distributive share of taxes paid by the unincorporated business pursuant
to subchapter VIII of this chapter for that taxable year; and
“(2) In the case of any resident estate or resident trust for which the adjusted gross
income includes a share in the income of any corporation that is an S corporation, as defined in §
1361(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, an amount equal to that that resident estate’s or
resident trust’s pro rata share of taxes paid by the corporation pursuant to subchapter VII of this
chapter for that taxable year.
“(b) The credit allowed under this section shall be limited to the lesser of:
“(1) The resident estate’s or resident trust’s pro rata share of the franchise taxes
actually paid pursuant to subchapter VIII or VII of this chapter, as the case may be, or
“(2) The tax imposed on the resident estate or resident trust pursuant to this
subchapter.
“(c) This section shall not apply unless the unincorporated business or corporation, as the
case may be, filed a franchise tax return for the taxable year for which the credit is claimed and
paid all taxes due.”.
Sec. 7183. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of January 1, 2026.
201

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE Q. BALLPARK PRESERVATION CLARIFICATION
Sec. 7191. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Ballpark Preservation Clarification Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7192. Section 102a(b) of the Ballpark Omnibus Financing and Revenue Act of 2004,
effective March 7, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-276; D.C. Official Code § 10-1601.02a(b)), is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “in any fiscal year exceed 110% of
the ballpark sales taxes collected in the previous fiscal year, the amount in excess of 110% shall
not be deposited in the Fund” and inserting the phrase “in any fiscal year exceed 115% of the
largest amount of annual ballpark sales taxes collected in a single year during the previous 5
years, the amount in excess of 115% shall not be deposited in the Fund” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(c) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
“(3A) Amounts collected pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-3902(d); and”.
Sec. 7193. Section 47-3902(d) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
striking the phrase “shall be deposited in the Ballpark Revenue Fund established by section 102
of the Ballpark Omnibus Financing and Revenue Act of 2004, passed on reconsideration on
December 21, 2004 (Re-enrolled version of Bill 15-1028)” and inserting the phrase “shall be
deposited in the Ballpark Revenue Fund established by § 10-1601.02(b) until the requirements of
§ 10-1601.02(e) have been met, at which time this amount shall be deposited in the Ballpark
Preservation and Maintenance Fund established by § 10-1601.02a” in its place.
SUBTITLE R. BOARD OF REVIEW FOR ANTI-DEFICIENCY VIOLATIONS
Sec. 7201. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Board of Review for Anti-Deficiency Violations
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7202. Section 47-355.07(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended
to read as follows:
“(c)(1) The Review Board shall be comprised of 7 representatives of the District of
Columbia government, appointed as follows:
“(A) Two representatives who shall be appointed by the Chief Financial
Officer;
202

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) One representative who shall be appointed by the Mayor;
“(C) Two representatives of the Council who shall be appointed by the
Chairman of the Council, one of whom shall serve as the Chairperson of the Review Board;
“(D) One representative who shall be appointed by the Inspector General;
and
“(E) One representative who shall be appointed by the Attorney General.”.
SUBTITLE S. UNION MARKET TIF BOND ISSUANCE AUTHORITY
EXTENSION
Sec. 7211. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Union Market TIF Extension of Bond Issuance
Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7212. The Union Market Tax Increment Financing Act of 2017, effective February
15, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-58; D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.36e et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 4(c)(3)(A) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.36g(c)(3)(A)) is amended by striking
the word “Twenty-five” and inserting the word “Thirty” in its place.
(b) Section 14 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.36q) is amended by striking the date “March
1, 2027” and inserting the date “March 1, 2032” in its place.
SUBTITLE T. RULE 736 REPEALS
Sec. 7221. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Rule 736 Repeals Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 7222. The Medical Necessity Restroom Access Act of 2022, effective August 27,
2022 (D.C. Law 24-153; D.C. Official Code § 7-2141 et seq.), is repealed.
Sec. 7223. The Juneteenth History and Planning Commission Establishment Act of 2022,
effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-179; D.C. Official Code § 1-185.01), is repealed.
Sec. 7224. Sections 2(d) and 3 of the Safer Streets Amendment Act of 2022, effective
December 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-214; 69 DCR 14004), are repealed.
Sec. 7225. The Period Equity Righting an Injustice of District Residents (PERIOD) Act
of 2022, effective February 23, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-250; D.C. Official Code § 10-1071 et seq.),
is repealed.
203

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7226. Amendatory sections 2a, 2b, 2c, 2d(5), 2g, 2h, 2i(b)(2) and (3), and 2j(a) in
section 2(b) of the Safe Streets for Students Amendment Act of 2022, effective March 10, 2023
(D.C. Law 24-285; 70 DCR 998), are repealed.
Sec. 7227. The Childhood Continuous Coverage Amendment Act of 2024, effective
March 23, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-144; 71 DCR 1477), is repealed.
SUBTITLE U. BORROWING FOR CAPITAL PROJECTS
Sec. 7231. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Borrowing for Capital Projects Emergency Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7232. Section 47-335.01 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(b) New subsections (b) and (c) are added to read as follows:
“(b) The Chief Financial Officer is authorized to determine whether income tax secured
revenue bonds, general obligation bonds, or bond anticipation notes or other notes or obligations
authorized by subchapter II-D of this chapter (“Income Tax Bond Act”) or acts authorizing the
issuance of bonds and notes pursuant to sections 461 through 467 and 475 of the Home Rule Act
(“Bond Acts”), will be issued to finance or refinance the capital projects identified in a resolution
passed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. If notes or other temporary obligations are
issued to finance such capital projects, the Chief Financial Officer shall determine when and
whether income tax secured revenue bonds or general obligation bonds will be issued to refund
or refinance the outstanding notes in accordance with the Income Tax Bond Act, the Bond Acts,
and other applicable laws.
“(c) If the funds allocated pursuant to a resolution passed pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section exceed the amount required to complete any authorized capital project identified in
such resolution, the excess funds shall be made available to finance other capital projects
approved by a prior or subsequent Council bond issuance resolution or act.”.
Sec. 7233. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of October 19, 2000.
SUBTITLE V. REVISED REVENUE AND LOCAL RESERVES
Sec. 7241. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Revised Revenue and Local Reserves Emergency Act
of 2026”.
204

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7242. Fiscal Year 2026 and Fiscal Year 2027 Additional Revenues.
(a) To the extent that the Fiscal Year 2026 local revenues certified in the June 2026,
September 2026, or December 2026 quarterly revenue estimates exceed the local revenue
estimate of the Chief Financial Officer dated February 27, 2026, together with revenue generated
from the Fiscal Year 2027 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis
on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-724), and transfers authorized by the Fiscal Year
2026 Revised Local Budget Adjustment Emergency Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on
June 23, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-662), the first $150 million of excess local funds shall
be deposited in the Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account established pursuant to section 47-
392.02(j-1) of the District of Columbia Official Code (“Account”) to restore funds transferred to
the General Fund pursuant to section 5 of the Fiscal Year 2026 Revised Local Budget
Adjustment Emergency Act of 2026, passed on an emergency basis on June 23, 2026 (Enrolled
version of Bill 26-662).
(b) If the Fiscal Year 2026 excess local funds described in subsection (a) of this section
equal less than $150 million, then, to the extent that the Fiscal Year 2027 local revenues certified
in the June 2026, September 2026, or December 2026 quarterly revenue estimates exceed the
resources appropriated in the Fiscal Year 2027 Local Budget Act of 2026, passed on 2nd reading
on June 23, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-659), for Fiscal Year 2027, excluding the resources
appropriated under the heading “Appropriation for Additional Resources”, the excess local funds
shall be deposited in the Account in the amount necessary, when combined with the amount
deposited pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to equal $150 million.
(c)(1) After satisfaction of the conditions specified in subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, the Fiscal Year 2027 excess local funds appropriated pursuant to paragraph (2) under the
heading “Appropriation of Additional Resources” in the Fiscal Year 2027 Local Budget Act of
2026, passed on 2nd reading on June 23, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-659), shall be
allocated as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(2) Fiscal Year 2027 excess local funds certified in the June 2026 and September
2026 quarterly revenue estimates shall be allocated as follows no later than October 1, 2026:
(A) The first $9 million in one-time funds to Non-Departmental for
transfer to the District of Columbia Housing Authority (“the Authority”) in the event the federal
emergency housing voucher program expires, which shall be used to administer the Emergency
Housing Voucher Interim Assistance Program established by section 26i of the District of
Columbia Housing Authority Act of 1999, passed on emergency basis on July 7, 2026 (Enrolled
version of Bill 26-724);
(B) The next $3 million in one-time funds to the Department of Human
Services for the Emergency Rental Assistance Program;
205

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) The next $2 million in one-time funds to the Department of Youth
Rehabilitative Services for the Credible Messengers program; and
(D) The next $36 million in one-time funds to the Workforce Investment
Account.
(3) Fiscal Year 2027 excess local funds certified in the December 2026 quarterly
revenue estimate shall be allocated, no later than January 1, 2027, to any agency, program, or
account, in the order of priority identified in paragraph (2) of this subsection, that was not fully
funded pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection.
Sec. 7243. Fiscal Years 2028 to 2030 Revenues.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent that Fiscal Year 2028, Fiscal
Year 2029, and Fiscal Year 2030 local recurring revenues certified in the June 2026, September
2026, or December 2026 revenue estimates exceed the annual revenue estimate incorporated in
the approved budget and financial plan for Fiscal Year 2027, excess recurring revenues certified
in Fiscal Years 2028 through 2030 shall be allocated as follows:
(1) The first $40 million in local recurring funds to the Office of the State
Superintendent of Education for the Childcare Subsidy;
(2) The next $62 million in local recurring funds to the Office of the State
Superintendent of Education for the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Program;
(3) The next $25 million in local recurring funds to the Office of Victim Services
and Justice Grants for the Access to Justice Initiative;
(4) The next $15 million in local recurring funds to the Department of Health
Care Finance to fund direct medical education; and
(5) The remainder of all recurring revenue up to $187 million to the Universal Per
Student Funding Formula.
Sec. 7244. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of June 29, 2026.
SUBTITLE W. SUBJECT TO FUNDING REPEALS AND MODIFICATIONS
Sec. 7251. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Subject to Funding Repeals and Modifications
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7252. Section 5 of the Residential Housing Environmental Safety Amendment Act
of 2020, effective March 16, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-188; 68 DCR 1227), is repealed.
206

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7253. Section 10 of the Elections Modernization Amendment Act of 2022, effective
April 6, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-342; 69 DCR 14609), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Section 2(d) and the amendatory
section 5(10A), (10E), and (21) within section 3(c)(1)(G), (H), and (N) shall apply upon the date
of inclusion of their” and inserting the phrase “Amendatory section 5(a)(21) within section
3(c)(1)(N) shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its” in its place.
(b) Subsection (c)(2) is amended by striking the word “provisions” and inserting the word
“provision” in its place.
Sec. 7254. (a) Section 8(d) of the Strengthening Traffic Enforcement, Education, and
Responsibility (“STEER”) Amendment Act of 2024, effective April 20, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-161;
71 DCR 2248), is repealed.
(b) This section shall apply as of January 1, 2027.
Sec. 7255. Section 10 of the Open Movie Captioning Requirement Amendment Act of
2024, effective July 19, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-190; 71 DCR 6693), is repealed.
Sec. 7256. Section 8 of the Electrical and Gas Utility Underground Work Wage Act of
2024, effective March 7, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-274; 72 DCR 353), is repealed.
Sec. 7257. Section 3 of the Ranked Choice Voting and Open the Primary Elections to
Independent Voters Act of 2024, effective March 7, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-295; 71 DCR 15797), is
repealed.
Sec. 7258. Section 301 of the Youth Mentorship Through Community Engagement
Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-306; 72 DCR 1071), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “This act shall apply” and inserting
the phrase “Title I shall apply” in its place.
(b) Subsection (c)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “this act” and inserting the phrase
“the provision identified in subsection (a) of this section” in its place.
Sec. 7259. Section 4 of the Pets in Housing Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 21,
2025 (D.C. Law 25-308; 72 DCR 1076), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “This act shall apply” and insert the
phrase “Section 3 shall apply” in its place.
(b) Subsection (c)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “this act” and inserting the phrase
“the provision identified in subsection (a) of this section” in its place.
207

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7260. Section 7 of the Public Life and Activity Zones Amendment (“PLAZA”) Act
of 2024, effective March 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-312; 72 DCR 1085), is repealed.
Sec. 7261. The Youth Advisory Council on Climate Change and Environmental
Conservation Establishment Act of 2025, effective December 31, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-62; 72
DCR 12840), is amended as follows:
(a) The lead-in language of section 2(c)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “All initial
appointments to the Youth Climate Council shall be made no later than 180 days after the
applicability date of this act” and inserting the phrase “All initial appointments to the Youth
Climate Council shall be made no later than March 30, 2027” in its place.
(b) Section 5 is repealed.
Sec. 7262. Section 3 of the Strengthening Capacity and Transparency at DYRS
Amendment Act of 2026, effective June 11, 2026 (D.C. Law 26-131; 73 DCR 6831), is repealed.
Sec. 7263. Section 3 of the Place-Based Substance Use Disorder Outreach Amendment
Act of 2026, effective July 18, 2026 (D.C. Law 26-142; 73 DCR 8157), is repealed.
Sec. 7264. The Enhancing Consumer Protection Procedures Amendment Act of 2026,
enacted on June 25, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-344; 73 DCR 9162), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 4 is amended as follows:
(1) Amendatory section 28-3904(b) within subsection (f) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (18) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (19) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; or” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (20) is added to read as follows:
“(20) Violate any provision of § 28-3820.”.
(2) Amendatory section 28-3909(a) within subsection (j)(1) is amended by
striking the phrase “28-3819,” and inserting the phrase “28-3819, 28-3820,” in its place.
(b) Section 6 is repealed.
Sec. 7265. Section 4 of the Support, Opportunity, Unity, Legal Relationships (SOUL)
Amendment Act of 2026, enacted on June 24, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-346; 73 DCR 9189), is
repealed.
208

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7266. Section 3 of the Prenatal and Postpartum Remote Patient Monitoring
Clarification Amendment Act of 2025, enacted on July 2, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-359; 73 DCR
____), is repealed.
Sec. 7267. Section 3(a) of the Judith Heumann Memorial Workers with Disabilities
Amendment Act of 2026, enacted on July 2, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-360; 73 DCR ____), is amended
by striking the phrase “Section 2” and inserting the phrase “Section 2, except for amendatory
section 421within section 2,” in its place.
Sec. 7268. Section 3 of the Green’s Court Park Designation Act of 2026, enacted on July
1, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-362; 73 DCR 9396), is repealed.
Sec. 7269. Section 3 of the Harmony Park Designation Act of 2026, enacted on July 1,
2026 (D.C. Act 26-363; 73 DCR 9398), is repealed.
Sec. 7270. Section 3 of the Rodney Wright Basketball Court Designation Act of 2026,
enacted on July 1, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-364; 73 DCR 9400), is repealed.
Sec. 7271. Section 6 of the Medical Debt Mitigation Amendment Act of 2026, enacted on
July 2, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-365; 73 DCR 9402), is repealed.
SUBTITLE X. INCOME AND FRANCHISE TAX REFUND DENIAL APPEAL
DEADLINE
Sec. 7281. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Income and Franchise Tax Refund Denial Appeal
Deadline Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7282. Section 47-1815.01 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Strike the phrase “and assessed by the Mayor under the provisions of § 47-1812.05
may” and insert the phrase “and assessed by the Chief Financial Officer under the provisions of §
47-1812.05, or any person aggrieved by the denial of any claim for refund for taxes under this
chapter, may” in its place.
(b) Strike the phrase “date of the assessment of the deficiency” and insert the phrase
“date of the assessment of the deficiency or the denial of the claim for refund” in its place.
Sec. 7283. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of July 12, 2022.
209

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE Y. BUSINESS ACTIVITY TAX FEASIBILITY STUDY
Sec. 7291. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Business Activity Tax Information and Process
Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7292. Business Activity Tax information and process report.
(a) No later than January 31, 2027, the Chief Financial Officer shall submit a report to the
Mayor and the Council that contains the following information:
(1) An analysis of the District’s existing tax data that identifies gaps in
information, such as business types that are missing from the District’s tax forms, necessary to
estimate the revenues associated with the implementation of a Business Activity Tax;
(2) The process by which the Office of the Chief Financial Officer proposes to
undertake estimating revenues associated with the implementation of a Business Activity Tax,
including:
(A) The process to gather any missing data through informational returns
or the expansion of existing returns;
(B) Any legislative language or requirements necessary to effectuate
informational returns and data collection;
(C) The timeline and costs to implement an informational return or similar
process sufficient to estimate revenues associated with the implementation of a Business Activity
Tax;
(3) An evaluation of taxes similar to a Business Activity Tax that have been
implemented in other jurisdictions, including:
(A) The volatility of the revenue collected from the tax; and
(B) Challenges associated with administering the tax; and
(4) Legal considerations associated with the implementation of a Business
Activity Tax in the District.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “Business Activity Tax” means a tax on gross
receipts of every business with a substantial nexus in the District, which shall be calculated by
subtracting the sum of purchases from other businesses, rent, and capital expenditures from gross
receipts that exceed $200,000.
SUBTITLE Z. HOWARD UNIVERSITY PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION
CLARIFICATION
Sec. 7301. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Howard University Property Tax Exemption
Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026.”
210

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7302. Section 47-1018 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
adding a new subsection (c) to read as follows:
“(c) For the purposes of this section, real property of Howard University or a subsidiary
includes any buildings, improvements or other structures located on land ground leased to an
entity exempt from tax under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, notwithstanding
the conveyance of all rights and interests in such buildings, improvements or other structures to
such section 501(c)(3) entity for the term of the ground lease; provided, that all such rights and
interests shall revert to Howard University or the subsidiary upon termination or expiration of the
ground lease.”.
Sec. 7303. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of March 10, 2023.
SUBTITLE AA. PARKING TAX AND MARKETPLACE SELLER
CLARIFICATIONS
Sec. 7311. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Parking Tax and Marketplace Seller Clarifications
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 7312. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Chapter 20 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-2001(h) is amended as follows:
(A) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
(B) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) The term “marketplace seller” shall not include the District government with
respect to retail sales of, or charges or fees imposed by the District for, parking on a street,
avenue, road, highway, or other public space in the District under the jurisdiction and control of
the Mayor pursuant to § 50-2603 that are made through a marketplace operated by a person
under contract with the District to list, advertise, store, or process such retail sales or charges.”.
(2) Section 47-2002(a)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “, except the service
of parking or storing of motor vehicles or trailers on a parking lot owned or operated by the
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority and located adjacent to a Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority passenger stop or station;” and inserting a semicolon in its
place.
(3) Section 47-2005 is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (41) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place.
211

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(B) Paragraph (42)(B)(ii) is amended by striking the period and inserting
the phrase “; and” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (43) is added to read as follows:
“(43)(A) Sales by the District of, and charges and fees imposed by the District for,
the service of parking a motor vehicle or trailer at a parking space on a street, avenue, road,
highway, or other public space in the District under the jurisdiction and control of the Mayor
pursuant to § 50-2603, including:
“(i) Such sales, charges, and fees that are paid through a person
under contract with the District ( “parking payment contractor”) to list, advertise, store, or
process such sales, charges, and fees; and
“(ii) Transaction fees imposed by a parking payment contractor on
a purchaser of such parking, pursuant to the parking payment contractor’s contract with the
District; and
“(B) Sales of or charges for the service of parking, storing, or keeping a
motor vehicle or trailer at a parking lot owned or operated by the Washington Metropolitan Area
Transit Authority and located adjacent to a Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority
passenger stop or station.”.
(b) Section 47-2202(a)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “, except the service of
parking or storing of motor vehicles or trailers on a parking lot owned or operated by the
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority and located adjacent to a Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority passenger stop or station;” and inserting a semicolon in its
place.
Sec. 7313. Applicability.
Section 7312(a)(1) shall apply as of January 1, 2019.
TITLE VIII. TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
SUBTITLE A. TECHNICAL AMENDMENTS
Sec. 8001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 8002. Section 511a(f-1) of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982,
effective April 20, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-241; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.11a(f-1)), is redesignated
as subsection (g).
Sec. 8003. Section 105b(c) of the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services
Establishment Act of 2004, effective June 11, 2026 (D.C. Law 26-130; 2-1515.05b(c)), is
amended as follows:
212

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “Code 24-276.01” and inserting the
phrase “Code § 24-276.01” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (3)(E) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
Sec. 8004. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Chapter 20 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-2002(a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2)(B) is amended by striking the period and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(i) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the semicolon and
inserting the phrase “; and” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the period and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(C) Paragraph (7)(B) is amended by striking the period and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(D) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(2) Section 47-2002.08(c)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “§ 47-2002(3)”
and inserting the phrase “§ 47-2002(a)(3)” in its place.
(b) Section 47-2202(a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2)(B) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3)(B) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(3) Paragraph (3C) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(4) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(5) The first paragraph (6) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(6) The second paragraph (6) is redesignated as paragraph (7).
(c) Chapter 46 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-4683 is redesignated as section 47-4684.
(2) The second section 47-4682 is redesignated as section 47-4683.
213

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 8005. Section 105(4) of the Living Wage Act of 2006, effective June 8, 2006 (D.C.
Law 16-118; D.C. Official Code § 2-220.05(4)), is amended by striking the phrase “eminent
threat” and inserting the phrase “imminent threat” in its place.
Sec. 8006. The District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective
March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) The lead-in language of section 223(e) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.23(e)) is
amended by striking the phrase “from the” and inserting the phrase “after the” in its place.
(b) The lead-in language of section 224(f) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.24(f)) is
amended by striking the phrase “of the” and inserting the phrase “after the” in its place.
Sec. 8007. Section 4952 of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001,
effective March 16, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-201; D.C. Official Code § 7-744.02), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “section 2(a)(2) and (7) of the
Health-Care and Community Residence Facility Hospice and Home Care Licensure Act of 1983,
effective February 24, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-48; D.C. Official Code § 44-501(a)(2) and (7)),” and
inserting the phrase “section 2(a)(7) and (8) of the Health-Care and Community Residence
Facility Hospice and Home Care Licensure Act of 1983, effective February 24, 1984 (D.C. Law
5-48; D.C. Official Code § 44-501(a)(7) and (8)),” in its place.
(b) Subsection (c)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “through (5)” and inserting the
phrase “through (5) of this section” in its place.
Sec. 8008. Section 302(14A) of the District of Columbia Deed Recordation Tax Act,
approved March 2, 1962 (76 Stat. 11; D.C. Official Code § 42-1102(14A)), is amended by
striking the phrase “section 401a(2A) of the Tenant Opportunity to Purchase Act of 1980, passed
on 2nd reading (reconsideration) on October 21, 2025 (Enrolled Version of Bill 26-164)” and
inserting the phrase “section 401a(3) of the Tenant Opportunity to Purchase Act of 1980,
effective December 31, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-80; D.C. Official Code § 42-3404.01a(3))” in its
place.
Sec. 8009. Section 2 of the Prohibition of Discrimination in the Provision of Insurance
Act of 1986, effective August 7, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-132; D.C. Official Code § 31-1601), is
amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (7A) is redesignated as paragraph (8).
(b) Paragraph (7B) is redesignated as paragraph (9).
214

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 8010. Section 16-2409 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as
section 16-2399.09.
Sec. 8011. Section 11(a-1) of the Day Care Policy Act of 1979, effective September 19,
1979 (D.C. Law 3-16; D.C. Official Code § 4-410(a-1)), is amended by striking the phrase
“(b)(2) of this section” and inserting the phrase “(b) of this section” in its place.
Sec. 8012. The second section 27 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Act of
1999, effective December 31, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-80; D.C. Official Code § 6-233), is
redesignated as section 26h.
TITLE IX. APPLICABILITY; FISCAL IMPACT; EFFECTIVE DATE
Sec. 9001. Applicability.
Except as otherwise provided, this act shall apply as of October 1, 2026.
Sec. 9002. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 9003. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
215

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
216